In an emergency call, the professor confessed to shooting his girlfriend.
During a call to the emergency line with a shaking voice, Professor Shannon Lamb admitted to police that he had shot his girlfriend and it was necessary for them to come to their home.
Lamb has presided over that his "sweet dog" was alive and likely to be upset, and that the contacts on the dead woman's family can be found on her phone.
Inside police found the body of Amy Prentiss and a handwritten report on a white office paper: "I'm so sorry and I wish I could get it back, I loved Amy and she's the only one that ever loved me," it said in a letter signed by Lamb by the authorities, according to authorities.
There was no suspicion that Lamb, who taught two online courses for Delta State University in Cleveland, Mississippi, would travel 300 miles to the school campus, where police believe he shot favourite Professor Ethan Schmidt in the door of his office.
Police chief at Delta State University, Lynn Buford, said employees at the university heard the shooting at 10: 18 a.m.
Lamb said he made a fatal phone call to the emergency line shortly afterwards.
Eventually there was another death; Lamb took his own life when police came for him.
The day after the shooting at the school, it forced students and faculty to hide behind locked doors, with mandated authorities still trying to trace what was Lamb's motivation.
The details, which were published by investigators on the part of the state and students and employees who knew him, together they created an image of a talented, but likely troubled teacher.
The students confirmed they were looking forward to his lessons.
Police in Gautier, where Prentiss died, confirmed he had no criminal record or violent past.
Schmidt himself included Lamba into the book he wrote, into thanks to "great people," with whom he shared an academic life.
The two were taught at the School of Social Sciences and history along with other 17 members of the faculty, and many students were taking courses at both at the same time.
At the same time, there have been injunctions in relation to problems.
The student who raised Lamba, Brandon Beavers, said he also seemed agile and shaky, "as if something wasn't right with him."
Another student, Mikel Sykes, said that Lamb told him that he was experiencing stress at the end of the academic year 2014-15.
Lamb had previously asked Delta State University on sick leave for health reasons, when he said he had a sort of problem.
And this year he only taught two online courses.
Recent changes to the university's recruitment process meant that the doctorate on which Lamb worked hard would not guarantee an automatic term for him to become an assistant professor.
President William LaForge said he had not known about any conflict between Lamb and Schmidt, but that "Mr. Lamb seemed to be troubled by something."
Lamb will no longer answer those questions.
After he left campus, police intercepted his trail as he crossed the border of Arkansas back to Misissippi.
Before he could be arrested, Lamb killed a single shot from a gun in the yard of a house about a mile from his parents on the outskirts of Greenville, Mississippi, confirmed to the state coroner of Washington, Methel Johnson.
He left the car started on the street.
It was not immediately clear why Lamb was going to this house, although Johnson said he probably knew the people who lived here.
Lamb grew up in this country.
Lamb began working at the university, which has 3500 students in the city, which numbered about 12000 people, in 2009, and taught geography and hours of education.
He earned a doctorate in education in the spring.
One of longtime friends Lamba described him as a clever, charismatic and funny man.
Carla Hairston said she was 15 and Lamb 20 when they met through mutual friends.
She was with her friends in high school, and he was the great older guy who had tutored her for years to play guitar.
It was quite a heartbreaker then.
The heart of all the girls softened once he appeared, "says Hairston, who is now 40 years old and lives on the outskirts of Jackson.
Lamb and Prentiss reportedly dated for some time.
During an emergency phone call, Lamb said: "I killed my wife," but the record of the wedding never existed.
They had a dog named Lightning, who lived with them in a brick house that adjacent to the shoulder of the Gautier river.
Police said the dog was fine.
Former husband Prentiss, Shawn O'Steen, said they broke up 15 years ago but remained friends and had a daughter, who is 19 years old now.
"She was completely collapsed," O'Steen said of her daughter.
She was the best friend with her mother.
O'Steen said he had not met Lamb, but through his daughter Abigail he knew that Lamb was interested in music and playing the blues.
Lamb met Prentiss when he and Abigail graduated from the summer festival three years ago.
They later played random gigs together.
O'Steen said his daughter writes and sings her own music.
Prentiss was a nurse who worked for various online companies.
Mike Shaffer, the bartender and occasional entertainment co-ordinator at The Julep Room, sparked an illuminated bar near Gautier, said he last saw Lamba and Prentiss on the night of September 5, the sweat that Lamb had played on guitar and harmonica for the unruly crowd.
There was no sign of anything bad.
"He was just a happy couple," he said.
We laboured and recorded each other on a joke.
I mean, they both had a good sense of humor.
Schmidt, a slain professor, led a seminar in his first year and specialized in the original U.S. and colonial history, said Don Allan Mitchell, a professor of English at the school.
He was married and had three young children.
He studied at Emporia State University in Kansas and was president of a boyish student club and student government.
At Delta State campus in Cleveland on Tuesday night, about 900 people, including members of the faculty, staff, students and members of the community, took part in commemorative events with candles.
Schmidt's wife Liz, and brother Jeff Schnidt, also attended the vigils, during which the university choir sang "Bright Morning Star" and "Amazing Grace."
The school resumed on Wednesday.
"We are trying to get our students back," LaForge says.
The crisis is over.
This is a day of treatment.
Amy and Rogelio Solis filed a report in Cleveland, Mississippi.
Writers for the Associated Press, Emily Wagster Pettus in Greenville, Mississippi, and Rebecca Santana in New Orleans, also contributed to this report.
This story has been edited to reflect the fact that police are now claiming that Lamb made a call on the emergency line after he killed Schmidt, and that although Lamb called Prentiss his wife, there was no evidence they were actually sedated.
Toys R Us plan to hire fewer seasonal workers
Toys R Us claim they don't waste as many seasonal workers as last year, but the maker of children's toys and products says it can give current employees and seasonal workers a chance to work more hours.
The company also said it plans to hire about 40,000 employees to work in stores and distribution centres across the country, a decline compared to 45,000 last season.
Most jobs will be part-time.
The company claims to begin with a recruitment process this month, and employees will be added during October to December.
While holidays alone are months away, the shopping holiday season is coming, and the companies are preparing to temporarily hire staff to help in shops and sales, for sending and delivering goods.
Michael J. Fox jokes about his' date 'with Princess Diana
The Premier "Back to the Future" was a huge professional moment for Michael J. Fox.
She was notable for personal reasons.
"We sat in the theatre and waited for the coming of the royal family when I realised that the seat next to me was empty and I realized there would be a Princess Diana there," he said in a trailer for the upcoming documentary, "Back in time."
The film begins and I realise I'm within reach of something to call a fake date with the Princess of Wales.
"Back in time," is a documentary about "Return to the Future," which sets out interviews with Fox, Lea Thompson and Christopher Lloyd, as well as director Robert Zemecki and executive producer Steven Spielberg.
The prime minister "Five for the Future" was 30 years ago.
Spielberg said: "It is certainly the best travel document ever made for me."
"Back in time" will be available on VOD, DVD and in select cinemas in October.
UN chief says there is no military solution in Syria
Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon says his response to Russia's swift military support for Syria is that "there is no military solution" to the conflict's nearly five-year conflict, and more weapons will only exacerbate the violence and suffering of millions of people.
The head of the United Nations has again urged all sides, including a United Nations Security Council, to unite and support insider negotiations to find a political solution.
Ban said at a Wednesday news conference that he plans to meet with the foreign ministers of the five permanent councils of the country - the US, Russia, China, Britain and France - at the fringes of the Prime Minister's General Assembly at the end of this month to discuss the situation in Syria.
He expressed disappointment that divisions in the Council and among Syrian people and regional powers "made this situation impossible."
Ban called on five permanent members to show solidarity and unity they showed in reaching Iran's nuclear deal in resolving the crisis in Syria.
8 election figures showing Donald Trump in real light
Some tried to identify him as a man who frequently changed their minds.
The rest of them waved a hand as if they knew what they were doing.
And some are preparing to imploy.
But whether some Republicans try to pull Donald Trump down from the top of the election, they are failing (yet).
10 of the last 11 national surveys show that Donald Trump is in charge of a double-digit number, and some people are beginning to really ask what this means for the nominating chances of this magnate of real estate.
Of course, it is only the start of the election cycle.
None of this says Trump is likely to win the Republican nomination.
Experts point out that, at this time of 2011, the lead of Rick Perry's journey to the rise of Herman Caine, ultimately neither of them won the only position in the nomination process.
There are many reasons why he might run into general elections.
But external groups such as the Super PAC Jeb Bush and the Economic Conservative Group Club for Growth are recognizing Trump's will to endure and are starting to tell their dollars on hold with the goal of toppling him.
Here are some recent poll numbers suggesting the real estate magnate is not just a fleeting phase:
Trump's ratings surge turned 180 degrees.
Just before Donald Trump announced his candidacy in mid-June, it showed Monmouth University's vote that only two out of 10 Republicans have a positive look at this real estate magnate.
By mid-July, it was 40 percent.
At the start of August, it was 52 percent.
Now six of the 10 Republicans have a favorable view of Donald Trump.
Roughly three out of 10 say they have a negative opinion on him.
And these numbers hold in the early stages.
Following the poll, the University of Quinnipiac, which passed last week, found that 60 percent of Republicans had a positive opinion on Trump.
Two-thirds of the GOP candidates would be happy with Trump as a candidate.
In a CNN / ORC poll conducted last week, 67 percent of Republicans said they would be either "enthusiastic" or "satisfied" with Trump as a candidate.
Only two out of 10 said they would be "indignant" from his candidacy.
Only Ben Carson is producing roughly the same level of enthusiasm as Trump (43 percent of people said they would be "thrilled" against 40 per cent who say the same about Trump).
More immediate at levels of enthusiasm?
Marco Rubio with only 21 per cent.
On the other hand, 47 percent of Republican voters say they would be "dissatisfied" or "upset" if favourite Jeb Bush became a candidate.
Most Republicans don't see Trump's temperament as a problem.
While Donald Trump has been widely criticized for his nastiness and insults, 52 percent of Republican voters are nationwide inclined to think the real estate has magnate the right temperament for the post of president, according to Monday's ABC News / Washington Post.
The same number is held in the state Iowa State Club, which is the first in the country, where 52 percent of Republicans think he has the personality of the commander, according to Quinnipiac from last week.
Still, 44 percent think he doesn't have a personality to serve effectively, and nearly 6 out of 10 independents say his temperament does not belong to the White House, according to ABC / Post.
Republican voters are getting used to that idea.
When he puts on his savvy hats, Republican voters think Trump is a real candidate.
The question of who is most likely to win the GOP nomination, four out of 10 said Trump would be the best option, according to a CNN / ORC poll from last week.
That's a change from late July, when four out of 10 were betting their money on Jeb Bush.
Full disclosure: The GOP voters haven't had the clearest crystal ball in the past.
By this time in the past cycle, 4 of 10 Republicans selected Rick Perry as an award-winning candidate against 28 percent for Mitt Romney's eventual nominee.
Still, it turns out that a certain number of GOP voters see the Trump campaign as credible.
Even if Republicans have rallied around another candidate, Trump equally portends almost everyone.
Some pundits emphasize that the fragmented field is likely to contribute to Trump's leadership, while the anti-Trump support is diffused between more than a dozen other candidates.
But a poll by Monmouth University at the start of September shows that in a hypothetical straight contest between Trump and most other Republican candidates, Trump will gain almost always majority support.
He leads over Carly Fiorina by 13 points, Marc Rubio by 14 points, Walker by 15 points, Jeb Bush by 19 points and finally Rand Paul, John Kasich, Chris Christie by 33 points at each.
He's in a dead race with Ted Cruz.
The only candidate who defeats him?
Ben Carson would lead over a trading wide 19 points in a hypothetical match of one against one.
The bare majority of Donald Trump's followers claim they have already made their point.
A new Tuesday poll of CBS / NYT shows that just more than half of voters supporting Trump claim they won't change their minds.
Obviously, a lot of things can change, and nobody can really say that he would never change his mind.
46 percent say they keep an open backdoor for change between candidates.
Yet, Trump's current strongest opponent is his outsider's fellow neurosurgeon Ben Carson, but voters who consider their opinion as final would go twice more likely to vote for Trump.
6 of 10 Republicans reportedly agree with Trump on immigration issues.
Even since Donald Trump called immigrants from Mexico "rapists" in the announcement speech of his campaign, immigration is still holding up as a major and central topic of the conversation for 2016.
Some fear that Trump's drudgery will lure key Hispanic voters away from the Republican Party and damage seeking rebranding.
But according to a new Monday opinion poll by ABC / Post, six of the 10 Republicans claim to agree with Trump on immigration issues.
As long as the issue of immigration remains in the spotlight, Donald Trump will remain too.
Frustration at the government is reaching the new maxim.
Donald Trump and Ben Carson now get about half the support from Republican voters, especially given their status as outsiders.
Six of the 10 Republicans in the new Monday's ABC / Post poll say they want a political outsider rather than someone with government experience.
And they're also very angry about Washington.
Voting by the Des Moines Register / Bloomberg in Iowa a few weeks ago, it revealed that three out of four Republicans in Iowa are frustrated by Republicans in Congress, 54 percent are "unhappy" and 21 percent "hellish resentful."
The House has supported a greater share of the state from fees for coal.
The Czech Republic will gain more than 400 million.
The House in first reading supported the government's new upper law, which regulates the amount of revenue from surface mining of brown coal from mining companies.
Minister John Mousdek (ČSSD) has promised MPs that it will earn the extra money for both treasury and community budgets.
The draft has been criticised by MPs who worry that mining companies will no longer want to sponsor the community as yet, as they will so as so far, as they will pay higher fees directly to the state budgets, the House in first reading has supported the government's new upper law, which in addition to another means the state should receive a greater share of the revenue from the surface mining of brown coal from mining companies.
The state's share will rise to 67 percent, while the share price will be reduced from the existing 75 percent to 33 percent.
The draft also changes the method of calculating payment for the non-minerals that firms extract.
The change in fees for mineral mining is to bring in the state treasury by $427 million more than in 2013.
The government's revenue budgets are supposed to have a neutral impact, according to the government, as the fee is to be higher.
In the previous year, commuters received from fees of roughly 450 million kronor and a state budget of $150 million.
From mining of brown coal, it was costing about £200 million and the state had 66 million crowns.
The amendment also includes an increase in payment from the allotted area with an authorised hep per 1,000 per hectare per year.
The income of these payments continues to fully belong to the municipalities.
Industry Minister John Mousdek (ČSSD) told MPs that the commuters would receive a year instead of 14 million to 100 million kronor.
The amount of mining charges will no longer be determined by the law, but it is set by the government by its regulation.
The payment shall be recalculated as part of the quantity of the extract and the rates for the different types of mineral.
According to the Government, the reason for the amendment is, among other things, flexible responses to the current economic situation.
However, MEP Mark Benda warned that the imposition of a fee by decree of a government does not need to be in line with the constitution.
However, according to Minister of Youth, it is not a tax in this case because the state is charging a nerve that is state-owned.
Only the municipalities whose territory is concerned are affected by the fees.
In the case of deep coal mining, it will receive three-quarters of the community's money and a quarter of the state.
The same will be the same in the case of the extraction of radioactive rocks.
Part of the money the state is going to collect on the extraction charges will be earmarked.
For example, 28 percent will need to go to repair damage after mining or to secure a year-long rescue.
The draft was criticised by opposition MPs, who claimed in particular that it would damage the communities affected by the hardship and the region.
For example, Michael Kucera (TOP 09 and Mayor) warned that mining companies would no longer want to sponsor the community as they still did, because they would pay higher fees directly to the state budget.
"There is no possibility of tunnelling one of the poorest regions only to make Mr. Secretary of the Treasury improve the budget," said David Kádner (Dawn) elected in the Interest District.
Prior to the increase in unemployment at Mostecca, Mrs KSČM warned Hana Aulicka.
Kádner and Aulicky have failed to reject the amendment, and he wanted the law to return to the government.
In a explanatory memorandum, according to mining companies, an increase in fees does not sell to coal prices since prices are from more than 90 per cent in the long term.
As a result, major consumers like power plants or theaters should not feel price growth.
"On the other hand, this really raises the risk that the mining organizations will offset the increase in remittances by trying to reduce their operating expenses, which would in particular mean reducing the number of employees," the government admits.
However, an increase in fees in terms of employment is viable.
According to the rapporteur, for Novel Milan Urbana (ČSSD), it is crucial that MPs before the adoption of the law know the conclusions about the updated energy concept and, above all, the government's decision to limit coal mining.
If coal is also benefiting for the limits, then that will have implications for yields for the state and the community, he pointed out.
Urban disagrees with the Youth in that the decision to break the limit on top of the Czechoslovak army should fail until after 2020.
The limits on CSA below should be broken for reasons of social, economic, and long-term stability in domestic energy.
The cheery will lead the Czechs as one, the deployment will affect the weather.
All four Czech tennis players will appear at Thursday's drawing of the barrage of the Davis Cup final in India on a whiteboard, and this time each of them is likely to be hit by the game.
Captain Jaroslav Navrátil plans to spread the load on the entire Quartet due to difficult conditions.
There is heat and high humidity in Delhi, so they expect difficult fights that can stretch to five sets.
We have to take this into consideration.
I want to spread it by the weather.
And depending on what it looks like, he said, in today's practice of Czech selection,
With the one team and the world's forties, South Happy counts into both Friday and Sunday two games.
Lukas Rosol and Radek Stephen are likely to be in position.
I want everyone involved.
I have it slowly in my head, but I'm not going to say it yet, the captain said.
Another certainty in the Czech assembly should be Stephen's participation in Saturday's four game.
It's just a question of who will stand next to the experienced devotees, who have an 18-4 record in the Davis Cup quarter.
It's probably not fun.
There are options left with Rosolos, or Adam Pavlich.
"I really don't know who and how it is going to be," said Navrátil.
He will decide according to development of two games.
The variant may be Pavlasek, with Veselá surprised at the 1-1 win in the debacle over the Australians.
"He's polite to debase," said Navrátil.
I've done it against Australia, and if I play I'd like to show the same performance I've shown there since the second term.
"I'm happy for those experiences and I'd like to bring a point," Pavlasek said.
The landlord will put in two Yuki Bhambri (125th in the ATP ladder), which he won last week by a hooker in Shanghai, where he defeated a player in the third and fourth hundred of the ladder.
The pair will be Somdev Devvarman (164).
Both are players from the Challengers and ours has had the experience of the ATP Tour, but we have often learned that the ladders in the Davis Cup won't make a decision.
"He decides the current form, the weather," said Navrátil.
Friday's opening two games will begin at 6: 30 p.m. and can stretch because of the weather.
According to the forecast, it's supposed to rain, and the court is not under the roof.
However, the play may be possible for artificial lighting.
It has already ignited and it has some two thousand luxuries, which is enough.
"It should be put under the lights," he said.
Jeremy Corbyn will debut on Prime Minister's Questions
Since his election, Mr Corby's debut in PMQ has been widely enthusiastically expected
New Labor leader Jeremy Corbyn will have his debut in Prime Minister's Questions later, and will for the first time be working with David Cameron.
Mr Corbyn will put the first of his six allocated questions shortly after noon, while his performance is likely to be carefully studied by the media and MPs.
In a weekly statement, he asked "fewer theatres and more facts."
He also said he could skip several sessions he would have left to his colleagues.
This meeting will be the first parliamentary test of Mr Corby's leadership, which comes after his appointment to the shadow cabinet and his Tuesday speech to the annual TUC Congress.
Meanwhile, the decision by the Labour leader to stand quietly during the singing of the national anthem in the service on Tuesday for the 75th anniversary of the Battle of Britain was met with criticism from a series of Conservative MPs and is the focus of several stories on the newspaper's headline pages.
Mr Corby's decision not to sing the national anthem drew attention
A spokesman for Mr Corby said he would "stand in respectful silence" and that he would acknowledge "the heroism of the Royal Air Force in the Battle of Britain."
But a member of Mr Corby's shadow cabinet, Owen Smith, told BBC Two's Newsnight that a Labour leader would recommend the national anthem sing "no matter" on his belief that the monarchy should be abolished.
Nearly a dozen shadow ministers declined to serve in Mr Corby's top team, quoting differences in economy, defence and foreign affairs, and only less than a sixth of the parliamentary party initially supported him as leader.
The BBC's political correspondent Robin Brant says political differences in the job are also being "staged" following the appointment of Mr Corby over his position in the European Union and the government's limit of benefits.
Mr Corwas said at the TUC conference that the Labor Party had presented amended proposals to remove the entire idea of the benefits cap.
Hours later, Mr Smith, secretary of shadow work and pensions said the party was "very clear" opposing government plans to cut the limit from £26,000 to £23,000.
Mr Corbyn will be the fifth leader of the Workers' Party, faced by David Cameron over the last decade since his election as leader of the Conservatives.
The leader of the Workers' Party, which has promised a different approach to policy, says he has ideas "from the crowd" to questions for Mr Cameron and has received more than 30,000 proposals.
MP Islington North says the PMQ is too confrontational and that it will refrain from both the "post-finished response," and the ozzy trade, and instead promises to focus on important problems such as poverty, inequality and the challenges faced by young people.
Mr Corbyn claims that Angela Eagle, the shadow business secretary, will represent him at PMQ if he doesn't attend - such as, for example, when Mr Cameron travels abroad.
He also dropped the idea that he would let other colleagues out for him from time to time, as he was told that he had yet discussed the issue with the Speaker of the House by John Bercow.
When Mr Cameron became leader in 2005, he said he wanted to deflect from the style of politics "Punch and Judy," which was often associated with PMQ, but several years later he admitted he had failed.
Since its first broadcast in 1990, PMQ has been seen as a key barometer of the leaders "judgement, their leadership of the House and their stance among other MP, although critics have argued that they have become a caricature and there is a need for far-reaching reforms.
'Pictures in Joburg ': Young homeless trained as photographers
Downtown Johannesburg is a tough place to homelessness.
But one group of former children's streets found a way to learn and earn a living.
"I was photographed in Joburg" is a not-for-profit studio that teaches young homeless people how to make photos of their neighborhood and make money.
BBC News met one of the first graduates of this project.
How to share your stories, pictures and videos with BBC News.
Every day, BBC News on radio and online brings you the latest stories from across the globe... but we want to hear topics that relate to just you.
The role you play in reporting is very important.
Whether it is the latest report or other contributions on the topic, your contribution can make a big difference.
Have you seen or were you part of the event for the news?
Did something significant, bizarre or unusual happen in a place where you live?
Do you have a story you'd like to tell or do you think it's going to go on?
Are there topics you think the world should discuss?
Do you want to add your comment?
Or do you want to know what others are talking about?
Our terms for sending contributions to the BBC.
There are three different variations in sending your contributions:
Contact us Natwitz
We can use your contributions displayed on Twitter with your username on the BBC's output.
Send us a message on WhatsAppy
Send us a picture, video or message on our WhatsApp number + 44 7525 900971
In some cases, the BBC can also use your text or photo.
We'll publish your name as you provide it (if you don't ask us for secrecy), but we'll never release your personal mobile phone number.
You can send your photos and videos or SMS to 61124.
Or if you are out of the UK, send them to international phone number + 44 7624 800 100.
You can download BBC News on an iOS or Android device to send us photos using the apps in the application.
Email your stories and comments at haveyoursay @ bbc.co.uk
We will try to read all your emails, but given the number we get each day, it is not always possible to answer each individual.
Email your photos and videos to yourpics @ bbc.co.uk
If we use your material on BBC programs or online, we will also publish your name as you provide it (if you don't ask us for secrecy), but we will never release your personal email address.
You can also upload your videos or photos.
We'll publish your name as you provide it (if you don't ask us for secrecy).
Pound rises while wage growth in UK accelerates
The pound jumped the following data and showed a recovery of UK wage growth, while the FTSE 100 was conducted higher with SABMiller's bidding target.
Between May and June, GGB's profits, including bonuses, rose by 2.9% compared to the same period last year.
That was the fastest since 2009 and it looked like they were closing estimates when rates rose.
Sterling rose more than 1% against the dollar to $1.5505 and was 0.84% up against the euro to €1.3730.
The FTSE 100 index closed at 1.49% to 6,229.21.
SABMiller was an exceptional stock market player and jumped 20% after he received an approach from his rival AB InBev.
The deal would combine the two biggest breweries in the world, and approach brands such as Budweiser, Stella Artois, Peroni and Grolsch.
Burberry's stock was 0.9% higher after encouraging reports from rival group of luxury goods Richemont.
Richemont's recent sales results above all expectations and show that sales in China, a key market for Burberry, began to rise again.
Shares in Glencore rose 5% after the mining giant said it had climbed $2.5bn using shared positioning as part of a debt reduction strategy.
Shares in the ballots and paper group Mondi were the biggest fall in the index and fell 4.3%, after Goldman Sachs reduced its rating on the company to "sell."
JD Sports rose 3.1% after the sports firm reported an 83% jump in mid-year in profits before taxation of £46.6m
JD Sports says higher wages could hurt expansion
Executive chairman of JD Sports, Peter Cowgill, says a higher minimum wage for workers in the UK could mean "greater purchasing power in the pockets of potential consumers."
But it is unlikely that the purchasing power would outweigh higher wage costs in his company, he says.
Costs could hit plans to expand JD Sports, he added, which could mean fewer new jobs.
Opponents of the Prague landslide of the marchers cheer.
The controversial building has been given a stoppage.
Investor Praga Progetti e Investimenti considers the annulment of the decision to be unlawful and will be appealed against him.
There were also petitions against the building, which should be formed within the close proximity of the Aja monastery in the centre of Prague.
The Municipality held in the decision that there had been a breach of the building law, since all elements of the territorial decision had not been complied with.
"The territorial decision in question does not contain, for example, the type of land, distance from neighbouring buildings, sufficiently clearly and clearly explained in the shape of the building, the definition of the territory concerned by the construction," it read in its decision.
It also considers that some of the material elements for the decision were issued for the purpose of the present dossier, which, however, has changed.
It is, for example, an opinion of the environmental authorities.
Part of the construction is to be incurred on the grounds of the National Gallery, but the investor does not have its valid approval.
It is clear from the file material that, however, the owner of the land has only agreed to the design documentation for the territorial procedure, not consent to the placement of the building on its premises, the Department of Construction is writing.
According to Francesca Augusta, Razetta of the Department of Auditors, the Department of Auditors has not taken note of the decision of the superior authority - the Ministry of Regional Development, that the deadline for the initiation of the review has already expired.
In any case, it is a scandalous procedure.
"We have been preparing this project for seventeen years, we abide by all the laws of the Czech Republic and we respect all the authorities concerned and the institution," said Razetto in a press release.
The project, which people have dubbed the marsh, is a powerful emotion in Prague.
There were hundreds of people in the town centre in the past in protest against the building.
The association and residents of nearby houses are concerned that some permits were issued for a house many years ago, which should have looked different.
They also criticize the inadequacy of the building for the historical centre of Prague and the immediate neighborhood of Aja monastery.
The house was designed by architect Zdeněk Fránek, the project changed several times.
The original design of the 2008 project, which counted with a glass façade, declined on the grounds of the National Historic Institute (NPIs) Ministry of Culture and canceled permission for Prague memorials in 2010.
The new project of Praga Progetti e Investiments with windows to the shape of faces but NPIs as well as master memorabilia was approved, and on that basis a building permit was issued.
The author rejects the allegations of opponents, saying he never envisaged the façade in pink, which gave the project a nickname for pink-haired diabetes.
The Czech politician gave up the migrants.
The Hungarians have put him in jail too.
Berg went to Hungary to bring humanitarian aid to the refugees.
On the way, he took three Syrian refugees along with the crew, which they said they wanted to drive about a half-mile.
That's when he still wasn't criminal in Hungary, he told People's News.
We knew the law enforcement officers would not execute such acts.
But when officers stopped us, to our surprise they arrested us and taken into custody in Szeged, he described the paper.
In the end, the politician spent nine hours.
The policemen were said to have behaved properly, but bound the communications, as they did not have too good English.
The prison, however, was being trialled.
In our cell, for example, about three times by four metres, 15 refugees from Syria were weighing in on our cell.
Among them was a two-year-old boy or four-year-old girl.
These people had been locked up there for a second day, and no one knew about the language barrier, Berg said.
What mustn't he have?
Ask the president's execution chamber.
On Friday, 18.9, as of 9: 30, the question of readers is answered by the president of the execution chamber of the Czech Republic, Mgr. Pavel Fučíková.
You can ask her for changes to the Law Enforcement Order from 1 September 2015 to other items related to the executive, or executors.
Metcash launches a campaign in the countryside to fight the invasion of Aldi
Metcash is seeking to protect its IGA stores from the onslaught of Aldi in southern and Western Australia.
Metcash launches a campaign in the countryside to fight the invasion of Aldi
While Aldi is preparing to open two distribution centres and the first of more than 120 stores in south and west Australia at the start of next year, Metcash and IGA supermarkets reinforce relationships with local food suppliers and build a brand of IGA by marketing in the mainstream and social media and events like the Adelaide show.
IGA traders and suppliers are joining with brands such as at Dunsborough-based ice-cream maker Simmo's offering savers at IGA stores, and store owners sell discounted tickets to the Australian Football League to local customers.
Metcash is expected to release further details of its defence strategy on September 29, when the food, alcohol and hardware retailer will celebrate its annual investor's strategic day.
There is a great deal at stake because southern and Western Australia represent nearly 30 percent of Metcash IGA business action and generate a higher turnover than the Metcash IGA network in the eastern states.
Customers in south and west Australia are notoriously provincial, and business IGA is taking a much stronger market share than in NSW, Victoria and Queensland - more than 30 per cent in SA and 24 per cent in WA compared to around 14 per cent in the eastern states.
In any case, analysts such as Morgan Stanley believe Aldi will be polling at 5 percent of the food market in these two states during the 12 months since the opening of the first stores, which took sales from all existing players, but mainly independent retailers.
This week in his report, Morgan Stanley, Tom Kierath, estimated that the retail industry could lose $360 million on annual sales and Metcash $250 million at the end of 2016.
This forecast is based on the assumption that Aldi will open 25 stores in South Australia and 30 in the West over the next year, and will generate sales of $500 and $600 million in individual markets.
The loss of food sales and volumes at a fixed price basis Metcash could cost them around $13 million in pre-tax returns, Mr Kierath confirmed.
At the same time, Metcash is losing market share in the eastern states, mainly to Aldi and Coles, although the latest survey by Roy Morgan found that shoppers at IGA were most loyal.
Morgan Stanley thinks food sales Metcash will drop by 3.8 per cent in 2016, 4.1 per cent in 2017 and 2.1 per cent in 2018, and its market share will fall from 14 per cent in 2015 to 10.3 per cent by 2020.
Last week, fund manager Hamish Douglass, founder of financial group Magellan, said that trading lunches in Melbourne could "highly likely disappear within a decade.
Metcash declined to publicly respond to Douglas's comment.
But it is known that board member Metcash contacted Douglas last week.
The IGA market has dropped from 18 per cent to 14 per cent since 2010, and earnings from the food company Metcash, which delivers about 1200 retailers IGA, has fallen by 43 per cent since 2012, reflecting the operational development of the change in speculations, as sales and revenues are under pressure.
However, the wholesaler has switched to counter-attack and invest more than $150 million a year to settle pullback prices at Coles and Woolworths on hundreds of products each week and helps such retail trade IGA resupply stores by adding fast-growing food and novelty from privateers.
Executive director of Metcash, Ian Morrice, says that pricing and retrofit stores will catch the slew and hopes that wholesale returns will return to basic profit growth for the first time in 2017 for the first time in four years.
Thanasi Kokkinakis backed by President Tennis Australia's Steve Healy
Thanasi Kokkinakis deserves fame for his behaviour rather than criticism.
Thanasi Kokkinakis has become a side-loss at a recent fuss about his friend Nick Kyrgios, and deserves praise for his behaviour rather than criticism, says President Tennis Australia, Steve Healy.
Kokkinakis, a younger member of the talented duo, often called "Special Ks," drew unwelcome attention thanks to an affair with the notorious Kyrgios and Stan Wawrinka at the Montreal Masters.
Soon afterwards, in a heated qualifying match in Cincinnati, Kokkinakis and his rival Ryan Harrison had to be twice separated by the referee, Harrison then stated: "Wawrinka had one stretch to stretch Kyrgios and I should have stretched him too."
While he was last seen smashing a rocket after cramp got him beaten possible by Richard Gasquet at the US Open, Kokkinakis steadfastly defended Healy.
The youngster is currently in Glasgow, where he competes with Sam Groth on location in the second game behind Bernard Romic in the semi-finals of Davis Cup against Britain.
"I've been quite keen to think that, in my view, Thanasi was a little bit involved in the controversy," Healy says.
He destroyed a missile when he lost for a hamstring in the US, but he is not the first player to choose anger at his own in frustration, I know Thanasi well enough, and I can say he won't be proud of this event.
But he really controlled himself very well, because he was in the US under a very provocative circumstance because of Harrison and so on, so I think he deserves great credit.
He has a fantastic team around him, he also has a great family around him and I think he has been treated a bit hard.
He's a very grown-up 19-year-old man, he works very hard and into the team fits well and so forth, he's never had a problem with the other players, in the dressing room, he's very respected, he's in amazing shape, he's a very stable and mature young kid and I just think he deserves to be judged on his own merits.
Healy also backed the decision to overlook Kyrgios for an important game starting on Friday, saying that "mutual decision" is the right solution for all, but supports the hometown of Canberra to return to the team as a long-term stand-off.
"First of all we want our team to be absolutely focused on the game and not on all the controversy that around him [Kyrgios] was created," Healy says.
And I think Nick rose very quickly, as Federer, Murray and other people point out, in the eyes of the public is growing rapidly, he has also made some terrible mistakes and deserves all the criticism he's receiving, but we are trying to help him understand the consequences of his actions, and some time off the rankings, when he will be able to think about it, in my view, is the best solution for the team and also for him himself.
European migration crisis: Hungary declares emergency, closing borders and holding migrants
Following the announcement of the state of danger, Hungary on Tuesday closed its southern border with Serbia and detained those who attempted its illegal crossing to halt the influx of migrants.
There was chaos on the border, while hundreds of migrants accumulated in the country of no one, and Serbian authorities reacted with outrage.
Those caught on an unfamiliar time on strips of earth between two states stand by those fleeing violence in their native countries, building their tents and settling in.
But there comes a sense of frustration.
When a helicopter crashes over them, the migrants together call "Open the border!" And give a care unit to the Hungarian police force.
Some in protest refuse food and water.
The Serbian foreign minister claims it was "unacceptable" for the refugees to be shipped back from Hungary, while there are still more arriving from Macedonia and Greece.
(Serbia) wants to be part of the solution, and not just an indirect injury.
It will need to be discussed with Brussels and other countries during the next few days, "says Ivica Dacic in Prague.
The unrest on the Hungarian-Serbian border came a day after a block of 28 states did not come up with a single immigration policy at continuing meetings in Brussels.
Ministers agreed to share the responsibility for 40,000 people seeking protection in surprised Italy and Greece, and spoke with hopes of reaching an eventual deal next month or at the end of a year that would be accepted by the EU nations by more than 120 000 additional refugees, including Hungary.
German federal chancellor Angela Merkel and Austria on Tuesday called a special EU European summit next week to discuss the continental refugee crisis.
Hungary, however, has not denied its hopes of Brussels or its neighbors.
Tuesday's state of danger in the two southern regions gave the authorities more authority to address the crisis and allowed them to close roads and accelerate judicial cases of discussing asylum.
Meanwhile, Hungarian foreign minister Peter Szijjarto said his country also plans to build a barbed wire fence along the border with Romania to stop refugees seeking to cross their country when the fence is now complete with a fence on the Serbian border.
CBS News correspondent Charlie D'Agata reported that even the prisoners were on the list of those who helped stretch the barbed wire between Hungary and Serbia.
In recent months, Hungary has become the main weakness and entry point in the European Union for Refugees, many of whom have fled from Syrie and other Middle Eastern countries.
Prime Minister Viktor Orban, however, insisted that most of them are economic migrants who go for better life and not war refugees looking for protection, a look which is clearly different from other EU states, including Germany.
The new laws, which came into effect at midnight in Hungary, are now criminalizing a breach of a 4-foot fence that the government has allowed to build on the southern border with Serbia, and also provides for a longer jail term for those who illegally convert refugees.
"Thanks to the plight of the mass migration, the Hungarian government is wiping out the state of threat," said a spokesman for the government of Zoltan Kovacs in the southern city of Szeged.
This is clear: Illegal crossing is a crime.
Technically, parliament must still approve the deployment of the military expected next week, but reporters at the Associated Press on the border observed the heavily armed army with vehicles and dogs for days.
Gyorgy Bakondi, an adviser to Orban for the home defence, said the authorities caught 45 people who had tried to cross the border and 15 had been caught already in the country's territory.
They have entered through damage to the fence and are now in police custody charged with committing offences under new laws.
Authorities quickly kept the fence fixed.
The Hungarian authorities also closed two of the seven border crossings with Serbia on Tuesday morning after using a towed car covered with barbed wire.
There was chaos on the main border crossing at ROSZKE, as Hungarians opened up a tiny office in a metal container for processing and created a push for people.
About 20 went in, but thousands stayed out.
Another group of refugees were blocking the main highway linking Serbia and Hungary when they rejected food and water until they were allowed to cross the border into Hungary.
Election 2016: Head of Hillary Clinton ahead of Bernie Sanders reduced by half in national poll
Former Secretary of State Hillary Clinton is still holding a double-digit lead in the Democratic race for the nomination at the national level, but Senator Bernie Sanders is catching up to her head start.
Clinton now supports 47 percent of Democratic primary voters (a drop of 58 percent), while Sanders is in second place with 27 percent (an increase from 17 percent).
Vice President Joe Biden, who has yet to announce whether he will want to become president, is receiving support from 15 percent of Democratic primary voters.
More than five months before the launch of the main competition, the most Democratic voters claim it is too early to say that they are clearly the decision they will support the candidate.
But the Clinton donors are more sure of their choice than those who support other candidates.
Since CBS News last month, Clinton has lost ground beneath her feet in several demographic groups, while Sanders has gained several.
Clinton keeps a big leap between women and moderates, but her leadership is narrowing.
Her support among men has fallen significantly, and Sanders is losing only 5 points.
Clinton's advantage with democratic voters under 50 has evaporated, and now Sanders is equal.
But Clinton has still got big leadership thanks to older voters.
Last month, Clinton had a double-digit lead in front of Sanders among the Liberals, but now Sanders is losing only 5 points in that group.
About half of Democratic primary voters in entire states say she would enthusiastically support Clinton if she becomes a candidate.
A quarter would support her with some reservations and another 15 per cent would only support her for being a candidate.
Six percent wouldn't support her.
I guess it's no surprise that Clinton's contemporaries are especially inflamed by her.
Views are mixed among those currently unsupportive of Clinton - only about a quarter would enthusiastically support her.
While 48 percent of Democratic primary voters say they would enthusiastically support Clinton, fewer Republican voters say the same about their favourite, Donald Trump (35 percent).
When Clinton supporters are asked questions about why they want her as a candidate, the most common answer is that she has the right experience (16 percent), following that it is time for her to be president of a woman (13 percent), and that she is the best candidate for this job (10 percent).
Supporters of Clinton also mention her relationship with Bill Clinton (9 percent).
Next, it is cited by the big possibility of an election and a match on the issues.
While the vice-president is considering a potential candidacy for president, 57 percent of Democratic primary voters would want to do it - a third of whom think he shouldn't run.
When they were primary Democratic voters asked who they would select as a second choice for the party's nomination, the most common choice is Biden.
Among supporters of Clinton, she said more than half of Bidens as their second choice, far ahead of Sanders.
If Biden decides not to run for the Democratic nomination, Hillary Clinton's leadership will extend from 20 points when Biden will run, to 30 points without his candidacy.
Fifty-five percent of Democratic voters see Clinton as a candidate with the best chances of winning a general election; but that number dropped from 78 percent from last month.
Biden is far second to this scale, but the percentage of people who see him as the most likely vocal is increasing.
Nevertheless, when asked about the greater importance of a candidate, Democratic voters prefer solutions to greater chances of being elected.
Like last month, neither a Democratic candidate or potential candidate emerges as an unacceptable candidate for these primary voters.
Democratic candidates, or potential candidates, have good results in some key characteristics among their party's primary voters.
Most see Clinton, Sanders and Biden as sincere and trustworthy and think they have strong leadership qualities.
Biden of all three leads in honesty, while Clinton is a strong leader.
Thirty percent of Democratic primary voters don't think Clinton is honest and trustworthy, twice that much than those who say the same about Sanders (15 percent), but 27 percent don't have that opinion on him.
Primary Democratic voters also generally see that Clinton, Sanders, and Biden are in line with their ideological look.
As for all these metrics, about a quarter of Democratic voters have no opinion on Sanders.
As questions about Hillary Clinton's decision to use her personal email and the server as state secretary continue, most primary Democratic voters are satisfied with her explanation of this matter, saying it hasn't affected their overall view of her.
But among the American public, this is an overall different story.
Half of the Americans are now unhappy with her explanation, while only about a third are satisfied.
The public's views on the subject were split in March, shortly after the issue emerged.
Most Americans claim this email controversy has no bearing on their overall view of Clinton, while at 36 percent, their view on Clinton has worsened.
It comes mainly to Republicans, where more than 6 out of 10 say their views on Clinton have worsened.
Even though Clinton is perceived as honest and trustworthy among the voters of her party, the issue is still a problem among registered voters overall: Only 32 per cent see it as honest and trustworthy, which is a drop of eight points from last month, and by 15 points from May.
Sixty-two percent of registered voters don't think she's honest and trustworthy.
At the same time, 55 percent of registered voters across the country can also see Trump as honest and trustworthy.
But Clinton and Trump have good grades for leadership.
Of the six Test candidates, they were best led by Biden, Carson and Bush in fairness.
Sanders sees more people as honest than dishonest, but, as with Carson, plenty of voters didn't think of him.
The margin of error in the sample of 351 primary Democratic voters is 6 percentage points.
Ben Carson done behind Donald Trump in national elections
Ben Carson approaches Donald Trump in latest CBS News / New York Times poll
Two candidates are responsible for half the electorate in the latest survey, and others are left seeking support.
Voters from Republicans across the country continue to support Trump overwhelmingly, and they climbed from 23% of the support in the last CBS poll conducted before the Fox News debate last month, to 27% on Tuesday.
But Carson shot from 6 to 23% in the same period.
The survey also found that Carson is leading the charge across demographic groups, and eliminates Trump among university-educated Republican voters.
The rest of the field, with the exception of Carly Fiorina and the governor of Ohio John Kasich, is lagging behind along with Wisconsin Governor Scott Walker entirely on a willingness from 10% support fell to the present 2%.
Former governor of Florida Jeb Bush, former governor of Arkansas Mike Huckabee and Florida Senator Marco Rubio are all together in third place with 6%.
The margin of error in the sample of 376 Republican voters in the latest poll is a plus or minus 6% and held in September.
The latest CNN / ORC poll published last week showed that Carson has fared well and achieved 19% support among Republicans for Trump's 32% support.
The latest poll from ABC News / Washington Post also showed that Trump is significantly ahead of Carson.
On the rising trend, Carson decided to shoot blindly at a neurosurgeon on duty, and even Carson apologized for questioning about Trump's faith.
"We need energy," Trump declared last Saturday during a campaign in Iowa.
Five members of the fraternity accused of the death of a student in the first year of Baruch College
Nearly two years after a student died during the defection fraternity ritual in the Pocono Mountains in Pennsylvania, a charge of murder against five people has been filed.
Members of the fraternity of the New York Baruch College Pi Delta Psi brutally attacked Chuna "Michael" Deng during the start of the ceremony in September 2013, and delayed him to hospital, which contributed to his death, police reported.
The policemen said he had blindfolded, he was wearing a backpack filled with sand of a total weight of £30 and was repeatedly harassed when he tried to reach goal over the frozen field.
Mr Deng eventually complained of a headache and then fell unconscious.
Members of the Pi Delta Psi fraternity did not call 911 immediately after Deng fainted, and allegedly waited an hour before taking him to hospital, police say.
However, they found time to change Deng's dress, google his symptoms and contact Andy Menga, nationwide president of the fraternity, and ask him for advice, said police Chief Chris VAGNER at a news conference.
"At this point, members began to hide the equipment and essentially gave priority to the welfare of the fraternity before Michael Deng's life," said Chief Wagner.
He failed to revive him and died the next morning.
According to an autopsy report, Deng was repeated with blunt force trauma to the head, torso and thigh.
"Too many families have been devastated as a result of the overcrowding in the fraternity and at least one student is dying every year because of the overload since 1970," writes Douglas Fierberg, a lawyer representing Deng's family, in a statement.
The Brotherhood and their members must be accountable, and this step is important from the authorities.
A large panel of Monroe County has recommended a charge of third-degree murder for the first five members.
Thirty-two other members of the Brotherhood, including Mr. Menga, will also be charged with assault by overcharging and criminal conspiracy.
"We want to be detained not only by the involved, but in case there is an organization that approved it, whether officially or not officially, we will take them to accountability as well," Wagner said at a Tuesday press conference.
The Baruch College has banned the Brotherhood and the National Brotherhood has canceled its relationship with local affiliates.
This is the tents when the Fed raises interest rates
Growth rates will come and the bull market will fall, bond yields will rise, and the economy will slide into recession.
We know all this.
What we don't know is how long it takes and how long it takes.
For the economy, it specifically offers a history of the small originator about the timing.
The recession came after 11 months following the first increase in rates and lasted 86 months.
The Federal Reserve's aggressiveness in raising rates is often, although not always, decisive in how the economy and financial assets will react.
That's why US central banks have pointed out so strongly that investors should not be confused about when the rate hike starts, but rather the trajectory of how long it takes to normalize.
There are indeed more variables in the game.
However, in the end, members of the market can make sure all the fuss over speed increases can be exaggerated.
"The Fed's first increase since the global financial crisis will inevitably be some interpreted as an end to an era of cheap money," he said in a note to clients Julian Jessop, lead global economist at Capital Economics.
By contrast, we don't expect the gradual return of US interest rates to more common, but still low, create a seismic shock that many might fear.
That means there will be adverse effects.
Here's a look at how some areas of the economy will respond, based on historical trends:
Given what the market has seen in the last few months, the expected rate hike may make the air a little volatile.
But, once the increase occurs, the effect will not be so dramatic.
"There seems to be a trend for a resumption of shares after 12-24 months after the first increase, which again may reflect a lag in monetary policy," said Deutsche Bank analysts in a recent study of what happens after the Fed hike.
More specifically, the market for the last roughly 35 years is often the most - about 14 per cent - heading into an increase in rates in relatively flat in 250 days (average gains of 2.6 per cent), and then returning to normal after 500 days, with an average yield from the last six cycles of 14.4 per cent, according to a recent analysis of Bob Doll, chief equity strategist at Nuveen Asset Management, published on Barron.
Deutsche said the impact on stocks tends to become more prominent later in the rate hike cycle, and the return is beginning to decrease.
Recession is an economic life, but an increase in rates often helps.
At the moment, the Fed faces some conditions that are still not there, and which could precipitate a recession.
Most notable is that gross domestic product close to its lowest point in history in raising the Fed rate.
According to Deutsche Bank, it was only twice the nominal annual increase in GDP below 4.5 per cent during the 118 rate increase since 1950.
Even though it was 3.6 per cent in the second quarter of 2015, few expected its retention when it was at just 1.5 per cent in the third quarter, the Atlanta Fed said.
Raising rates in this complex economic background could be risky and could be raised by the question, "whether this time is different," Deutsche said.
Market participants were ready to grow the Fed for a year and all eyes turned to a meeting of the Federal Open Market Committee, which was held this week and ends on Thursday.
While many strategists and economists believe the FOMC would be able to approve an increase at this meeting, future trading indicates only a 25 per cent probability.
"In our study since 1950, all the increase cycles so far have been in a super cycle of increasing leverage with GDP covering the peaks of the beginning of the recession very quickly after the precipitous recovery," he writes in a report.
On the contrary, this was clearly a slow recovery since the worst recession in the sampling period.
The current cycle is by far the longest of those that the Fed has expected since the end of the last recession; the record has been 35 months, we are now at 74 months, and we are still continuing.
The fixed yield has also been volatile as the market expects an increase in rates, and the pattern is somewhat similar to what the stock is experiencing.
The key difference is that the impact is faster evident in bonds than in stocks when the Fed changes the direction of policy.
For bonds, yields appear to be changing direction immediately after the first arrival of the increase / reduction cycle.
At the end of the cycle, bond yields fall immediately, "Deutsche said.
Strategists Charles Schwaba believe that an increase in rates will cause returns between long-term and short-dated bonds, which will equal a curve.
High-yield bonds often work better in this climate, although "we are still cautious about straining the yield," said Kathy Jones, a fixed-income analyst at Schwab, in her analysis.
Interestingly, Jones thinks markets are already tailored to Fed expectations.
"In addition to the strength of the dollar and the decline in inflation expectations, there are few signs that the market has adjusted to the prospects of tighter monetary policy," she wrote.
Short-term interest rates are up, the yield curve is flat, the credit margin has expanded, and volatility has increased - all characteristics of the market when the Fed tightening policy.
In general, companies that conduct most of their business in the US will win interest rates after a boost, and local products become more attractive.
Multinationals with lots of debt will fare worse as the rising dollar will make their products more expensive in the world market and their debt will also be greater.
"History shows that the" quality "stock has a tendency to surpass over the course of three months following the initial rate increase," said analysts at Goldman Sachsve in a report for clients.
Companies with strong balance sheets overtook the weak balance-sheet companies in every interest-rate hike in 1994, 1999, 2004, averaging 5 percentage points.
Companies with high returns from capital, as well as stocks with low volatility, also outperformed their lower-quality counterparts on average by 4 (percentage points), or 3 (percentage points).
Debt is going to be a big problem.
Companies with a high percentage of mobile interest rates will lose the most, Goldman said.
Outside of purely stock games, consumers also benefit from a rising dollar.
Savers can see their profits also through higher yields, but experts have different views on how long it takes.
BBC Radio 3 is a copy of Classic FM, claims MEP Andrew Bingham
Conservative MP Andrew Bingham has criticised this station for 'deafing'
She takes the view that she is becoming increasingly indistinguishable from her commercial rival
He also focused on the BBC Music Awards and says they just cheat the Brits
Retired colleague Damien Collins attacked Hlas and says neither is he an original idea
BBC Radio 3 is "changing" in Classic FM, claiming the leading MP and piling fresh pressure on the broadcasts to show that they are doing something that commercial broadcasts do not make.
Conservative MP Andrew Bingham also told the BBC bosses that a public service radio station appeared to be "deafening" and is increasingly indistinguishable from its business rival.
"Radio 3 seems to be - I don't like to use the word" deafness "- but it seems to be turning into Classic FM," he said.
He also focused on the BBC Music Awards, launched in December last year.
The BBC Music Awards, which began last year, seem to be Brits under another name.
So if you're trying to do something different - there are two examples of me attacking when you're actually just mimicking what we already have on the market, "Mr Bingham said.
The BBC's director-general denied the allegations on the grounds that BBC Radio 3 was far ahead of its trade rival in terms of live music and education to the public.
What I learned about classical music on Radiu 3 I wouldn't have learned on any other radio.
And their commitment to live music and make music is actually at a top level.
"I also think that the commitment of Radia 3 to find new music and putting in new works into operation is also very important," he says.
Earlier this year, BBC Councilman 3 Alan Davey argued that it was now necessary to work harder to engage with the audience than before, because Britons are less educated in terms of classical music.
However, Radio 3 was not the only element of the BBC's production, which came under fire for stepping on the heels of a commercial competitor during the broadcast of Culture, Media and Sporting, and got at the commission's hearing.
Conservative MP Damien Collins attacked The Voice - a music talent show the BBC bought from Dutch producer Talpa Media at an estimated worth of £22 million.
Do you see why it is discussed as a non-original and not especially different about this programme?
Lord Hall insisted that show BBC1 - in which September stars Paloma Faith ABoy George as judges - was produced "in a manner typical for the BBC."
He added that he wanted Corporatism to "find a hit from his own stable" when he next starred in the entertainment series.
However, he has refused to rule out ordering more future series of The Voice or spending taxpayers' royalties on other formats of entertainment.
Internet sales are growing at the slowest pace since August and the blame may be Black Friday
The first three months of 2015 recorded a 7% increase in online sales
Last month there was the lowest growth since 2000 began the records themselves
Internet sales were boosted three years ago by mobile shopping
Experts believe November Black Friday could be the reason for braking spending
For more than a decade, virtual shopping has been on the rise, and thanks to it, it has become a ghost town from many of Britain's main streets.
But experts say there are signs of settling online sales, and new data shows a 7 per cent increase in the first three months of 2015.
Total spending on August was the lowest increase in growth since 2000, with an increase of just 5%, compared to last year.
Experts say there are signs of steady online sales, and new data shows a 7 per cent increase in the first three months of 2015.
"If you look at the level of growth in the past few years and you go back to 2000, always the given time has been rationalised," she says to Guardian Andy Mulcahy, editor of the IMRG sales index.
He explains that internet sales were strengthened three years ago when customers started using their mobile phones for carrying out purchases.
It meant people were able to shop online and that they were able to carry out purchases in different contexts, such as on the sofa.
But now (growth) has been somewhat stagnating, so it seems to be going away.
The Black Friday phenomenon, which has been switched from America, is cited as one reason for the decline in sales.
Experts believe customers might keep purchases ahead of this event, which takes place last Friday in November.
Last year, five times more than the average of shoppers turned to their computers to make purchases, matching several websites of vendors.
Experts believe Black Friday, thanks to which shoppers are bargaining again, can hold back customers from further purchases
Research published by the British Retail Consortium found that just £1 from every £5 was spent online.
For some products, such as television and washing machines, more than a third of sales have taken place via web shops.
At the same time, more than a quarter of people buy clothes and shoes online, instead of shopping in stone fashion stores.
Muslims buried victims of the collapse of a crane in Mecca and the family of Bin Laden were sanctioned
The bodies of 29 dead were brought to the streets by Muslims in the execution of the first funeral in Mecca
Saudi Arabia is partly blamed for the collapse of construction magnate Saudi Binladin Group.
The Department of Health said a total of 394 people were also injured after the crane crashed
Hundreds of Muslims have gathered to bury 29 victims of the collapse of a crane in Grand mosque in Mecca. The bodies of the victims were carried along the street.
Dressed to some extent in white, mourners picked the path and gave up their respect for the victims when the first of the fallen was on their final journey to the cemetery in Al-Moais.
The sad message passed around the holy site, where just a few days earlier, a construction crane ploughed through the ceiling of the mosque and toppled to believers.
The bodies were released for the funeral, and the Saudi king was sanctioned by building a group of bin Laden's family over the disaster, which also left 394 injured.
The bodies of 29 dead after a crane crash in Grand Central Mosque in Mecca were carried out by streets
Among the dead was the father of four children of Qasim Akram from Bolton, Greater Machester, who was on his first pilgrimage when the crane crashed.
Mr. Akram was in Grand Mosque with his parents before the launch of Hadge's annual pilgrimage.
Saudi officials have already promised that Haddock to Mecca will be held and thousands of people continue to descend into the city.
King Salman said today that Binadin Group should not have kept the shoulder of the crane on top when he was not in operation.
The Arab version of the Order, made by the state-run Saudi Press Agency, states that the Binladin Group is partly to blame for the fall.
The English service agency did not report this detail, but said the company's bosses had been banned from travelling abroad.
Early this week, Salman promised to reveal what caused a crane to fall into the courtyard of the Great Mosque, where hundreds of thousands of Muslims cowered before the execution of Hadi later this month.
The Binladin Group did not issue any statement about the collapse of the crane and were not given any comment by its representatives for comment.
The Royal Order also accused the group of not using the latest security measures, and a lack of coordination with meteorological officials.
Dozens of cranes surround the Grand Mosque in Mecca, which is part of a massive construction effort headed by the Binladin Group.
Binladino's family have been in the vicinity of Saudi Arabia's ruling family for decades and run major construction projects.
The late leader of Al Qaeda's Osama bin Laden was the son of a renegade whom the family renounced in the 1990s.
The crash occurred in the midst of a strong wind and rain just a few days before the dorking of millions of people in the kingdom at a pilgrimage must, at least once in his life, have completed every skilful Muslim.
Officials say 158 people still remain in hospital.
Officials determined that there would be one million riyals (£174,000) dedicated to relatives killed, and the same amount for permanently injured.
The other injuries will receive half that amount.
B & Q chief says traders of Eastern Europe working at the left-back
Britons increasingly employed by artisans, says Veronique Laury
The number of skilled traders in Eastern Europe is behind the growth point
The result is an open 200 Screwfix store aimed at traders
At the same time, Kingfisher is closing 60 B & Q outfits across the country
Compiled by Rupert Steiner, chief correspondent for the Daily Mail
The British said they would swap the hammer and brushes and pass them to the employed educated East European artisans to work at their home
If you're going with a hammer or a little paintbrush, it seems like you're in the minority today.
Because the British are increasingly employed by artisans to carry out the crossbench work at their home, according to the company's chief executive at Screwfix B & Q.
Veronique Laury, the new chief executive of Kingfisher, which owns the domestic needs chain, says a large increase in the number of skilled traders from the Eastern Europe offering services at the lowest possible prices is no longer a trend.
As a result, Kingfisher plans to open 200 more Screwfix stores aimed at businessmen, and closes 60 B & Q outfits.
Ms Laury claims she wants to employ more women in B & Q stores, as eight out of 10 shopping decisions in the shop do better half.
Currently, most male workers are.
She said there was a need to address increasing demographic trends that depicted more female households making more domestic adjustments than in the past.
Ms Laury says: "We still work mostly men in shops.
We need to approach the balance.
Basically, half of our customers are women who make 80% of decisions on merchandise purchases.
Women play a big role in the decision-making process.
Ms Laury, who is one of only five women at the helm of leading companies under Britain's FTSE100, has also restructured her top team to reflect the equivalence between directors and women.
Kingfisher stands almost alone in having half the representation of women among employees including the executive and finance director.
Ms Laury claims: "It was a conscious decision - diversity is an important issue here.
So it wasn't difficult to find good women we would take to us.
Kingfisher announced a fall in profit in mid-year and sales after the group took on the cost of closing stores.
The result of a trend in Kingfisher, which owns Screwfix and B & Q, is to open 200 new stores
The $600-a-year pension is in danger.
"It's a justice of equal stomachs, it has nothing to do with human justice," said Vice-President TOP 09 Miroslav Kalousek, who emphasized the principle of merit.
The chairman of the MEP Zbyněk Stanjura noted that the one-time contribution sounds fine, but in the long term it would be better to be in standard indexation because it would be reflected in the next few years.
"We have room to find the mechanism we can arrange," said Stanjura.
He supported Secretary Michael Marks's initial proposal, according to which it was scheduled to roll over the law next year.
Marks defended the subsidy by arguing that the better social situation of a pensioner was not pink.
Higher indexation next year would mean a budget impact of $5.5 billion, and ministers are debating every hundreds of millions.
Prime Minister Bohuslav Sobotka (ČSSD) told the right that in the past the rate of indexation had decreased.
Rapporteur Miroslav Opwar (KSČM) pointed out that the proposal does not address cuts in real pensions in 2016 and later.
The veto of the right's payout in December will significantly complicate and possibly prevent it, he said.
The chairman of the House of Representatives, Roman Greenbelt, has therefore proposed a reduction in the time limit for the committee's deliberations for ten or 20 days, even as the right has been blocked.
But the committee will have a month instead of the usual two.
The bonus should cost a total of £1.73 billion.
The money is mainly to go from the Department of Work and Social Affairs budget.
In the coming year, pensions should be averaging about a century on average.
The allowance should be given by the pension newspaper people who will be eligible for a pension or part of it in December.
Even those who died in December would be able to obtain a pension before it was paid.
However, they would have to ask in writing, by the end of next year at the latest.
Pensions were rolling regularly for January in the Czech Republic, about price rises and a third of real wage growth.
This year it equates to a 41.5 per cent gross wage, which should be 40.5 per cent next year.
The state spent $314.7 billion by the state last year, which was roughly $5 billion year-on-year.
Retirement spending accounted for 26 percent of all budget spending and 46 percent of all expenditure mandatory from the law.
The average full retirement pension last year rose by 104 to 10.714 ¢, according to figures in the government's final account.
The Czech Social Security Administration secured a payout of 2.4 million full retirement pensions and roughly 17,000 proportional pensions.
Jakunin has abandoned plans for a political career, he will devote himself to science.
The Senate seat was almost certain of a billionaire, according to Russian media.
In the Federation Council, he was to represent the Western-Russian Kaliningrad Region, whose governors, Nikolai Cukanov, as the party's candidate for United Russia, defended his post in Sunday's elections.
According to Russian law, senators don't elect citizens, but it selects them from a trio of candidates whose names they will announce before the gubernatorial elections.
After the election, he will then select the senator from a trio of candidates.
The complication was for Jakunina's fact that he had not lived in the Kaliningrad area for twenty years, as required by law.
For Jakunina, the Kremlin has found an exception to being a special and empowered ambassador to which the legal requirement of a long-term residence does not apply.
It ended filming the Czech comedy Theory of the Tiger.
The last straw in the resolution of the main hero is the voluntary death of his father-in-law, who have run out of strength and patience.
Grandmother-Iva Janchurova has decided on grandfather's life, age as well as a funeral.
John is clear that he is with his wife Olga - Ace Balzer on a similar path.
He remembers that once he had his own will and dreams, he wanted to live again with dignity and freedom.
He is eager to regain control of his life - and as a solution, he will choose an escape from the so-far, he said to the story of Nightingale.
Bajgar wanted a comedy in the form of capturing a certain type of relationship in which one of the partners doesn't feel quite free.
From the start, he said, it was clear that the main role would be to Bartholomew, whom he had already collaborated on on The Unseen.
Yet he said the actor, who appeared in front of the camera after a lengthy break coupled with a constancy after a serious illness, surprised.
We talked to each other three years ago.
I gave him a read-out script and he said he likes how sad he is.
And he surprised me that he seemed to be a round-eyed sportsman.
Before the shooting, he always asked himself where he was going to sit.
This time he was riding his bike, climbing the rocks and even going downhill.
And that's all in record tropical highs, the director noted.
According to Bartholomew, women take a tiger to make a rabbit out of it over time.
They feed him a little bit of food, but he's going to lock the door so he doesn't think to play it outside of a rabbit house on a tiger.
And that's what we're trying to tell our film, commenting on the actor.
His wife, who may act slightly negatively on viewers, has portrayed Efox Balzer.
She's not just a negative figure.
She's also pleasant, intelligent, empathetic, and she means well.
But at the same time, he's an usurper, and he wants to take care of his husband to death, Bajgar said.
The film parallels the lives of John's married daughters Oline and Alice - Tanya Vilhelm and Pavel Beret - and of Erik and Peep - Jiří Havelka and Jakub Kotah.
The film producer is Peter Erben of Logline Production, a co-producer of Czech television and Radio and Televizia Slovakia.
Google has promised millions of dollars to help refugees in Europe.
The US internet company has promised Google to provide another up to $5.5 million ($132.6 million) to organizations that help thousands of refugees flow to Europe.
It was announced on Tuesday by Google.org, which is a charitable oddity of this Internet company.
Azerbaijan has set off Teliq's part in a visit for criticism of human rights abuses.
A Czech MEP for the European Parliament, Paul Telic, postponed the forthcoming Thursday trip to Baku, as the country's Azerbaijani authorities canceled the official part of the visit today.
Baku explains it, according to Telics, a resolution EP from last week that criticizes human rights abuses in Azerbaijan and has been co-authored by Telic.
The decision by the Azerbaijani party of Telika has lost the possibility of talks with official partners, as well as a visit to the political prisoners, which depends on the approval of authorities, explained in a press release from his Brussels office.
The trip, which was planned months in advance, wanted Telik to be used to meet the leaders of parliament and representatives of the executive as well as representatives of democratic opposition, dissidents and political prisoners, a text sent to TTK said.
The EP condemns "unprecedented repression against civil society in Azerbaijan."
She called on European leaders to consider sanctions against all politicians, officials and judges involved in political persecution.
The resolution was approved shortly after the recent ruling over Azerbaijan's opposition journalist Chadian Ismaila, who has campaigned to expose corruption in government circles.
Russia does not rule out building its air base in Syria.
Bogdanovsky did not rule out visiting Novosibirsk that in the future, the Russian air base in Syria will emerge.
We don't have such plans yet.
Nothing's out of the ordinary, he said.
Russia is in Syria already at the port of Tartus, which it has still used as a service and logistics center.
But according to reports of the Russian press, since the start of August, the supply of Russian weaponry and military material to Syria has risen.
According to Moscow, it's arms shipments resulting from valid trade agreements.
The Pentagon says the Russians intend to set up an air base at the city of Latakia, which for now remains the bastion of Syrian President Bashar al-Assad.
Washington, however, is not entirely clear about the specific military intentions in Russia in Syria, US commentators agree.
US Secretary of State John Kerry discussed the situation in Syria on Tuesday with Russian colleague Sergei Lavrov, it was already their third phone conversation in the last ten days.
Next week, Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu will go to Moscow to convey concern about the gathering of Russia's arsenal in the vicinity of Israel.
White House spokesman Josh Earnest has called the support of ASADA from Moscow for a lost bet.
On Russia's policy objectives in Syria, he said, they were more vague.
Moscow has made it from Syria to its satellite.
It can mean that President Vladimir Putin is pursuing a long-term goal, but what, according to Earnest, it is not entirely clear.
According to today's speculation, the war in Syria is to be the main issue in Putin's speech at the forthcoming United Nations General Assembly in New York.
The Russian leader, on the other hand, is told not to talk about the situation in Ukraine.
According to today's report, The New York Times does not rule out President Barack Obama with the Russian president during a UN meeting.
But opinions among White House aides are said to be diverting so far.
TASS's announcement today with a recall to the words of Kremlin spokesman Dmitry Peskov has written that Putin has not yet had a deal on his New York City meeting.
Seed oil on in a yellowish diet, hemp helps strengthen immunity.
A good way to increase the intake of beneficial unsaturated fatty acids from these foibles is the use of extra virgin oils.
When pressed from the cold seeds, all healthy substances will remain in the oil.
Therefore, these oils are suitable even as part of health diets, such as gallstones.
Some extra virgin oils are suitable for preventing cardiovascular disease.
They are, according to the Institute of Health Information and Statistics, for several years the most common cause of Czechs "deaths.
Gallbladder inflammation is mainly caused by women, helping sesame oil.
If you are among the Asian cuisine lovers, you must not miss the sesame oil in your pantry, which is part of the original recipe for exotic foods.
Unlike most other oils, it can also be used for heat treatment and has a range of favourable health effects.
It is often used in bile diets.
The essential fatty acids it contains are good preventable diseases.
These are 90% cause of bile inflammation, and women suffer from these difficulties three times more often than men.
In general, the problems with gallstones relate especially to overweight people who do not sport and consume a lot of animal fats.
Sesame oil can also be used with success in liver diets, which is very similar to that gall bladder.
If people want to use all the health benefits they bring to the consumption of this oil, they should be wary of merchandise from the exotic grocery stores.
Manufacturers from Asia are often used to pressing the converted seeds, which have a sharper flavour.
But oil will lose all active substances, said Ladislaus Hachev, executive director from Czech company Bohemia Olé from Kraslic on Sokolovsk, which produces bio-virgin oil-pressed.
The company is also making sesame oil and using exclusively unroasted seeds of white seeds.
In an hour, he'il be able to make an 8 kg of sesame.
By mechanical pressing, the raw material will heat up to a maximum of 40 degrees and therefore the product meets the criteria for the label of an extra virgin.
At higher temperatures there would be a loss of nutrition.
Sunflower oil thrives on diseased hearts and arteries.
The Czech favourite among oils is sunflower.
From the Jarm Hamerski research, which led to Masaryk University, 43% of respondents preferred him to a hot kitchen.
However, he is not fit for frying, at 180 ° C, he's beginning to burn.
Better to use it, for example, to catch salads and throw especially in a diet in which it helps to prevent cardiovascular disease.
It contains a high proportion of omega-6 unsaturated fatty acids that lower cholesterol levels from all fatty acids.
On heart problems, you need to be careful about the amount of overall intake fat and calories.
For example, in one spoonful of sunflower oil is 62 calories, in a spoonful of rapeseed oil is 99 calories.
As for the energy value of food, it is important to realise that natural foods are much more appropriate than the so-called empty calories.
These are part of an industrial-engineered product.
That's why it's appropriate to reach out for extra dolls.
The sunflower lasts as much as the sesame and hemp nine months.
Storage in the fridge will lengthen the durability.
Old oil, in particular, is recognized in bitter taste.
On the contrary, he was not glowing at the bottom.
It's a sign that the substance was not chemically refined.
Hemp oil contains the most healthy acids.
The seeds of technical hemp are among the so-called superfoods, and therefore hemp oil is believed to be the healthiest of vegetable oils.
For this, it owes the highest content of omega 3 and omega-6 unsaturated fatty acids.
These essential fatty acids can't make the body itself, and you have to accept them from food.
The intake of omega-3 fatty acids is particularly important.
A study of scientists published in the European Journal of Clinical Nutrition proved that the daily intake of this substance is inadequate.
The men in France and Greece will consume it by 0.6 gram, and the Icelanders will accept 2.5 grams.
The recommended daily dose is 1 to 4 grams.
Hemp oil is suitable to be included in the diet as part of a supportive diet to boost immunity and heal injuries.
It has anti-inflammatory effects and is essential to the cell membrane.
People don't need to worry about the use of hemp oil, it doesn't contain any psychoactive substances.
The fact that he found his way to the consumer is confirmed by the fact that in Bohemia Olé is one of the highest selling.
500 grand a year will be sold.
People often use one spoon of fasting after the wound.
Hemp oil is not hugely significant, but great boost immunity, counselling Daniel Wolf from Kraut Companies Bohemia Oet.
According to the statistics, the most passionate nation of Grillers is Americans.
There's 1.4 grills for one household.
Throughout the world, there are all sorts of contests in grilling that only confirm the success of this culinary discipline.
Not even the Czechs are behind.
Based on the consumer surveys of the English market, we find that only 4% of people in their lives have not been grilled.
The vast majority are then grilled several times a year.
To make the grilling successful, we must not underestimate the preparation - the ideal is to trim the meat by marinating a few hours before the heat treatment.
Which oil is the best thing to do while at the barbecue leaving the health of a beneficial substance?
In general, the grilling itself should be investigated in fat.
Experts agree that much of the oils begin to lose their appetite at high temperatures.
Healthy extra virgin oil also comes about the body of beneficial substances that we otherwise gain from eating the oils from the dishes adjusted at lower temperatures.
But it doesn't mean extra virgin oils won't find their applications in grilling.
Grape oil for barbecue, health and beauty.
When the meat is told, experts from Bohemia Oli from Kraslic on Sokolovsk will immediately recall grape oil.
Amazingly, it complements the appetite of the masses and the fish.
The kitchen features a unique characteristic of raising the natural taste of food.
It is also suitable for frying and grilling because it has a high degree of combustion, up to 216 ° C.
Even at such a high temperature, as one of the few oils kept to the health of a beneficial substance, it describes the benefits of the grape oil Daniel Wolf of Bohemia Olé, which is one of the few other oil producers of this oil-based oil.
Experts agree that grape oil is 50 times more effective than vitamin E and 20 times more effective than vitamin C.
Furthermore, it contains high levels of linoleic acid and is therefore effective in combating excess cholesterol.
In grape oil, it also accepts our body of important unsaturated fatty acids, vitamins and minerals.
Thanks to the positive content of these substances, it helps lower high blood pressure, increases metabolism and has positive effect on the kidneys.
By eating grape oil we also help increase our external beauty - it improves the elasticity of the skin, using acne and assists when caring for dry and broken hair.
The chef has praised the use of grape oil in the kitchen.
It is not only suitable for cold dishes, such as salads, for example, but also for heating dishes.
The grilling can be used in two ways, at the marinating and the grill itself.
By marinating meat and fish, we preserve their succour.
Three components must be present when preparing the marinade: Oil, acidity and spices.
The acidity will be delivered by apple vinegar for example, and we can make the meat.
The spices feed the taste and oil preserve and deliver the right thinness, advises Daniel Wolf.
At the same time, he adds that grape oil is ideal for marinating directly because as one of the few oils it can pass through dark meat.
So the marinated meat or fish are ready to be grilled, how do you proceed?
Extra virgin oils are characterised by just a few drops to prepare the dish.
The same is true for grilling.
Some oils are utterly taboo for this way of preparing.
This applies in particular to flax, hemp and rapeseed oils, which should not be heated at all.
Before barbecuing you rub oil, you'll prevent eating the food.
The preparation of the annexes is also an essential part of the grilling.
There's virtually anything to the grilled meat and fish - grilled vegetables, roasted bread, light vegetable salad, and many more.
The chefs from the Bohemia Olé recommend, for example, the Hot Summer salad.
For him you need: • 1 ks of peaches • 1 volume rucks • 1 cup sliced cucumbers • 1 cup mixture of salad leaves • 3 tablespoons grape oil
To the salad bowl, add to the mixture of salad leaves of shredded rucola, sliced cucumbers and on large cubes sliced peaches.
Depending on the flavor of the salt and pepper, you can also taste minced chilli and soy sauce.
At the end, pocket a few drops of grape oil.
For an extra flavour, you can sprinkle the salad with finely sliced almonds.
Multiple sclerosis: Not only of medication, but also to fight the patient.
Multiple sclerosis is a complicated disease, and a person with this diagnosis needs the care of a range of experts: A neurologist, a physiotherapist, an ergoterapeut, a urologist, an ophthalmologist, a psychologist, a psychiatrist, and many other specialists.
However, it is not just about treatment, such as women with multiple sclerosis, for example, if they choose to have a child, the care of these sick is also socialite counselling, recommendations for housing, etc.
Yet all of this is not enough: The development of the disease can significantly affect the patient itself.
The more he actively struggles with the disease, the longer he can work and he doesn't have to fundamentally change the style of his life.
As doctors point out, the passivity of patients releases room for disease activity.
For example, it has been shown that regular movement has significantly delayed a time when a sick man needs a compensatory device, such as a cane.
Importantly, patients and their surroundings are not subject to different myths, for example, that the disease is automatically leading them to end up in a trolley.
That's why the site was given a chance by (www.bezmytu.cz), which is backed by an ongoing media campaign Give yourself a chance.
The most important person in the care of sick with multiple sclerosis is a neurologist.
For multiple sclerosis, he pays twice saying that the disease can start to be treated sooner, the more likely the doctor may affect something.
This is because we have medication for multiple sclerosis in an inflammatory stage, when yet the neurodegeneration process is still not so strong.
The sooner we intervene, the greater the hope that we will be able to stop the disease and delay disability, explains Dr. Eva Medova of the Neurological Clinic General Hospital in Prague.
It is very important for people with multiple sclerosis rehabilitation care, which is most likely to resolve weakening lower limbs or balance disorder.
With the sick, he works by their individual needs: To maintain the condition, improve the walk, strengthen the pelvic floor, reduce swallowing disorders, or improve coordination.
"It's really an individual, depending on the particular difficulty of the patient," says Dr. Martin Kovári, Mayor of Clinics rehabilitation and custody medicine at the University Hospital in Motola.
People with multiple sclerosis suffer the same disease, but it is shown in a different way with each other.
Rehabilitation can't stop the disease, but it can always mitigate its symptoms.
However, motion activity also strengthens the body's immune state, which is desirable in the case of multiple sclerosis.
The other positives of regular exercise are the fact that the sick have verified what they can do, and it strengthens their self-confidence.
"The exercise is also washed out by endorphins and you feel good about it," said PhDr. Kamila kelp from Clinique of Rehabilitation Medicine at the Royal Vinohrady Hospital.
By influencing the physical side, we operate on the limbic system responsible for emotion.
We are directly interfering with the psyche and immune processes, and we stabilize the disease, he adds.
"Previously, these patients were so-called saving, today we know they need a targeted burden," says Prof. PaedDr Paul Kolar, a senior Clinic of Rehabilitation and Mining Medicine at the University Hospital in Motola.
The purpose of physiotherapy is that you can remain self-sufficient for as long as possible, including working assignment.
Thus, physiotherapists co-operate with ergoterias, so that each man can have a compensatory device tailored to him for peace.
Many patients also need care for a psychologist or psychiatrist.
They're in a tough situation.
When a serious illness comes into your life, most people are shaken up.
They experience shock, panic, fear.
They have to respond to a big burden - a loss of health.
With such a sore soul, we're supposed to go after someone, not try to abduct everything on your own shoulders.
"I work with them so that they ultimately conclude that even with a handicap, it can be a full-fledged life, and that multiple sclerosis does not mean the end of life," says psychotherapist Renata Malina-Schubert of the Neurological Clinic General Hospital in Prague.
Without the Prague producer Latecoere, the Airbus would not be flying.
Air production is synonymous with accuracy and advanced technologies.
The new planes are full of titanium or lightweight and solid composite materials that can't be made and processed immediately.
Yet, alongside the super-precise, computer-driven machine tools, alongside the autocrats for shapeshifting composites, you might encounter something as common as the apricot pecans.
In a drum that resembles a cup of cotton candy, in a pile of pews, the edges of the tin pieces have just come out of the milling machine.
"No one better yet," smiles Ivan Dubsky, CEO of the airline door manufacturer Latecoer Czech Republic.
In a compound in Prague Airlines, an earlier flight makes a complete door for the Airbus A320.
As the only ones in the world, they supply doors for Brazilian Embraer 170.
The door, the part of which is being assembled in Prague, also enters the first and upper classes on the upper decks of the world's largest airliner, the Airbus A380.
There is also a door full of composites for the new Boeing 787 Dreamliner.
Accuracy is the main motto here.
Perhaps the moment the key leaves the company to adjust twice a year.
If the yellow label was missing a record check, they would have to explain to auditors from Airbus or Boeing, who travel regularly to find out if the doors are produced according to the agreed rules.
The human senses, however, have not completely replaced the advanced technique.
There's 1,500 rivets on one of the doors to the A320.
They have to hand the riveters by hand.
It takes them two days.
Even by the sound of the hammer, they'll see if the rigging is now properly broken.
The tolerance in which they are moving is minimal.
The rivet can rise above the plane from zero to 0.13 millimeters.
That's roughly twice the thickness of human hair.
In control, he will come to a range of trained hinterland.
When a supervisor runs his finger along a series of rivets, he'll know if any of them are out of tolerance.
Then he'll take the exact conditioner to the hand.
The flight was carried out before 1989 by the program of a training military aircraft, L-39.
But he didn't make one again in 1991.
The company had to find new orders quickly.
It was then put together with a European aircraft manufacturer of Airbus.
She won the competition for emergency doors supplier for model A321.
The courtship with Boeing was not so happy.
"We were a small firm for them at the time, which didn't have enough money for investment and for Boeing to guarantee long-term stable deliveries," Dubsky recalls.
The door to the American manufacturer would remain shut-out if Letov did not take orders from the French group Latecoere in 1999.
I talked about our co-operation with the Airbus.
The second day of negotiations with the French, Dubský says.
A year later, Latecoer bought the Czech company and with strong companies came new contracts.
In 2000, she started assembling parts of the door for the A320.
Three years later there were the doors of the upper deck for the A380.
In 2006, the company set up a new halve for processing composites for deliveries for the Boeing Dreamliner.
Without Latecoer, we wouldn't be able to get to these great contracts.
Maybe we would do parts or small parts.
Partners want guarantees of supply for twenty or thirty years, Dubský explains.
Last year, Czech Latecoere achieved a turnaround of over $2.9 billion and profits after tax of 147 million crowns.
The exclusive status among suppliers of aircraft manufacturers is not free.
Latecoere has invested £1.5 billion in Prague since 2000.
The company must have certificates of quality, certification of 170 specific manufacturing processes and ID cards for key employees.
Without them, the business would not produce any aircraft door.
Getting certificates that manufacturing processes comply with customers "demands, and in repeated inspections, keep them standing by Dubsky's millions.
Manufacturing processes change each year.
They are more precise and stricter.
We have to entice employees, retrofit the device and re-certify the process, Dubsky adds.
Now, the company is completing the preparation of a process for coating zinc and nickel to replace the past for human health harmful cadmium.
They received the award from the manufacturer, but then had to adapt the technology to the equipment or chemicals they use in Prague.
The people of Boeing will come, they will examine the concept of the whole line.
Then we show them the production.
They'll check our lab.
One set of samples is tested themselves in their own lab, and then the results compare with ours, closing the Dubai way that customers control them.
The reward is the Prague firm's long-term exclusive contracts.
With the Prague race today it stands and falls production of Singaporeans.
For the A320, it makes half of the total volume of the door.
Replacing the Czech Latecoere is either impossible or very difficult for a Brazilian or European producer.
It does not mean, however, that he could say any award at the door.
Part of the contract is the price curve.
It indicates how many doors will cost after ten, fifty, hundred made of pieces.
The price is still dropping to a certain limit.
We have to enter this price pattern.
If not, we will lose, says Dubsky.
Half of the hall, where they complete the electrical cabinets for the Airbus A400 M military aircraft, is yet empty.
But he is the symbol of the future.
Behind the apron, a new semi-robotic line is built on riveting and mounted doors for an upgraded A320 Neo model.
No, no, no, no, no.
"That's a trend that mounting in aviation is going," Dubsky adds.
The future line is secure.
Airbus reports that airlines have so far ordered 3278 pieces of the new A320.
Just a few metres away, there will be a line for a complete assembly of doors for the upper deck of the A380.
It's a strategic decision by our parent company.
The aim is to shorten the production time and reduce costs.
The full assembly could begin within two years, says Dubsky.
Before then, the company must undergo a qualification test for the assembly of some electrical and electronic equipment into the door for the biggest Airbus.
The company is also betting on further development of production from composite materials.
In addition to Boeing, it should also be involved in the new Airbus A350, which will compete with the US Dreamliner.
"It's a huge credit for the company when he can both process and composites in addition to metal materials," says Dubský proudly.
Latecoere, however, is taking on the edge of manufacturing capacity in the Czech Republic.
In the grounds of Letov, where he resides, there's no more.
Before joining the French mother, the company had 180 employees.
Now there's 800 of them, and within three years there might be a hundred more.
As long as Airbus and Boeing are purporting to be how many hundreds of new aircraft are being ordered by the airline each year, they might not be worried about the job.
Although he has had contracts for years ahead, he has faced the parent company of Prague Latecoere's threat of bankruptcy.
The French group didn't have enough money for September loan repayments.
Eventually Latecoere was able to agree with the main creditors.
At the end of August, they traded parts of their loans for stock.
The creditors gained 37.4 percent in the company by increasing capital by 57.4 million euros.
The company's debt fell by two-thirds, or €180 million.
The second part of the financial recovery came at the beginning of September.
The company has upended new shares for 222.9 million euros among the existing shareholders.
In total, it raised the base capital by €280 million.
At the same time, the entire group is benefiting from the growing production of Airbus and Boeing, who are involved in an 85 per cent rise in sales.
Average job growth is expected to be up by four per cent a year until 2017.
In a contract book, it has orders for 2.6 billion euros, equivalent to four-year production.
French media claims Latecoere can finally breathe again after years on the drip.
The Czech Republic in Prague Airlines is an important one for the groups.
The group's sales contribute 16 per cent.
According to the number of employees, the group's largest foreign affiliate is.
MPs supported a greater share of the state from fees for coal.
The change in fees for mineral mining is to bring in the state treasury by $427 million more than in 2013.
The government's revenue budgets are supposed to have a neutral impact, according to the government, as the fee is to be higher.
In the previous year, commuters received from fees of roughly 450 million kronor and a state budget of $150 million.
From mining of brown coal, it was costing about £200 million and the state had 66 million crowns.
The amendment also includes an increase in the recovery fee with the permitted hep per thousand per hectare per year.
The income of these payments continues to fully belong to the municipalities.
Industry Minister John Mousdek (ČSSD) told MPs that the commuters would receive a year instead of 14 million to 100 million kronor.
The amount of mining charges will no longer be determined by the law, but it is set by the government by its regulation.
The payment shall be recalculated as part of the quantity of the extract and the rates for the different types of mineral.
According to the Government, the reason for the amendment is, among other things, flexible responses to the current economic situation.
However, MEP Mark Benda warned that the imposition of a fee by decree of a government does not need to be in line with the constitution.
However, according to Minister of Youth, it is not a tax in this case because the state is charging a nerve that is state-owned.
Only the municipalities whose territory is concerned are affected by the fees.
In the case of deep coal mining, it will receive three-quarters of the community's money and a quarter of the state.
The same will be the same in the case of the extraction of radioactive rocks.
Part of the money the state is going to collect on the extraction charges will be earmarked.
For example, 28 percent will need to go to repair damage after mining or to secure a year-long rescue.
The draft has now been criticised by opposition MPs, who have argued in particular that it will hurt the communities affected by the hardship and the region.
For example, Michael Kucera (TOP 09 and Mayor) warned that mining companies would no longer want to sponsor the community as they still did, because they would pay higher fees directly to the state budget.
"There is no possibility of tunnelling one of the poorest regions only to make Mr. Secretary of the Treasury improve the budget," said David Kádner (Dawn) elected in the Interest District.
Prior to the increase in unemployment at Mostecca, Mrs KSČM warned Hana Aulicka.
Kádner and Aulicky have failed to reject the amendment, and he wanted the law to return to the government.
In a explanatory memorandum, according to mining companies, an increase in fees does not sell to coal prices since prices are from more than 90 per cent in the long term.
As a result, major consumers like power plants or theaters should not feel price growth.
"On the other hand, this really raises the risk that the mining organizations will offset the increase in remittances by trying to reduce their operating expenses, which would in particular mean reducing the number of employees," the government admits.
However, an increase in fees in terms of employment is viable.
According to the rapporteur, for Novel Milan Urbana (ČSSD), it is crucial that MPs before the adoption of the law know the conclusions about the updated energy concept and, above all, the government's decision to limit coal mining.
If coal is also benefiting for the limits, then that will have implications for yields for the state and the community, he pointed out.
Urban disagrees with the Youth in that the decision to break the limit on top of the Czechoslovak army should fail until after 2020.
The limits on CSA below should be broken for reasons of social, economic, and long-term stability in domestic energy.
Time for Interest-Rate Decision for US Federal Reserve
The entire world is watching the US Federal Reserve is set to meet in two days on Wednesday and Thursday to make a crucial decision on whether to raise interest rates for the first time in nearly a decade.
A survey of 80 economists contacted by Reuters found that more than half of those who thought the Federal Reserve would make a decision now think they would remain inactive for another time and keep interest rates in the range of 0-0.25 percent.
This is a historic event, as the flight has taken place since the Fed lowered its rates to zero.
For the first time, we are approaching a situation where the main central bank could be able to get out of zero-stakes and start the process of normalizing interest rates, "says Angel Ubide, head of the Peterson Institute for International Economics.
The US economy has performed relatively well, there has been a recovery in the form of adding trilithium dollars to the government's account, and the creation of only a low level of inflation.
However, the Fed cannot ignore a less rosy global perspective.
They warned the markets to be prepared to increase, but circumstances suggest they also see big chances against this move.
The decision is due to be announced on Thursday 20: 00 a.m.
Bishop at State University Delta left a message
Shannon Lamb, who shot his girlfriend in Mississippi - and later that day and his colleague - wrote a note in which he claims to be "sorry" to the first murder and that he wished he could take it back, a government official revealed on Tuesday.
Police in Gautiere in Mississippi said Lamb, a geography teacher and social sciences teacher at the State University of Delta, called at police on Monday morning about 10 a.m.
And he said he shot someone.
Lamb dispatcher asked to be sent to his house by police officers.
He said: 'I shot my wife last night' and also mentioned there was a 'lovely dog' in the house, which 'won't be annoying', but he's upset.
Police were demanding the name of the caller, but Lamb did not introduce himself.
Lamb also didn't explain why it was shooting in the house.
When police arrived at the scene, she found the body of 4-year-old Amy Prentiss and a handwritten note from Lamba, in which it said: "I'm very sorry and I wish I could have taken it back.
I loved Amy and she is the only person she ever loved me. "
After leaving the note, Lamb went on a 300-mile long trip to the University of Delta, where he killed a teacher of Ethan Schmidt's history and then took his own life.
The Dean of the University William LaForge said he had not known about any conflict between Lamb and Schmidt, but that "there was obviously something going on in Mr. Lamb's head."
Despite Monday's announcement that Lamb allegedly believed in the romantic relationship Amy Prentiss was with Schmidt's government offices said there was "no evidence" of a "love triangle."
Shawn O'Steen, who had been with Prentiss married over seven years, said she was "a great person."
The divorce took place 15 years ago, but both remained friends.
The 19-year-old daughter of O'Steena and Prentiss were "shaken" by the entire case.
O'Steen said that Prentiss and her daughter were "best friends."
According to Linked Knowles, a close friend of Prentiss, as the Sun Herald reported, has been working with Prentiss from the house via the internet.
Knowles said that Prentiss, who had a hunting dog named Lightning, had been dating Lamb for about three years.
"She always wanted to help others," Knowles said.
Police said Lamb spoke to his relatives on Monday and said he would "not go to jail."
When officers caught him on a motorway near Greenville later the same night, Lamb stopped and fled into the woods where he shot himself.
According to the CV, which he published on the school's website, Lamb earned a doctorate in education at the University of Delta in the spring of 2015.
Stars who have lost their magic
The actor (left), on a picture with his son Redmond (right), has several stressful years behind him.
He fought leukaemia in 2001 and lost his long-term partner Farrah Fawcett for cancer in 2009.
The actor also had allegedly a drug problem and was detained in 2008 for possession of drugs.
All these things surely take their toll.
Luke Shaw of Manchester United will be several months out of the game due to a double fracture.
Luke Shaw suffered a double fracture of his right leg during the defeat of Manchester United at the Masters against PSV Eindhoven.
While this left-footer left this injury in tears and put him out of the game for at least six months, Louis van Gaal remains positive and thinks Shaw could play again at the end of the season.
The injury was caused by an unscrupulous intervention by Héctor Moreno in the 15th minute when the 20-year-old Shaw burst into the area of the PSV.
Nine minutes he was being treated on the field and an oxygen mask was also needed before being taken to hospital.
Van Gaal said: "He suffered a double fracture of his leg and is now in hospital."
He will be taken tomorrow or maybe the day after and then continued to operate in Manchester.
It's a terrible thing - a guy who comes to Manchester at 18 in the age it has got very tough, but he's playing fantastically and then this is going to happen.
He also had an oxygen mask on when he was in the dressing room.
He cried.
I'm not a doctor, but a double fracture will require six months of treatment, and he won't be able to play in a group phase.
I believe he will still play this season.
Moreno was very lucky not to get a red card and a penultimate kick.
Referee Nicola Rizzoli didn't punish the Mexican.
Van Gall indicated the Italian referee was wrong.
You can judge by yourself if it was a penalmine and a red card.
It was a very nasty surgery with both feet.
The tweet from the account of Shawa says: "Thank you all for their news, saying you can't express how I'm ruined, my way to recovery is starting now and I'm going to get even stronger."
Related: Mancaster United recorded Luke Shaw's injury in defeat against PSV
The England defender will have the added motivation to recover in the form of the European Championships in France next July.
Phillip coca, the PSV coach, said: "It was a very nasty injury."
When any player walks off the field with such an injury, everyone is very sad about it.
It is never the goal of our players to hurt the anti-players.
Moreno suffered a leg break in a struggle for Mexico against Van Gaal's Holland at the 2014 World Cup.
"It's very tough for him because his intention wasn't to hurt an opponent, and when you hear about the severity of such an injury, it's not good," he said coca.
I wasn't able to spot this moment.
I only saw the ball heading in a different direction, so it looked like it [Moreno] touched him, but I didn't see the surgery on Luke.
In an interview with SBS6, Moreno said: "I know how he feels, I know how difficult this thing can be.
I feel very bad about it, I'm very sorry.
The PSV's Andrés Guardado was also taken to hospital after the procedure by Chris Smalling.
Does David Cameron sure know The Lorax better?
Every parent knows this thing: When a child falls in love with a book, it doesn't take long to learn almost memory.
You must not be David Cameron.
At the question of providing children's schemes to appoint a favourite children's book, Prime Minister Lorax chose, a byte from Dr Seuss from 1971.
It was hard to choose, writes Cameron in a report published on SuperCamps website and goes: "Funny, pathetic, creative and with strong content, I was happy to read to my children, because there was always an image or message behind it, or a message I hadn't seen before."
No good, except in the next paragraph, Cameron allegedly described the plot of a book by an elevator from the 2012 movie, which added other characters and details to fill out a brief original text.
"In the city of Thneed-Ville walled walls, where all nature ceased to exist, and even the air is a commodity, a boy named Ted hopes to win the heart of the girl of his dreams, Audrey, by fulfilling her wish to see a real tree," is the brief content of a book that records the object of love unknown to Dr Seuss, whose real name was Theodor Seuss Geisel, who died in 1991.
As though it wasn't suspicious enough, the text delivered by Cameron reads as a summary lift of the Lorax film, which is located on the Internet Movie Database, and begins with the words: "In the city of Thneed-Ville walled walls, where all nature ceased to exist, and even the air is a commodity, a boy called Ted hopes to gain the heart of a girl's dream, Audrey."
Because he was an openly practical parent, it seems unlikely that Cameron would not have met the history of the book, where an unnamed young man will learn that the local nature devastates the greedy, trees felled by industrialist Once-ler, who, despite protests from the titular Lorax, the staunch, moustachioed creature, who "speaks for the trees."
In all likelihood, such a relatively minor PR task was received by an aide who had never read Lorax's child 20 times in the piece.
A Downing Street spokeswoman said the text was likely to come from the office of Mr Cameron's supporters.
The SuperCamps confirmed that the text was provided by an employee of Cameron, but without further comment.
Adam Lyth has been at risk for the omission of England but he is still holding
Competing with Pakistan in the United Arab Emirates is a difficult task, but after seeing the team that England chose on this tour, it will be a retrial of the 3-0 loss suffered last time in the Test series, not highly likely.
I wouldn't directly rule out winning guests.
The Alastair Cook's side may be less experienced than the one three years ago, but there are good players sleeping in this batting line-up, and also the collective thinking is strong; they don't bear the scars of 2012, only a youthful positivity.
With the ball, Moeen Ali emerging spinner and Adil Rashid, even if he's unknown at the Test series, represents an attacking option.
Related: Adam Lyth dropped out of the England team in experience series and was replaced by Alex Hale.
The decision to deny Adam Lyth is a tough nut to analyse for me, since his main coach is in Yorkshire.
His seven tests have been against two good attacks in challenging conditions and simple, but the hard reality is that the players of cricket are judged on the basis of performance.
For example, there were no question marks around the name Joe Root, which led to the announcement because - and this has been mentioned before - the players are their best selectors.
Another half-century and Lyth could have extended their series, but he had control of his own destiny.
Hopefully if he can get more runs for Yorkshire, there will be another opportunity.
England's chief coach, Trevor Bayliss, praised his stance, although his performances were not entirely 100 per cent, and that wasn't surprising to me; he was always a team player.
The question of how much testing time a batter gets to show is a hard nut.
Lyth got seven caps - as did Sam Robson before him - while Nick Compton won nine.
Only Compton had a chance at home and out.
The only thing that you might be reeling about is that England gave Jonathan Trott's chances in the Caribbean first - although he was Lyth in the best form - but this wasted opportunity is past.
There comes Alex Hales and that's the batsman I value very positively.
He's the x-factor player of cricket we've seen here in Yorkshire at the start of the season when he got against us by 236 on Trent Bridge, which he sort of did.
He must be given at least the same opportunity his predecessors got, but this will all depend on the overall report in the United Arab Emirates.
The idea when Moeen starts alongside Cook, who would have won another extra spinner while retaining four quicks, has been gifted and I have no reservations against her.
I don't understand why a trekaker can't bat, and this left-handed man has already shown that he is an amazing player of cricket.
Moeen may not be able to do his job for his country, Worcestershire, but he was number 3 for them, and the big difference is not.
My former team-mate Justin Langer played first his first 38 exams before his appearance in 2001.
Three centuries later, he didn't even look back.
The team comes with Zafar Ansari as a backup spinner and when I had the chance to watch him, he took me as a highly impressive young man.
People can look at its gross statistics - an average of 31 with the bat and 35 with the ball - and I see it as a pram, but there aren't a lot of spinners who would raise their hands, and the selectors decided for youth.
There's a lot to learn about this tour.
Outside the team, England seem to have made some changes and a clever addition to their coach staff.
The appointment of Mahela Jayawardenea, a batsman from Sri Lanka, as a consultant for trial matches can be a masterful move.
He is one of the most beautiful men who bring rich experiences by having experience with all the conditions and all of the attacks.
Paul Collingwood comes in part of a tour of white-ball and brings in the team both energy and a ruthless spark.
I have always felt he was directly born into the world of international cricket, whether as a player or coach, and like the Mahel possess an intellect to be used.
New voices in the dressing room, though it's the voices bellowing consistent things that have been dealt with before, can sometimes lighten and refresh the atmosphere.
Collingwood's teammate Ben Stokes was given a one-day leave, just as Root was given a similar break against Australia and I have no problem with that decision.
Even if many disagree, the coaches and selectors will not create a timetable.
And you have to remember, as players, that their work depends on the results.
Such decisions can never be taken lightly.
A Brexit campaign could win if the economy starts to stagnate by 2017.
David Cameron's ill-conceived strategy for keeping Britain in the EU is getting into other problems with every passing day even without the election of a brilliant Jeremy 'Is it Yes or No?' Corbyn to lead the Labor party, or there will be a TUC take on Tuesday to partake the whole situation around Europe.
The foreigners also have their Corby and Nigel Farage.
A close friend of Europe's diplomat has recently explained how Europe is mired in different crises - not all of which are their fault - some member states already have enough of Britain's egotistical agenda, dividing concessions, and disruptive changes to the contract they mostly did not want.
At their annual meeting in Brighton, the TUC decided they didn't want it even if they had denounced social protection.
We can even call it a selfie agenda of Dave and George.
The Prime Minister and Chancellor go for summits or bilateral meetings in foreign capitals, they will take a photo before a famous local monument, with or without local dignitaries, and then return home with the words to win allies for reform.
It's all about me.
My European friend, who wants to inward-looking Britain in European Europe - "We don't see us alone with France," Berlin says - suggesting that some shortsighted ministers and officials in some of the capitals have reached a point where they don't care about our departure.
Angela Merkel, Germany's cautiously balanced chancellor, is an ally, but she has been in power for 10 years and wants to leave her post before becoming ill for her, as she has been for too long a continued Thatchera (11 years), Mitterrand (14) and Kohl (16).
Frenchman François Hollande faces re-election or replacement in 2017.
His power is also declining.
Poland may soon have a nationalist government on the right, Spain on the left.
It is difficult to see how he breaks his feet in helping Selfie Britons who might be able to invest their energy better to prevent Scotland from leaving the UK - which is something they do not want themselves because they have similar separatist tendencies.
So some of these ministers can plan deliberately unhelpful comments made by the SNP in the course of the campaign before the 2017 referendum in Great Britain to expedite the Brexit process, a friend says.
"The renegotiation has solved the problem" and "Britain has nothing worthwhile from the negotiations."
Europeans, to their own detriment, know how fierce Fleet Street can be, and how skeptical the EU is about the EU's oppressive oligarchs, since they were not inspired by Tony Benn in the 1975 referendum, which supported our entry in 1973 at a ratio of 2-1.
They can vaguely remember the name Boris Johnson, the Saudi-led Euro-opportunist, who made his name as a Brussels rapporteur "EU straight-forward" at the start of the 1990s.
Despite his vanity, Ed Miliband knew his enemies.
They included a mixture of villains unpaid taxes, foreigners hacking phones and pseudo non-overseas departments that owned most of the big newspapers.
In fact, Tony Blair thought the same thing about them, but he realized that when you were in a cage with a white gorilla, you'd have to throw bananas to keep her from dinner and then also tea.
In fact, Miliband was more like Blair than Blair himself was, as he contended Cameron's refereeing routine, ever since Blair admitted the principle of the abolished EU constitution, which was sunk by French and Dutch voters in 2005, and obtained the card to throw him away.
The press never forgave him.
But dear Jeremy Corbyn, who patted me on the back on Monday at Westminster - I told him I should no longer be wasting my time - it seems in danger of a renewed strategy of boycott Murdoch Neil Kinnock, which was the mistake then and now.
It may take some time, but he needs to develop a coherent strategy of engaging mediums, not with me, but certainly with Andrew Marre, whose chair at the BBC left on Sunday.
Corbin's official stance toward Europe, I'll say nicely, is evolving.
He claims he would want to remain in a reformed European Union.
Well, most people out of the frenzied tendencies of Ukip and the wild shores of Tory's little Englanderism can surely accept that.
The same was said by Hilary "Bemm, but not Benniite" Benn on radio and television this week when his inner scout was unable to commit to admitting that Corbyn's appointment of abrazed McDonnell as shadow chancellor was a bad decision.
It reminded me of the 1970 "s, when his old father fought on television about his loyalty, without going too far and losing his job.
Hillary's game was much more attractive.
But fighting to remain "under all circumstances" - Bennie's phrase - seems not to be what McDonnell said, even as JC told colleagues and MPs on their private meetings Monday night,
Whatever the background, the sensitive image that Corbyn wants to communicate - remember, he touched even me - the discipline of the report remains important in the ages of TV transmission and especially in the belief, a pairing of paranoia and betrayal that social media is
It is fair not to provide Cameron's free admission to Europe, which would allow him to consider the support of the Labor Party in the referendum campaign for the obvious, as McDonnell put it.
Simon Jenkins certainly thinks so.
But McDonnello and Corbyn's basic crackdown on EU membership - in keeping with their Bennite-embracing economy, anti-capitalist past - is no longer just a matter of esoteric discussion among leftist dissidents, for which the narcissism of small differences in the central nature of dogmatic bickering.
As well as his crackdown on Nato - Tom Watson believes the JC campaign will not want to put an end to this - foreign diplomats will be required to try to understand the meaning of all this for their domestic masters.
Why should Paris or Berlin spend political capital - they also have suspicious voters - for the concession of Britain when it seems unnecessary?
The United States is already quite disappointed about the brisket "weak military performance in Iraq, Libya and Syria, even in reducing the cost of the Conservative government in power, as I was reminded of Monday's launch of something called the Security Forum of British influence.
Experts criticise review of electronic published by Public Health England
A statement by the government-funded agency about being e-cigarettes 95% safer than smoking came from a meeting of 12 people, some of whom have links with the tobacco industry, the researchers report.
Experts writing in the British Medical Journal (BMJ) have joined Lancet criticism of the evidence used in its report on electronic cigarettes by Public Health England (PHE).
PHE published a "milestone" report last month, describing it as a "comprehensive review of the evidence."
However, several researchers have questioned the comprehensive data and raised concerns about links between some experts and the tobacco industry.
An editorial in the expert journal Lancet last month attacked an "extremely shaky base" on which PHE based its main findings.
Two other experts writing for the BMJ have questioned the claims allegedly "built on rock or sand."
Martin McKee, professor of European public health at the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine, and Simon Capewell, professor of clinical epidemiology at the University of Liverpool, said: "The fundamental principle of public health is that the policy should be based on evidence of effectiveness."
They believe the public could expect a PHE statement that reads "the current best estimate is that e-cigarettes are around 95% less harmful than smoking" is based on a detailed examination of evidence and modelling.
In fact, this conclusion comes from one meeting of 12 people called for drawing up the analysis of the multi-criteria decision (MCDA) model of synthesizing their views on damages, associated with different products containing nicotine; the results of the negotiations were summarised in a research report.
McKee and Capewell report that one sponsor of that meeting was a company called EuroSwiss Health, whose CEO allegedly had previously obtained funds from British American Tobacco for independent studies.
It has also approved the public health mandate BAT in the sustainability report, it says.
One in 12 participants in the meeting admitted funding from a maker of e-cigarettes, but not the financing allegedly obtained earlier from tobacco company Philip Morris International, they add.
The reason for the selection of panel members is not available, but they contain several known champions of e-cigarettes, some of whom also claim industrial funding in the paper.
Some others present at the meeting are not known for their expertise in the fight against smoking.
A meeting in PHE also took part in the tobacco leadership.
The report found in this group "eloquently admits," Missing "hard evidence of the damage most products to most criteria," McKee and Capewell wrote.
However, none of these links or restrictions are described in the PHE report.
McKee and Capewell said PHE's claim that "so far there is no evidence that e-cigarettes acted as a way to smoke for children or non-smokers," was premature.
Professor Kevin Fenton, director of health and wellbeing at PHE, said the claims in the BMJ had already been answered before.
He said: "Electronic cigarettes are significantly less harmful than smoking."
One of two lifelong smokers will die because of their addiction.
All the evidence suggests that health risks posed by electronic cigarettes are small compared to, but we need to continue to examine the long-term effects.
PHE has a clear obligation to inform the public about what the evidence shows, and also what they don't show, especially when there was so much public confusion about relative danger compared to tobacco.
Nearly 80,000 people a year die of illnesses related to smoking and smoking costs the NHS £2 billion a year.
A clear highlight of the present evidence - that even if e-cigarettes are not without risks, they carry only a fraction of the damage caused by smoking - we are fulfilling our national competence.
The BBC should end up with EastEnders, claims former director of Channel 4
The former director of Channel 4, Luke Johnson, said the BBC should stop broadcast programmes such as EastEnders and The Voice, and confirmed that its commercial rivals would "give the right hand" for a hit show such as Albert Square.
Johnson said the licence fee should only be used for programs not made by other British television broadcasters.
He criticised the BBC for putting public service programs likely to be monitored by only a handful of people, into complex broadcasting times over its rivals "biggest rating shows, and on channels such as BBC4.
After general manager Tony Hall said the corporation wanted to do more in partnership with other organisations, Johnson said he had unsuccessfully tried to connect with the BBC for six years he had worked on Channel 4.
"I struggle with the idea that the BBC has commissioned and sends out programmes that would have certainly been broadcast by rioters without the contributions of the state," Johnson said in a panel of communications at the Upper House, as part of the negotiations on the BBC's future.
If you maintain the royalties I'm not sure about if they are a good idea in the medium or long term, it should be reduced by at least as far as programmes that do not produce or single out.
They broadcast The Voice in the main broadcast time, as they want to get the widest possible support into the future.
The idea that no one else would broadcast it is a ridiculous joke, and, of course, meaningless.
Johnson said: "I don't understand why the regressive tax should support programs that can be funded by uncontributory.
The Voice is one of them, EastEnders others, and of course produced domestically.
Frankly, other channels would give their right hand for them.
I can't understand how these public broadcasting services are.
I don't think it would even weaken the BBC in the slightest.
Johnson, a businessman in the area series who led Channel 4 from 2004 to 2010, told the BBC he felt vindicated by gaining ratings "because of the ambitions of the people who worked here and because he believed it was the best way to secure long term support."
His comment on the BBC's most popular show is echoed by those former Sky executive, Tony Ball, who used his Mactaggart lesson in Edinburgh in 2003 to suggest the BBC will sell the show like EastEnders.
Johnson said even the more dodgy public service programs "passes on BBC4, where quite often you can't measure the audience, but are fulfilling their authority and can argue as they prepare for their hypocritical mission to justify the £4bn income from royalties," But, of course, we do all these obscure programs that no one is looking at. "
They broadcast it at a time when no one is looking at them.
As for the licence fee, Johnson told the commission: "I challenge you to find a regressive system about who gets the best value from it.
Of course, we all think that £150 of British pounds a year is a great sum, but for people, for whom £150 is a lot, I'd be surprised if they pay so much because they don't look at the BBC so much.
The former Director of Sky and Channel 5, David Elstein, who stepped down before the commission on Tuesday, said the BBC should revise its reigning mission in terms of "inform, educate and entertain."
He confirmed that the small volume of the BBC production has now been classified as educational - it used to be 1% television production and 0.1% on radio - and should take on a pattern of public public broadcasts in Australia and Canada and change to "inform, clarify and entertain."
On the topic of partnership, Elstein said the BBC should do more in areas such as Proms, which only a handful were broadcast on television, and connect with commercial reporters so we can all see them online.
"Sonogenetics" or control of brain cells using sound waves
This video shows how sonic impulses influence the direction the tubers move.
Scientists have raised worms with a genetically modified neural system that can control sound waves.
Tiny tubers change direction by the time they're hit by sound impulses that are inaudible to the human ear.
Pulses work by switching the cells of genetically modified motor neurons that are programmed to respond to these ultrasonic waves.
Related: Scientists can read and write brain activity by light
The scientists said these worms are a great demonstration of a new methodology called songenetics using ultrasound to activate brain, heart and muscle cells, and activate outside the body.
Sreekanth Chalasani, a researcher at the Salto Institute in La Jolla, California, told the Guardian that this method would one day be able to replace deep brain stimulation - an invasive procedure in which electrodes that stimulate the brain are implanted into the brain of the patient, for example, for the treatment of symptoms of Parkinson's disease.
Tubers tend not to respond to ultrasound, but Chalasani found that the reaction occurs when placed in a liquid containing microscopic bubbles.
As he found, bubbles amplified by ultrasonic waves, which then pass through the body of worms.
The enhanced ultrasonic waves operate in the ion channels of the TRP-4, which is found in the membranes of some of the worm's cells.
Thanks to the sound waves, these channels are opened and activated by the cells they are associated with, it is said in a report in the journal Nature Communications.
To control the tubers by using ultrasonic waves, Chalasani genetically modified the worms so that some of their motor neurons contain the ion channels of the TRP-4.
When then used on such modified worms, the sound waves were amplified with microbubbles and carried to worms where modified motor neurons switched on.
The new method is similar to optogenetics, a pioneering tool that allows scientists to turn on and switch off neurons by light.
But Chalasani was allowed to hear that sonogenics could have many advantages over this technique.
Unlike the light that must be sent the optical fibre to the required site in the brain, ultrasound waves can penetrate the tissue without restriction and be sent directly to the brain.
"We believe that if we use gene therapy and therapeutic viruses, we can target human neurons and make them temporarily sensitive to ultrasound signals used in clinical treatment to cure neurological diseases," Chalasani said.
He added that his application would also be found in the treatment of muscle cells and insulin-producing cells.
An illegal torture device - right there on your doorstep!
Advertisements shamed by the British arms trade.
Watch the video about the anti-weapons market from Amnesty International.
Formidable killer drones!
Shackles on the feet that break my ankles!
Splinters!
And electric stun batons that cause excruciating pain, but they don't leave any tracks!
The cheerful voice and caricature of metaphors do not leave anyone in doubt that this advertisement for the world's biggest arms fairs is a sharp parody created for Amnesty International to highlight the willingness of the British government to sell weapons to repressive regimes across defence and security facilities International cheer at the Excel Centre in the London borough of Docklands.
Related: DSEeven arms trade: Authoritarian regimes descend on London
But a separate campaign is also conducted with emerging posters on bus stops and metres that require a second look.
"An important announcement, Travel to DLR from 15 to 18 September?" Reads one, using a font with a London Underground with DLR lines becoming an image of a tank.
This September, there will be a swarm of arms dealers on DLR.
The 300 posters are created by artists who exhibit their work at the Museum of Cruel Design in Banksy's Discoverer.
A collection called Special Patrol Group has helped distribute them throughout London and using the "Ad Space Hack Packs," which is £6 for a chunk of Allen's keys, which allegedly "gain access to about a third of the advertising space of bus stops on the planet."
Transport for London is not amused by this flypostings "vandalism."
One of the advertising parodies made by the Special Patrol Group's collection.
According to Gavin Grindon, curator of Cruel Designs and a specialist assistant at the University of Essex, artists are increasingly questioning and attempting to show political activity to viewers outside the gallery.
Many artists go to work with activists in the protest movement, and they realise they have to get out in the real world to make their art impact on society.
Another of the posters against the gun-shop's health in the subway.
Video Amnesty was on Facebook viewed more than 100,000 people in 24 hours and was created by a VCCP working without a fee and a graphic designer and commentator also worked for free.
The creative director of VCCP, Matt Lever, would be surprised by the silence surrounding the arms trade - he saw an empty seat in an Excel calendar - and thought, "Let's show them the campaign they are trying to avoid."
They toyed with the creation of a more realistic risky corporate advertising, but "by adding variety of color and animation, I have achieved that it will attract more people."
"They've done a fantastic piece of work and helped us raise concerns about the sale of illegal torture instruments at the fair," says Tom Davies in Amnesty.
What we need now is for the UK Government to take action and ensure that it does not trade with torture equipment on our doorstep.
Perhaps the most creative art surrounding the arms trade comes from within the Excel, where exhibitors sell fantastically euphemistic products.
In a press release, Saab revealed an order from the US military to "on the arm of launcher AT4CS RS."
This includes "uniquely shaped headgear that provides amazing effects from behind the armour inside the target."
Whatever it is, it's not going to be pleasant.
Eight gold rules for life on student college
11 years ago, I moved on to student rails as a oblivious 19-year-old boy, still a believer in bargains and moral relativism, but until now I recall the tense smiles of those I wilted - and numerous, lengthy complaints on the other.
All I learned can be distilled into eight simple rules.
Moving on to the rails can range from slightly to nerves flowing to a totally appalling one.
It's tempting to babble: To tell the people where you are, if you took a year's break, what is your opinion about Corbyn and why "you genuinely don't love or even hate Marmite, because people, it's just an extract from the yeast hahaha, I'll be in my room."
Take a deep breath.
And help others to take a breath too - ask and show interest.
He runs the conversation and helps you find the people you love, and the ones you wouldn't even talk to if your eyelashes were in one fire, and they would be making the lights out.
Leave the people space.
People's rooms are often turned to drinking receptions, places of film evenings and communal public places, but they are also rooms in which people dress and adjust their underwear.
Related: Don't even think about starting college and being in a relationship
Introverts on high will come.
Your room should be a sanctuary, yet a lot of tracks change to an off-room pass culture that is friendly, social and contributes to lifelong friendship.
That may be hell for anyone who needs to pick up.
No culture prevents you from saying, "I love you and I want our friendship to continue, but I need you to leave so I can get back to the energy I needed to interview with you."
Try to know when a classmate is tired of socialising - and maybe write him a seat.
Speaking of knocking: Knock.
One boy in my dorm had a habit that if the door wasn't locked, he was invited in.
He saw things.
Make friends by peaking.
Because you started college at the top of a peachy mania, knocking on a stranger's door and a show with a slice of baked cakes seems slightly less weird, less than "Welcome to the neighborhood, I've made something for you, now smile while I ask personal questions."
Offering domestic delicacy is a good way to find friends.
Your roommates will feel obligated to talk to you, and maybe everything will end up bringing your face to a tasty surprise.
That is, of course, the object of being a decent baker.
Badly condensed chunks of flour, sugar and tussle are likely to guarantee that others will pretend to sleep when you attempt to knock on their doors.
Food theft is a common crime on student college.
Stealing the whole chicken is a crime, of course, but is a drip of milk into your tea theft?
Check it twice with the milk owner.
There's a chance the milk will be offered to you even if they're running inside.
If someone steals anything from you, it's annoying and you have my sympathy - but try to deal with it a little bit more mature than my roommate, who replaced her milk for washing dishes to punish the thieves.
Now he's in jail.
You shouldn't be making noises that disturb people from sleep or studying.
It's not just about being a decent human being, but you're also the responsible people in glass houses.
The girl from my hallway asked her neighbours if they could turn the drum and bass a little bit, because they were 3 at night and she had a written in the morning.
Their response was the amplification of music.
When they finally stopped at 5: 00 in the morning, she allowed them to sleep for two hours and then released her own music, locked the door and left on her three-hour exam.
Wouldn't it be romantic for your future spouse to go on the same rails as yours?
And, on the contrary, wouldn't it be awful embarrassing if you mistook your roommate for your future husband, slept together, broke up and had to see each other every day, and maybe she would take over your mutual friends, too?
Of course, your heart will not be broken - but if your sexy roommate is 100% not your future spouse, try to talk to your weaknesses at least a little.
In an uplifting moment when you realise that someone left the keys in their locked room, there is only a thin line between funny and bullish.
A good joke is funny, but it's easy to fix.
Learn them a valuable and fun lesson about their security by hiding something - never destroy someone's room with toothpaste and shampoo.
Lock their doors and give them the keys to the water bottle, which you then put in the freezer - but never put their stuff on the ceiling more than twice.
Eva was looking forward to the twins despite the uncertain prospects of the future.
Eva had experienced a harsh moment earlier in her pregnancy with the seven-year-old.
His father broke up with her, and she was alone in preparing and educating.
I was coping quite quickly with the situation, I was looking forward to the baby and looking for the positives.
Uncertainty and by being alone with the baby, I tried not to worry.
And I certainly was in my hope that we would not stay alone for long, recalls Eve on her first pregnancy today.
She had previously met on the internet on an earlier Vasek cottage, which they began chatting about on their favourite films.
Vasek Eve had even imported his home from the delivery house, but he did not play too much into the role of non-dom-daddy.
"He then dropped out of the program for a while," Eva described in the documentary series Four in that 3.
The theme for the third series of Czech television is the search for happiness at the second attempt.
The care of both the Trust and the financial security of the family were handled by part-time staff and great help of mum and help of the aunt.
In the end, the prospect of a responsibility for a foreign child did not result in your affection for Eve.
They finally got together around Vittoria's other birthdays, and he now understands Vasek as his father and he's also calling him that.
Though he has two grown-up daughters, fatherhood at sixty is enjoying his words, and he is more devoted to his children as well.
In addition to the More, she was still two-year-old Leonkies and, eventually, the twins.
"The Vasek entered our family so naturally, perhaps even by the fact that my mother never really spoke into the relationship," she thinks with a smiling Eva.
Not enough room?
At least we're close.
The twins Ema and Ela were born of the emperor's cut after Eva was diagnosed with gestational cholestasis at the end of her pregnancy.
This is a disorder of the production and activity of bile acids, which are then found in the infancy in the infancy, and in particular by itching.
The disease is dangerous for an unborn fetus, which threatens premature birth and death, with a mother after childbirth mostly removed.
Emma and Ela were born to Eva and your luck was born healthy, even if they were only at week 36.
The Emilie was placed in an incubator at the intermediate ward, where she is also working with your niece who was able to take over and accommodate her.
Eline was larger and immediately after the transfer from the ICU to the room I had it with me, describing the difficult period after the delivery of Eva.
She spent twenty days in the maternity ward until doctors vowed to release the babies, who meanwhile managed to reach the boundary of two khal.
The wait is not happy for children in childbirth Eve.
"I was insane with my husband and children," he recalls the difficult moments on the department of the six-year-old mother.
She considered her husband as well as resigning, including because of an insensitive approach to one of the doctors.
But it did not happen eventually, and doctors dismissed Evi and the twins into their home care.
The stories of four pregnancies and births are broadcast by the QT1 on Tuesday night at 21: 45 a.m.
A large family can be modest.
They live together in a small house near Prague, where Eve had to do with an electric double-fence and cramped conditions.
The house didn't grow, but Vasek made Eva's joy by installing a gas cooker to make meals for six people more comfortable.
If he's the best one, we'll take a cab ride.
Eva is convinced that children particularly perceive family wellbeing and a pleasant atmosphere, and not the size or mildness of the cottage.
For the time being, we got together pretty much, better than we expected.
The mess is worse hidden in a small space and the rolling baby is sometimes crossing, but at least we're all around, smiles Eva, who can find a positive side to each situation.
Your job lighting in the film is not a guarantee of regular income.
That's why sometimes he trips to Prague streets like a taxi driver.
In his sixty years, according to his words, care for the finances of both the family and children physically manages how long this will be?
"I realise that, given our age difference, I will be the one to feed this family," Eva admits to the straight in asking for the future.
She would like to return to employment, but she is even more tempted by the possibility of her own business.
I'm not a target for an employer.
And when she gets the worst, we can take a cab with her husband, and she's joking with a nice blonde.
Apple has suffered a Jo-Jo effect.
It's all a display.
A more powerful processor, a bigger resolution camera, a firmer scar, or a display that recognizes the power of touch, is in short of the merits of the recently introduced nine generations "iPods.
The two others then also have a negative impact on the dimensions and mass of iPhones 6s and 6s Plus.
Indeed, the appointment of the Apprentice has been that each new generation of iPhones is lighter than the previous one.
The exception was only the third and fourth generations, whose weight increased slightly compared to previous iPhones.
Indeed, the two-gramma mass of the difference to the news was negligible.
But this is far from the case of new iPhones.
Compared to last year's iPods 6 and 6 Plus, the weight grew in a smaller model by 14 grams, by a larger of 20 grams.
One party cannot be surprised, a year-old affair bent in the pockets of Apple has suffered greatly.
The snail newspaper is so of a more resistant aluminium alloy 7000, which has also been projected on the mass.
But a much bigger impact has the displays on it.
In fact, Apple has used a 3D Touch technology that makes the displays discern the power of touch.
To do so, the display needed to be replaced by another layer of capability sensors.
The mass of displays of new iPhones has grown more than double over previous generations.
In the smaller iPhones from initially 12 grams to 29 grams, in the case of larger then from 19 to 40 grams.
In the iPhone's 6s, the display is the hardest-used component.
A mass of just 143 grams is then reached for this news by using the defrosting bark that touched most of the remaining components.
The larger model is then the hardest used element of the battery, but her weight has not changed much compared to the predecessors.
Even in this case, the biggest increase is evident at the display.
The weight of 5.5 "iPhones 6s Plus thus achieves 192 grams.
As long as the new display technology is practical, it will take effect when using.
The first users will be able to try this on Friday 25 September, when the sale of iPhones 6s and 6s Plus will be launched in selected countries.
Are flakes of breakfast champions for tens of thousands of years?
In Italian Grotta Paglicci, the archaeologists have made a finding that opens up interesting possibilities.
They discovered the traces of a modern man from various times, including mural paintings, remnants of tools, and so on and so on.
But in a layer of 23A, which is dated back to about 30,000 years ago, but scientists discovered something very reminiscent of the remnants of a breakfast buffet.
In fact, there were traces of oats, which seemed to go through the production process today.
On it, the grain is dipped first today, then dried, removed the packaging, the so-called plume, then spills, then spills and scales the flat.
In Paglicci's cave, a grain, which seemed to be salvaged or burned, appeared to be crushed, and then seemed to be crushed between two mill stones, at least to suggest traces of use at two stone caves in the cave.
Thus, the scientists were unable to demonstrate in their publication for PNAS that a complete process of flakes of flakes would occur in the cave, but the similarity is actually very obvious.
We also have no evidence of how people flakes may have eaten, but the presumption that it was with some liquid and possibly warm enough, of course, offers to be entirely logical.
At the same time, it is a very interesting document of how intensively people have used cereals long before the creation of agriculture.
Indeed, if the flak's interpretation is correct, the world's oldest flakes have passed about twenty thousand years ago.
New reporting by the station in Dopram Entrepreneurship of the City of Bremen.
So I once again listened to the report's names in the trolleybus: Houser's, Ghost, Finger, Spratelier.
Sure enough, the trolley was more noisier, so the report's male voice was somewhat less comprehensible than before when the stops were reported in the female voice.
The female voice is higher, so in the deeper noise of traffic, it is better able to discern than a deeper male voice.
The DPMB, though, argues that the passengers selected themselves - I don't know who, no one asked me, but I'm sure it was taken from the studio records taken in complete silence, which, of course, sounded quite different from the noise of the bus engine.
I've lived in the Bread for a couple of decades, so I know the proper names of all those stops, so I don't need these reports, but foreigners from elsewhere who don't know and for whom these reports are especially determined can be confused, and they can go to the final where they accidentally came, then claim that the footage they were about to speak was not reported at all.
He might have had the choice of a broadcaster - but better once again the broadcaster - to do it again, and this time garnered by the normal traffic noise and the roar of an engine in which the whooping speaker in the bus is nearly lost.
So we don't have to continue to listen to the names of the stations of Water Hershey, Whisper, or then Ponorous in the creaking sloe I've gotten into in the Chamber.
I suppose my old man's ears didn't turn up so much during the one day that the radio presenter had changed.
Before that day, I understood them pretty well.
Good morning, Comrade Chief.
From a tracksuit notebook.
Today, few know what the world's biggest and brightest were so-called comprehensive clearances.
I took the liberty of remembering it.
The bus was late.
I bumped into the dispatcher's office when the radio said it was seven o'clock.
"You're lucky you didn't hook up with Comrade Chief, one minute in front of you, and it seems like he's not in the mood," the dispatcher observed, while I was writing in the story books.
Thanks, I'll watch it.
Tell me I'm going to the precinct for a review of minor mechanics.
It's not possible.
They're all fucked up.
What's going on?
"You'll see," the dispatcher said.
You will be next time.
I ran out into the corridor.
Then the door of the Chief's office opened and the chief appeared.
Stiff, stony-faced, in a perfectly fit uniform.
"Good morning, Chief," I said respectfully, and quickly switched on two buttons of my uniform jacket.
"Good morning," came the reply, and I quickly ran to the second floor, not realizing the cold, ominous tone that the old answered.
"You're playing," said Eva, an elderly lady I valued very much.
She said she even was chief before the comrades took it down.
There's clearances, and you'll arrive.
How many times have I asked what these complex clearances are, but no one wants to talk much about it.
They say they're once every three years, they all have to go to them, and it's pretty bad.
For some, at least.
I'll see.
I pulled the phone out of the drawer with periodic reports, then the phone.
"Holcman, come to my house right now," the chief's voice said.
What's annoying?
Now we have met and nothing... "I murmured, but no one answered me, everyone just with their thoughts.
"Good morning, Comrade Chief, I've come to your order," I said, and I joined the chief of staff.
The chief was sitting behind his desk and inspecting some ledgers.
"Comrade mechanic," he said after a moment, without raising his head.
He dropped the paper on the table, leaned back in the seat of the chair and stared at me with his usual, unpleasant, pungent eyes.
I was uneasy.
What's going on?
Yesterday, the Deputy commended that he had worked very well with me during those few months in office, and that I was happy with him.
The chief did very well when he took me out of the platoon to distance himself.
Now this?
You have to understand that you're a track-distance technology, and you have to behave accordingly.
The kind of greeting you used this morning is just not acceptable.
I cursed that I had used such a greeting since I was a child, that I had been so bred, and that I could see nothing wrong with him.
It was like a red turkey for the chief.
"You're on the Socialist Railroad, and the only acceptable greeting is honor," said the chief.
Besides, you're still confusing your superiors.
Once you say "sir," for the second time again, "Comrade."
But I'm not Mr. Chief, but Comrade Commander.
The deputies are the comrades of the deputy, the top tradesman are the comrades of the top line-up!
You have to remember that!
Excuse me, sir... Comrade Chief, but... but I greeted you with a regular citizen salute.
There's nothing wrong with that...... and it's an honor to work, or comrade...... you know... I'm not in the party...
"It's not your preference that you're not in the side," the chief said, his voice cold.
That's what we're talking about.
Anyway, you remember, you don't have a pre-paid chair up here.
That wasn't good.
When the chief said something was not his preference, it did not look good.
He glared at me for a moment with a cold, pungent look, and I looked for the words to answer.
I was also annoyed by his patronizing thyself.
He was only a few years older, playing on a god, in fact, a comrade.
Jovial, pompous, authoritarian, arrogant, as suited to him at the moment.
He's all grown up.
He's the chief.
In fact, not everyone, the chairman of the party organization, like all the partisans, but also the independents, the tycoon.
But the chief towered much, especially to those in which he could claim his superiority.
Right now he was rubbing me in for complete crap.
I thought something about my ass, and it took quite an effort not to shoot him in the face.
But I wouldn't even go back to the crusade, let alone continue to make an irritating official.
What would I like to feed two kids from?
And an open house!
I was crying, but I lost my temper.
I won't be happy for him.
"That's all so far, you can go," the audience said, beginning to look again closely at the sheets he had in his hand before.
They called me at 11: 30.
Everyone from the office was there and on questions about it and how, they answered, that it was going to be good.
Only Joe spoke, as was his custom, that he would not be able to throw us all out, for the job would have to be made by the comrade of the chief himself with his loyalty, and that there was no danger.
The word "comrade" pointed out, as if he knew what the old man had shaken me up in the morning.
There was a nice gathering in the Chief's office.
The comrade behind his desk and at the long council table, other comrades, who should have made a decision about my clerical existence or nonexistence.
The vice-chancellor, chairman of ROH, a staff writer for special purposes, something to do in the military, and the Deputy, my boss.
And the person most important, the chairman of the party organization.
I knew him.
An ordinary track laborer, undercut the slingshot or pitches of gravel.
But also a former guard.
There were rumours that he hadn't had any fun with him at the time, said she was a pretty beast.
The bad languages said he had come out in seventh grade, learned nothing, learned nothing.
And when the crime was cancelled, he ended up on a roll at the picks.
But the comrade, yes, the comrade was forged!
The chief motioned me to sit down.
There was a little stew in me, in the throat of an unenviable dart.
The cadaver read a report from the civic committee from the residence.
I come from a working family, I'm married, two kids and so on and so forth.
So far, so good, I thought, and I was getting a little better.
Then a report from the aisle organization.
He copped a report from the civic committee, perhaps writing the same person.
But then it came!
The parents of long-term members of the party, refused to appear before the screening committee, and subsequently from the party, reportedly on medical grounds.
The chief looked at me sharply.
The cadaver noticed it and stopped reading.
The chief gestured for him to proceed.
It was only worse.
I was a member of the city's SSM committee and there I was recruited for the party's candidate.
Regardless of the parents who stepped out of the party, the party gave me the confidence.
But I got married and the wedding, apart from the national committee, was also in the church.
I have disappointed the party's confidence in the worst way.
That's why I was struck off by her candidates.
But it wasn't enough!
I left the two kids baptized, and even my mama, when she died, I went to a church funeral, though it was a former member of the party.
This all shows a negative attitude to the leadership's role.
When he read the order, only tapping the chief's pencil into the desk was punctuated by a tense silence.
Everyone was staring at me, and I wished I was somewhere far away.
At the same time, I kept in my mind to repeat, "Communists-the-superhumans, the communists - the superpeople." What have I gotten myself into?
Why didn't I stay at the blacksmith's?
I could repair the switches without any fucking checked.
But now?
The career of an irritating official took hold of her before she began.
Going back to the platoon?
I'm sure he'll be on my way for an hour.
"Comrade, what was your way of examining this comrade?" The uneasy silence was interrupted by the chief question on the cadaver.
Well, according to a report from the previous occupation.
Do you have it here?
He was obviously not twice.
There was a sweat on the glass, nervously blinking, as if he had checked himself.
He nodded eagerly and handed a paper to the chief.
"Oh," said the chief, with a hint of granite, but often foreshadowed by the storm.
On the first view, the same praise, taught with distinction, studied the industrialist, worked in piecemeal wages as a locksmith, and the standard filled a hundred and twenty percent, on average.
But he's missing the point.
Where did you get that report, Comrade? "He turned back to the cadaver, who felt himself starting to turn against him, and that he might not have had to be a felon very soon.
He gave it to me.
Is that enough for you?
"Well, when he got in, he went to the precinct," he flees.
And there were no reports of him, the extra he was, so I gave it to him in a folder.
"So when you were assigned to a technical function, you did the paper," the chief said dryly.
The cadaver blinked nervously, and there was no answer.
"Never mind," said the chief, obviously relieved.
So far, he has.
"What about you, Comrade?" Said the chief once more to me.
All of a sudden, it's over!
I could feel the heat in my eyes.
He followed a torrent of remorse and accusations, and I knew I was the most disgusting creature in the world who deserved no mercy.
That by subjecting the incomplete report, I said in the error of the comrade's referendum, I did not understand why the report was incomplete when I received it from a cadaver in the factory.
I am also an anti-socialist element that, at the time of building real socialism, promotes reigning religious, even taking part.
That there was a lot of things I did, or maybe I'd still do, and I prayed for it to be over.
I didn't care anymore.
I didn't care that I was going to get out of the mechanic's place.
I didn't care if they took the pick-me-up.
This is a job for honest and decent people, not for the enemy of the people I was in the eyes of the comrade chief.
"That's enough, Comrade Chief," the chairman of the party said abruptly, interrupting the chief's levity.
The comrade made a mistake, a huge mistake.
What a mistake he's done.
But he's already got his punishment!
Don't forget that, Comrade Chief!
What could be worse for a young man than to put a door on his side for time!
To open him up again, he would have to prove that he had changed to be worthy of our trust.
The uneducated bachelorette sounded like a book.
Where did it come from?
Is he so literate or paraded the phrase from stealth training and meetings?
That's why this young comrade must have a chance!
The chance to prove he had changed.
And who should give it to him if not you, Comrade Chief?
It is your duty to this young, true, somewhat misguided comrade, to support his efforts to repair it!
It's your party duty not to be amused by you!
Actually, it's a partisan obligation for all of us.
The comrade must see that the party has not forgotten him.
That as a kind mother, she doesn't only punish him, but that she loves it too.
When the chairman was finished, no one even looked.
No one anticipated such a reversal.
The least I can do.
"I agree with you, Comrade Chairman," the chief said.
If you had let me finish, you would have heard that I was on my way to that conclusion.
Everyone nodded their heads in agreement, but it was obvious they didn't believe him.
"So I was confirmed for the post-independence referendum," I said, when I returned to my office and I began to cry.
Still, in addition to Engineer Evy, everyone was at lunch.
She listened silently to my rambling tale of fresh experiences, and I calmed down in the meantime.
When I finished, she asked if I could have a cup of coffee.
Without waiting for an answer, she put the water on the stove and prepared the cups.
Meanwhile, she was talking about the disciplinary practices.
How one report, often full of praise, puts a man in your hand, and the other in which there's dirt, they send a new employer.
But I didn't end up where I was, but at the bottom of the ring, and so comrades in the factory didn't know where to send it.
And our caboose?
He was just old enough to eat or drink, and it turned out to be what it was.
"He'll take it from the old one," she said maliciously.
I'm sure he won't like it today.
Keep an eye on him.
And the party chairman?
In fact, a far worse chief, no lidumiles.
Nothing from a twirl wielding a great power.
The coffee began to boil, and then the office filled with the smell of coffee.
I dropped the sugar cube into my cup and passed the hot potion in silence.
I guess I'm out of the woods.
Now they don't throw me out, and there aren't any more clearances in three years.
Anyway, the Comrade Chief just won't let me forget today.
It came up in the anthology of literature on the market.
The symbol of the village was alive.
The round of the windpipe over Chlum is spinning again over the years.
You can see it by far, because it's located at fifteen meters of high mast.
People in broad surroundings call him a "fan of Chlum."
For the community, 150 inhabitants became even one of the elements of the general emblem gained by the community for the occasion of the reunion in 2010.
"We asked for a sign then of course, and we wanted a fan, of course, of everyone," said the mayor, George Masek.
The Chluma wind pump is a local technical memory.
It is a bit of a memento of the present: It reminds us of a time when people here fought for good drinking water.
The one in Chluma in recent centuries was a rarity.
In 1910, it was decided by boasting contenders for a solution that then suited up to the mid-1980s.
In the village, they left seven feet of a deep well.
Three years later, the well completed an even metal structure with a wind pump that pumped water into reservoirs at the highest point of the village, near a local church.
"The building was made by Antonc of Hranic on Moray's cargo of 2,400 kronor," says the commemorative inscription on the ground fence of the structure of the mast.
After several repairs and winds of wind, the pump served in 1971.
On May 7, 1973, a new chapter of fighting began to begin: On that day, a new watershed began to serve in Chlum.
The wind pump had left only a dysfunctional municipal symbol and a rarity.
They got the dominoes operational at this year's reunion.
As early as 2008, the Chlumans decided to re-repair the wind round and bring them back to running again.
They made a replica of the original wheel - reduced by a half-metre diameter.
The wheel was alone on the mast, but it must have fallen down that same year.
The replica producer did not select suitable material, and the wheel did not withstand wind gusts.
Then Chluman's dominator rested for several years.
Since June this year, however, the high-mast round is spinning again.
For the occasion of the reunion, the village ordered the replica of the wheel to adjust and relocated it to the top of the iron tower.
But the bike draws useful water from a well into a rapper's blind shoulder.
And over the summer we totally switched him off because there was little water in the well.
At least it was empty.
"Then, in the autumn, the heat of the wind wheel from the pump will be dismantled again from the pump in the suction basket," the Mayor of Masek explained.
Chlum is not the only municipality in the Czech Republic, where the wind-up has been delivered to the general emblem, but is the only one in this kind of place in the Highlands.
A similar feature in the character is in honour of the local technical sights, for example, in the Chvalkovic and Green Hoers in Vyskaya, in Kuželova at Hodoninsk, Partutovik, or in Polici on Vsettnsk.
No hard feelings, but I don't know Lafmel, she admitted to Tripoli Goian.
"The game against Slavia is I remember very well, even my goal, as all in my career," the 34-year-old Goian smiled at a pre-match press conference.
We were trained by Georghe hagi then, it was bad luck we lost.
I hope I'll have a goal even for Sparta.
Just the difference we don't lose this time, "Goian continued.
This man, who has played 60 games for the Romanian representation, is a key supporter of the Greek team.
As a stalwart he will face the raiders of the Spartans offensive.
There will be a few thousand people, no hell, he says of the Greek duel spartan Hybsh.
And in part, he suspects what he might expect on Thursday night.
Well, I know Fatai, who played in Romanian Astra with my brother Lucian.
I've seen all their matches at the time.
I know he's a very good attacker, so he also went to Sparta, Goian said.
He did not name the other players in the Prague Club, and there was a direct question of whether he also knew David Lafont, the best shooter in the history of Czech League and Captain Sparta.
Goian smiled, with a slightly reproachful eye on the Czech journalist.
"Why do you ask me that?"
After a moment's silence he dropped.
We saw some videos and I noticed that Sparta plays a lot of team.
He's got some really good players.
And Lafont?
No offense, but I don't know anyone except Fatai.
The Spartans know about Goian very well.
"He has experience from bigger clubs, you can say he holds the defence of Asteras, it's such their organiser of the game," the Spartans assistant manager Stanislav Hejkal observed.
Goian has had the best years behind him, but he can boast a very interesting football lifespan.
His time was interested in Borussia Dortmund, Stuttgart, both Manchester units United and City, of Steauy but headed for the Italian Palermo, also playing for the Glasgow Rangers.
We're expecting an aggressive and unusual style, says the coach.
Sparta is a great team, playing European cups regularly, pitting for victory in the Czech league.
For me, there's a favourite in this game, but we're playing at home and we want to launch the group with good results.
Like Sparta, we will try to win, Goian said.
I'm in a room with Slovakian goalkeeper Tomas Košice, who is very pleased with his opponent in the Czech Republic.
Me too.
But for the whole team I can say we're going to fight hard.
Kofola is moving from Poland to the Czech Republic, considering joining the Prague Stock Exchange.
The new headquarters should have a Kofola in Ostrava.
Kofola S.A. was registered in Poland for trading shares in the company's shares in the Warsaw Stock Exchange.
Our primary aim is to have the headquarters of the group in the Czech Republic.
The steps we have taken so far in the project are largely legal and administrative, and they do not have a de facto impact on events in society, says Daniel Burysh, finance director of the Kofola group.
"In the context of a move by the headquarters of the group, shareholders are considering the location of the shares on the New York Stock Exchange."
For entry on the Stock Exchange, Prague completes a prospectus of a security, which will be presented at the earliest time by the Czech National Bank for approval.
The transfer of the holdings and related transfers of shares will be carried out in the form of a non-public transaction, taking into account only existing shareholders.
Therefore, no shares will be offered to the public or to the new investors in the context of this operation.
"Any offer of shares to new investors would take place - if so the company and its shareholders will decide - later, either in the 4th quarter 2015 or 1 quarter 2016," the company said.
The company has already said in the past that any share offer could consist of issuing new shares or selling existing shares.
This offer could consist of a stock offering in the Czech Republic and Poland, including the location of the stock and the Warsaw Stock Exchange.
A test of the objectivity of Czech television in informing the migrant crisis.
Another small test of objectivity and balance of news coverage of the main Czech media about the refugee crisis.
This time the broadcast of the main news session of Czech television.
And how did she stand?
When they teach journalism about how the media can manipulate reality, they can release today's broadcast of Czech Television Events.
The migrant crisis was devoted to about 80% broadcast coverage.
For the first minute, the Times reported on the Serbian-Hungarian border and the attacks on the Serbian border, and the attacks on the migrants at the police, called the euphemistically their patience - they threw stones, and attacked the metal rods, the one that was already taking on the names of each of the reports.
Criticism of NGOs - large areas for non-profit organizations that criticize poor treatment of migrants.
The Syrian children in the Czech Republic - the story of the integrated Syrians in the Czech Republic.
Refugees not only as a threat, but as a chance.
Wandering the runaways - TIME has consistently used expressions of a runner or a refugee and not a migrant.
It is especially surprising that the T in illustration is used consistently just and only snapshots on small children and women.
In the same broadcast itself, it said that there were 80% of the men out of the migrants detained in the Czech Republic.
A summary: Of the greater part of propaganda that has no precedent from communist agitators.
I have to say, as a former journalist, I'm ashamed of my colleagues.
Ecology in practice.
When I once got up to the doll's apartment, I soon ceased to be the only resident.
I got fish moving in on the makeshift toilet.
The bluebird of the native, an insect with a metamorphosis, that is, that does not make the transition from a caterpillar to a beetle and the cub looks like an adult, only tiny, and gradually increasing.
They were disgusting and I hated them.
First by hand and later, and chemically.
The socialist drugmakers on their disposal provided a kind of blue crystal.
I think it was called Cyclone B.
Or something else?
But it was eliminated successfully.
Later, I dealt with the pharaohs.
A box with a kind of juvenile juvenile who carried the ants into the nest, and then he would not allow the queen to generate new progeny.
But I turned it off.
As time went on, the insects became an object of my admiration, and I increasingly clung to the view that they have the same right to life as we humans.
Moreover, I have learned from my life that it is not possible to succeed in an ecosystem, and one can replace one of the pests.
I don't think I'd change my karma for their killing.
In a new home, we agreed with my partner that if we weren't going to be bitten by the teeth, they would be eating their dandelions of loose skin, some of those invisible algae and the like.
Their peace of mind was broken by a spider.
It was a common kind of bitten that has long housed on the ceiling.
We thought he lived from occasional mucus and mosquitoes, which only increased our comfort.
Since he's been there for years, we've discovered that he's lived mostly by fish, and that he seems to have kept his numbers on a massive scale.
A confidential regular contact at each accomplished need has been found to be the female.
We were seeing romantic talk with a partner about a third of the smaller as they gingerly strutted on the threads of the web, so that it would not be eaten before it reached its desired copulation.
It took about three days when they didn't move and they didn't respond to our checks.
Beneath the toilet bowl, where the love games were taking place, we found traces of dried velvet next to the female.
Then the spider didn't move for weeks.
When we thought it was over, we were surprised by a number of little spider-trackers hanging in her neighborhood.
Soon they disappeared.
They were eaten by their mother; they ran away.
Even the female has gone somewhere after a week.
If she went away or passed away, we don't know, but after a month or two, she showed up on the ceiling.
The truth, a little less, probably the daughter of that great-looking toilet.
She regarded our behaviour carefully from the ceiling for some time and moved under the toilet bowl to assess our non-aggression as a friendship.
The numerical condition of the much-hyped fish was reduced again, and the spider slowly looked at its normal activities to provide food.
For a year, our ecosystem hasn't changed.
Our daughter among this grew to an age when using the potter was a disgrace.
We have tolerated it so far, but the eternal healing of its contents has been bothering us.
We picked it up more strongly to use the toilet.
The daughter, however, found an excuse in that spider on which she could see very well.
Our talk of a spider seen, no luck in the house at all.
Crying and screaming, she forced her trouser.
There was no other way.
There was a time for a spider, in the interest of a daughter's developmental shift, to command.
It's all over me.
He was caught in the glass and posted across the balcony into the garden.
I said goodbye to him as my friend, but I felt disgusted after so much of my life, as if I was throwing a relative.
We assumed the fish would begin to appear more frequently and begin to set up a geometric series.
Come on, one week, two, we didn't find any.
I started speculating about the cause.
I wondered if there was a spider in the direction of the ants, somehow, that the toilet environment wasn't as conducive to their existence as we thought.
But then the first pieces of medium size came up, and they were swelling again.
I had to think of a different theory about the cause of their disappearance, and I figured that their link to spider must have had a cause when they couldn't see it, that it was hidden in a different place, and that there was danger from anywhere.
Or maybe they had some kind of telepathic connection to their predator, and his rapid disappearance triggered some sort of alarm.
It's more like I have no illusions about their eyesight.
They showed some light, but they wouldn't react.
My daughter goes to the bathroom on a regular basis.
I think she forgot her potty.
The only thing left to do is attract a spider.
I'm already sending my wish to the ether, and I hope they didn't give up on me after the execution.
Otherwise we'd have to use that Cyclone B.
The desatero productions of Albert Einstein, which has enriched the world.
A century of genius scientist from the last century never ceases to fascinate humanity.
He was able to immerse himself so deep that the crop was always astounding.
Albert Einstein (1879-1955) was one of the most important scientists of all time.
In particular, the consciousness of people entered its special and general theory of relativity, which so far is best described by the universe in its gigantic proportions.
His explanation of the photoeffect, or the idea of quantum electromagnetism, cannot be neglected.
There is no doubt that the desktop itself, and a system of knowledge of popular relativity, is so complex for many that it prefers to choose easy diameters for closer acquaintance.
But it is not easy.
Of course, it wouldn't be Albert Einstein, if, even on this, he found a brilliantly simplified form of explanation: An hour in the vicinity of your lover seems a minute away; a minute in a hot oven seems an hour - and that's relativity.
I allowed myself from his entire pleather of famous quotes to select the ten which literally captivated me.
Intelligent people try to solve problems, genius is trying not to.
Only two things are infinite.
Space and human stupidity.
I'm not sure about the first one.
No amount of attempts can ever prove I was right.
But he can only prove that I was wrong.
But it is a sad period when it is easier to smash an atom than to destroy the prejudices.
If a mess on the table reflects a mess in the mind, what then does it reflect on an empty table?
I don't know what will be fought in the Third World War, but it will be sticks and stones in the fourth.
There are thousands of ways to kill time, but no way to resurrect it.
Knowing little is dangerous and knowing much too.
If I had an hour to master an issue on which my life would depend, I would spend 40 minutes of his studies, 15 minutes of his analysis, and 5 minutes of his solution.
In the world, the hardest thing to understand about income tax.
To conclude, I can't forgive myself by not teaching Einstein to the definition of success: Given A's success, the formula is: A = X + Y + Z, where X is work, Y rest, and Z keep its mouth shut.
New and modern.
Hospitals in the Zlín region await changes in 1.5 billion.
"It's a success considering that this year, all four are held in black numbers," said contender Stanislav Mikula.
The total profit of the county facilities is about $32 million at this point.
The share of that is mainly higher payments from insurance companies, which are equally favourable for this year.
This, too, shows that after poor years, hospitals can finally afford more investment.
This is what will happen to the structures, which together will cost almost £1.5 billion thanks to this.
The long period when we were shopping mainly equipment was over.
Now we have to build new buildings, because without them, it is not possible to do without them, the regional undersecretary's plans for the health care system.
She is looking forward to changes in all hospitals.
Builders will come to the hospitals next year.
They now select a new internal pavilion for nearly 300 million.
In Krometers they have a scheduled port of dialysis.
The Utah Hair wants a new intern for roughly 200 million this year to open the central pavilion.
And the country's Baze hospital awaits the long-delayed construction of a new central income, and an interland, for which it will be worth three quarters of a billion.
In all cases, it is essential and often the biggest changes in recent years.
"This is an extremely important step for the entire region, patients, and doctors," said the hospital administrator Vera Proust, for example.
The five-story building is supposed to be there in about two years, and offers comfort equipment for an intern as well as neurology, dialysis, new ambulance, a bed and a unit of intensive care.
Greater comfort for patients.
The changes that most notably patients will receive is touched by all regions.
In fact, the new buildings will be replaced by those in which, for example, many of the sick on one's room, on the floor to have just one toilet, the beds are unloaned, the windows are immaculate, and paramedics don't have adequate conditions for work.
"Our intern, for example, was built thirty-five years ago and now is on the line of its lifespan," said the director of Zhou Hospital, Paul Calábek.
Within a few years, it will be replaced by a seven-storey modern building linked to an urgent income.
Doctors and patients will all have emergency departments in one place, in addition to new rooms.
The same model has already taken out of the halfway house of the Uheric Hradier.
The central income is now, and there will be an interstate within three years.
"We will pay the construction from the loan and in part from our own funds," explained director Peter Slage.
This hospital is the only one in the country to allow itself to be funded.
Profits are still highest, and there were no losses until two years ago when a House hospital was struggling with a nearly two-year-old loss.
"We have a good deal with insurers, excellent performance, we will raise revenue and manage the costs throughout the hospital," listed Owned Vajpayee, who has an economy in charge.
Patients at the Chronicle Hospital will also receive improvement.
Within ten to fifteen years he would go into repairs, new instruments and a reconstruction of up to half a billion kronor.
The repair station will be repaired this year, then the port of dialysis, or construction of a building for a new MRI machine, will begin.
Managing regional hospitals
+ 5.5 miles.
Plus 900 thousand.
Zahra Hradiště
+ 18 miles.
+ 13 miles.
+ 3.8 miles.
+ 8.8 miles.
Vsetín
+ 4 miles.
+ 9 miles.
The data are always 31 July of that year.
No one has explained how I should maintain the refugees in the country when they do not want to live in the Czech Republic.
The interior minister, Milan Chovanec (ČSSD), has complained after the negotiations with his European colleagues that the rest of the Czech Republic is pushing for the adoption of quotas for the redistribution of refugees, but they reject any discussion.
He also observes that he has yet to explain how he would maintain the allotted refugees in the Czech Republic when they do not want to live with us.
"We didn't get the answer, and we wanted the quotas to be released from the final text," Chovanec told the newspaper.
Can you, more specifically, describe the position you have come at the meeting of the European Union's cabinet ministers and abroad?
We disagree with mandatory quotas as a system that simply cannot function.
We can't talk about migrants as bags of salt or flour.
They're living beings who have some visions, they go somewhere, they have relatives.
We wanted to hear from colleagues how we were able to keep migrants in the territory of the Member States if they were redistributed.
We can't imagine.
We didn't get the answer, and we wanted the quotas to be released from the final text.
With the other conclusions - functional hotspots, registration places, border protection, camps outside Europe, a trust fund for African countries and other things, we have no problem with that.
We've been talking about this for a year and we say this is the way.
But saying quotas would solve everything?
We got forty grand a year ago, now it's a hundred and twenty thousand.
When will it be five hundred thousand?
And how do we keep those people in the area?
Ninety-eight percent of all the people who come across us want to go to Germany.
There's almost no one for us, we just don't know how to keep them here.
We have the ambition to walk by other foreigners, Ukrainians, Vietnamese, and others who take the Czech Republic as a target country, gaining asylum with us, but the interest of the people of this migration wave, from Syria and other countries, is limited close to zero.
You mentioned that we don't even want the refugees, but fifteen hundred people have already pledged to accept.
Wouldn't it be possible to take more of them?
We have pledged to accept 1500 people, but with the condition.
We said: Functional hotspots, border control, military operations.
Even with 1,500, there's going to be 1100 people that we can deal with with an asylum procedure.
They will come into our detration facility and we will treat them as well as those we have caught.
It is a big issue, and we will be debating with Europe if we can contain people who will be registered in Italy and Greece, possibly in Hungary.
Since Europe is behaving so that they have a marketing authorisation, they cannot be detained.
That means, they'll come to our territory with the registrations, and if there's a deal that's not yet, it may be that we won't even be able to keep it in the Czech Republic, after coming back to Germany.
If we can detain them for the duration of the asylum procedure, we will deal with them with an asylum procedure.
If it is the citizens of Syria, Eritrea and almost 98 per cent, according to European statistics, international protection is obtained.
Then they get the papers that will allow them to travel across Europe.
And I think these people will end up in target countries once again.
Then there are four hundred people who will be relocated.
That's the second project that's breaking yet, and we've made progress just in that we debase ourselves with churches about the possibility that they should be able to help them get employment, accommodation and so on.
But that's a run on a very long line.
You said that at the meeting of ministers, the rest of us were unwilling to discuss.
But isn't it the case that the Czech Republic only rejects quotas, but offers no solidarity move to ward off the debate?
And what exactly does that take to be a solidarity step?
If the Federal Republic of Germany says an incentive that all of Syria's migrants can reach them, the message is spread throughout the hours after all the camps across Europe, but also in Turkey, Jordan.
It encourages another migration wave heading to Germany because they just don't want us to.
We think the path is to protect the external borders - simply to deter those migratory waves, to help the needy, and to separate economic migrants.
They clearly show them they don't have a chance.
Last year alone, fifty thousand Kosovans came to Germany.
From safe Kosovo, where we pay all saturation of this state, including police, courts, prosecution witnesses.
If we were able to separate them and not accept them or only accept them according to the needs of their economies, the fifty percent of what the welfare systems would spend on them today might be for refugees.
Compared to the first day that Germany had implemented controls, the number of detainees jumped in the Czech Republic.
Now it's eighty, the first day it was 12.
Where should it go to tighten controls on the border?
We were afraid of a plot in the order of hundreds of people.
These are the numbers we can manage.
We still have several hundred vacancies in stone detritus facilities.
Of course, all the people we hold will be returned to Austria within seven days.
We do it by default.
The Austrians are the only ones who take these people away, with Hungary it's complex and the Greeks - that's a completely useless story.
So where is the breaking point?
Would it have to be a thousand a day?
I think it would have to be a couple of hundred a day.
Two hundred, three hundred people a day for two, three consecutive days will run out of capacity enough to make contingency plans.
Then I agree with the Prime Minister that he would immediately call an emergency government.
He's very interested in the whole thing, we're in contact several times a day.
If the situation arises, the government can sit down de facto immediately, and one resolution would decide to strengthen the police on the military, give it a customs administration, or prison service.
The extreme option is the state of emergency, which has now been declared in some places by Hungary?
I don't think this is going to happen this far.
Keep in mind that our position is different, we are a national state within Europe, we only have the Schengen border and only at the airport.
I don't know what would have to happen for this to happen in the territory of the Czech Republic, I don't want to spread the alarm.
All the information we have, whether from Moldova, Serbia, Hungary, suggests that the Hungarians will attempt to divert the migration stream to Croatia and Slovenia, which would then be a direct route to Austria.
The Czech Republic would be affected very marginally, almost at all.
Slavia repaid much of the debt at the last minute.
He's trying to prevent bankruptcy.
Football Slavia paid for debts.
The footballers did their money.
Football Slavia stood Tuesday for the first time because of insolvency proceedings before the court.
Nearly three months after she filed for her for about $20 million, she was filed by an Online Services company from Pacific Samoa.
Solicitor General Slavie Susan Matula tried to convince Judge Michael Wenzil within hours that he had no intention of declaring over Slade.
And it must be said she had arguments.
One of the main arguments was that last week, the new owner Slavie became a large Chinese industrial and investment group CEFC and also the Czech billionaire Jiří Shimana.
Obviously from new owners to the club, money came in at the last minute.
This is also evidenced by Slavie's statement ahead of Tuesday's court hearing - a drilling club on Monday, just a day before the hearing in the trial, sent owed by tens of millions of crowns.
"All were between September 11 and the 15th September," said the legal representative, Slavie Mousle.
Who did Slavia pay?
Current and former players and business partners.
In particular, for example, the Slovak expatriate Milan Ivanov or the Czech reserve minister Maria Liška.
Slavia also reserved a charge of agent Alexandru Losenick.
On Friday, the club had also paid the outstanding fees of the City Council of Prague 10.
As a result, the insolvency dispute remains de facto only a claim that Slavie disputes.
Either by the club, they are not incurred or held by lawsuits.
However, we are prepared to pay in the event of such disputes.
"We have the necessary funds in the bank account, which we can provide a statement from the account," she told the judge's lawyer.
"All that was by maturity is paid," said the Met, adding that it would not be paid for only non-existing or disputed commitments.
It is also certain that in the next few days a judge will decide and the procedure will continue.
She gave Slavia three weeks to send detailed evidence that she actually paid those debts.
Subsequently, there will be an assessment of all evidence.
The decision can therefore be expected as early as November.
The judge ordered continued negotiations on third November.
However, the decision will not fall on that meeting, but only in writing.
Medals for Fines and Austrians.
FastMiG X is the creator of the latest generation of Inverness Divorce Resources.
The combination of high-tech, hardware, and software integrated into modular structures delivers benefits and rapid returns on investments of high quality, productivity, and reliability.
FastMiG X is a modular system, so a final report is always configured according to customer requirements.
And any, from welding design steel to welding of specialty alloys, as well as welding crude materials after welding thin weeds, from apps in the works to welding at the shipyard.
An incredible amount of welding curves, simple settings, and the broadening of the welding power source can quickly respond to a change in requirements, leading to a reduction in spatial disruption, to the need to rebuild resources and more productive welding.
FastMiG X allows welding top welding processes, developed by Kemppi, which provide higher productivity and the quality of welding.
There is no time to waste, and there is no waste of material or repairing bad wellies.
There is flexibility, there is less space, more welding, and higher profits.
It's this year's news, which premiered in Nitra, where she also won the gold medal.
These must be taken very seriously, as they confirm the specificity of the product.
World-leading manufacturers can boast similar systems, but with differences in software and parameters, they include FastMig X to the world peak.
There are certainly enjoyable delivery times for the candidates, which range around three weeks.
In the Czech Republic we have already made our first contacts, which will surely extend after the early trade fair.
We have been his regular attendees for over twenty years, and our business results are almost always better than before him, highlighting ARC-H Miroslav Streichsbier, head shop manager Kemppi in Pilsen.
FastMiG X is a modular system, so a final report is always configured according to customer requirements.
Blanca was going to build it so it didn't fall apart.
But it would cost half a billion more, says an expert from the company that projected the tunnel.
Blanca could also be made safer, says the expert.
The tunnel complex could be built so as not to catch the two drops of the earth in the Prague Tree, the production manager of Satra, which is the main projectionist of the tunnel, Alexander Butovich.
He said it on Wednesday night at a journalistic tour of the tunnel.
But it would be about half a billion crowns more expensive.
The drivers will open on Saturday afternoon.
It's always a compromise between price and security.
"The tunnel went up safer, but costs rise exponentially," said Butovich.
The conditions in the Machine were the same for him all the time, yet the country fell just a few steps away from where it started to come out of a safer and more cautious method.
"If the measure was used 500 metres earlier, the tunnel would have been half a billion more expensive," said Butovich.
The Blanca tunnel collapsed three times during construction.
Twice, in 2008, a crater was made in Stromness, in 2010, the ground dropped at the Ministry of Culture in Prague 6.
According to the manager of Metropolitan South Whitehall, the tunnel was unnecessarily expensive, the Times reported.
The building was expected to cost £17 billion, according to the original intention.
When we add VAT, which has jumped twice in the period of construction, twenty-seven billion in twenty-one billion.
When the technology comes to it, purchases of land and engineering activities, indexation and such items are $29 billion, which is not since the 37 again, said Whitehaven.
Someone ordered that and paid for it.
IOS 9: How to get an iPhone's new operating system
The new operating system may be requested in Settings if you click the "General" tab and select "Software Update" (software updates).
When ready, it offers your phone to download and then install it.
Some users have teamed up with the problem after the installation, specifically with the error message "update software has failed."
One of the solutions to this problem is to wait for them to fall out of interest in the update, or to try out for them via iTunes.
The phone will guide you through the update process.
And that includes the need to uninstall applications to release the site - but that won't be necessary as Apple's update has shrunk, and it has also facilitated the process by using a special tool that will suggest apps to delete and re-install after the update is completed.
Make sure your phone is charged before you set up an update.
If the battery's low status is low, Apple will not allow an update, since breaking the process could cause an update error.
Other reports: The issue of iOS 9 has not been postponed, despite delay by WatchOS; review iOS 9: Exciting update of a new version of the operating system; iOS9: How to prepare for the release of the new operating system for the iPhone
Make sure you've come through our list of things to do before the updates to try and prevent or face protections in front of them. IOS 9 will present new features, including an even smarter personal assistant and a great range of creative functions for the iPad, as well as many patches to speed up and repair the operating system.
FedEx's gains mixed, cut fiscal outlook for 2016
FedEx reported disappointing results for the last quarter and a huge reduction in annual earnings forecasts due to low demand for freight and higher costs for the land division.
The company also said it plans to hire about 55,000 seasonal workers over the holidays.
In this period last year, FedEx announced it would be hiring for a vacation of 50,000 seasonal workers.
Shares of the company fell about 2.5 percent in pre-market trading 45 minutes before Wednesday's opening.
FedEx says it expects earnings of between $10.40 and $10,90 for the fiscal year that ends next May, meaning a fall of 20 cents from the previous forecast.
Analysts expected $10.84, according to a survey conducted by FactSet.
The reduced outlook comes despite an increase in interest rates averaging 4.9 per cent, which will take effect in January 4, and higher surcharges for land transport heavy or large packages starting in November.
The company said it is still expecting profit growth relative to the previous year due to cost cuts, higher revenue and growth in online trading.
Chairman of the board of directors and CEO Fred Smith said the company was "showing strong performance despite weaker than expected economic conditions, especially in manufacturing and global trade."
Plans for holiday hire have been announced the day after rival company UPS said it plans to hire 90 000 to 95 000 extra workers, which is about as much as they hired last year.
In the quarter, which ended August 31, FedEx gained $692 million, which is 6 percent more than last year.
Earnings per share were $2.42, less than $2.44 per share, which was forecast by 12 analysts questioned by Zacks Investment Research.
Sales rose 5 percent, to $12.3 billion.
Six analysts surveyed by Zacks expected $12.23 billion.
In recent years, FedEx has been hit by the decline in priority international shipping, which has caused revenues in its Express unit to stagnate.
But the boom in online shopping has boosted the results of a FedEx task force.
In the last quarter, land revenue rose 29 percent, but operating profit was essentially the same because of higher prices for larger packages and own insurance.
The Express unit recorded a higher income due to higher basic rates, while profits declined in the cost of trading due to higher prices for the workforce.
In pre-market trading, about an hour before the release of FedEx's shares fell $3.85, or 2.5 percent, to $150.15.
They ended Tuesday with a decline of 11 percent for the year and 17 percent below the record of June 11.
At its most anticipated meeting in years, federal reserve lawmakers will spend two days settling at a 27-foot-long honorean mahogany table this week, and will decide whether after nearly a decade has come to increase the key interest rate.
Towering over them at one end of the central bank's ornamentation, the two-story boardroom will be a mural of the United States.
The map is a reminder that Chair Fed Janet L. Yellen and her colleagues are supposed to give the nation's economic interests above all else.
The central bank has a double charge from Congress: To maximize US employment and keep prices stable.
But, since the Great Recession, the Fed officials acknowledged that there is a non-written third term: Financial stability.
And this third term could be an X-factor in too close to the predictable decision to be announced on Thursday, about whether the U.S. economy is ready to launch in the shutout of unprecedented stimulus in the form of near-zero short-term rates at the site since late 2008.
Although much of the data shows solid growth in the economy, recent turbulence in world financial markets could already be cautious by the Fed for adding to volatility by raising its benchmark federal funds rate - as well as nothing more than just a quarter of a percentage point.
"Obviously, the labor market and inflation will be the most important thing to watch in the first place," said Lindsey M. Piegza, chief economist at broker Stifel Nicolaus & Co.
"But I think they were just looking for an excuse to not increase the rate, the increased uncertainty surrounding the global market is already providing them with sufficient justification further to wait," she said.
There is no consensus about what the Fed will do, which itself is the cause of nervousness in financial markets.
About half of economists recently asked Blomberg to raise rates this week.
However, financial markets expect the Fed to delay the issue, with a key indicator only about a 30% chance of an increase.
This would point to a decline in the stock market in the event that the Fed raises rates, only if politicians make the soft-drop promise that another increase is in arrears.
On Tuesday, the Dow Jones industrial average jumped 228,89 points, or 1.4%, to 16 599.85.
The rally was run by expectations that Fed officials would delay rates this week in peace, says John Lonski, chief economist at Moody's Capital Markets Research Group.
"It would be a surprise for the Fed to raise rates now," she states.
Should policymakers have done it, "they would have to go all the way to the extremes in their programming statement and hold financial markets behind their hands so they don't panic."
Other experts said an increase in rates would reassure financial markets because it would remove uncertainty about how the Fed would proceed.
Just a month ago, the Fed seemed on a good path to raise the rate by 0.25 percentage point this month, the first small step in the slow tightening of monetary conditions that would confirm the strength of an economic recovery in the US.
Yellen said that over the spring and early years, it expected an increase in rates this year despite complaints from the Liberals that more economic progress is needed.
Even as job creation slowed in August, the labor market has seen solid growth this year.
The unemployment rate has fallen to 5.1% in the previous month, which is the lowest in more than seven years, and it is close to the level that the Fed considers full employment.
Wage gains showed signs of lift.
And even as inflation remains under an annual 2% target for the central bank, the Fed's policymakers claim that the main reason was the temporary effect of significantly lower oil prices.
The economy "can cope with higher rates and needs them, with regard to the close to the labor market," said Ian Shepherdson, chief economist at Pantheon Macroeconomics.
But financial markets around the world began to struggle at the end of last month after China devalued its currency.
The Dow Jones industrial average fell by as much as 16% below its record level in May, as investors feared the slowing Chinese economy was pulling down global growth.
The market has rebounded somewhat this month, and the Dow is losing only nearly 10% of the May peak.
The Fed's uneasy situation on the market is a complex calculation to begin with an increase in interest rates.
"In the absence of what has happened in financial markets, and reports of weakness in the Chinese economy in the last few weeks, there would be a tightening at this meeting," said Stephen D. Oliner, lead researcher at UCLA Ziman Center for Real Estate and a former Fed official.
They now predict they will wait for at least a month to get better control of the consequences.
"There's a lot of uncertainty about what impact this will have on the US economy, and they have almost no data to rely on for the latest developments in China," Oliner said.
The health condition of the global economy is not one of the Fed's main concerns, so it should not technically be included in their decision-making.
But in fact, the Fed has become the currency authority of the world.
The central bank's influence in recent years has been enormous.
The mere hint of then-chairman Ben S. Bernanke in 2013 that the Fed could "narrow down" their monetary expansion in the market has triggered crashes around the world.
In a world where markets and economies are increasingly closely linked, it can be expected that the Fed's officials are watching the development elsewhere, but they are also consulting with other central bankers and experts in order to better read the global economy.
Their decision-making process is "more art than science," said Zachary Karabell, head of global strategy for wealth management firm Envestnet Inc.
Jeffrey Lacker, president of the Federal Reserve Bank in Richmond, Va., noted earlier this month that "the Fed has a history of exaggerated with movements in financial markets that seem incoherent with economic fundamentals."
Lacker, a voting member of the Federal Open Market Committee's policy of making policy, cited the 1998-99 decision as an example.
The financial crisis in Asia led the Fed to cut its benchmark rate by 0.75 percentage points during the three sessions "despite limited identifiable impacts on growth in the US," Lacker said.
A year later, the Fed officials turned these cuts.
The Fed should prioritise concerns about financial stability only during the big crisis, such as the market collapse of 2008, said Adam Posen S., a former member of the Board of Standing Committee at the Bank of England.
The latest tumult is not even close to that level, he said.
"I'm sure you don't want to be in a position of fear of growth rates because the markets have gotten upset," said Posen, president of the Institute for International Economics Peterson.
The Federal Reserve Act has a dual mandate, and it does not mention financial stability, and until it changes, I don't think they should be getting on top.
Do you need a great Thai market?
Try LAX-C in Chinatown.
Yes, Chinatown
The market / warehouse was opened in 1997 and is owned by LAX-C Inc.
Often referred to as Thai Costco, LAX-C is a wholesale Thai market that also sells for the public.
Yes, it's a Chinatown, not a Thai neighborhood.
The market / warehouse is the only contact point offered by an astonishing number of fresh, frozen and dried goods, popular Thai and Asian snacks, and kitchen utensils, furniture, religious and holiday decorations.
There's even a car part if you need a bit of motor oil.
The store is massive, and it will take over an hour.
If you're getting hungry from all this, go for a meal at LAX-C BBQ Express.
The interior trade stall (good, cheap) is close to registers and it has various sampling places.
What's in stock: You need something - anything - Thai?
At LAX-C, you'll probably find that.
Items are affordable and a lot of items are sold at large.
The limits on fresh products include special Asian and regional Thai herbs, fruits and others.
The spread of meat is great, for example, fish - employees at the counter will wash and bone you, even fry it for you, if you want it,
A good part of the trade is left to a massive freezer section where you can find frozen curry leaves, bitter watermelon and galangal, whole ducks, fish, beef blood and bile, pork guts, fish balls, regional sausage, bulk-selling semi-trailers, and more.
Who buys here: Owners of restaurants and chefs, also separate families and individuals.
Broad avenues go to meet shopping carts and high-rise carriages.
Find: A fresh monthong durian next to the stand of the treasury.
Where it is: A shop is in an industrial part of Los Angeles, surrounds of the outskirts of China's neighborhood and downtown - a few blocks from Philippe The Original.
Parking: Lax-C has its own parking lots, which it shares with other stores and restaurants.
While the shop may be booked, parking is usually not hard to find.
The speed on the highways will remain the same.
An acceleration at 150 km / h was rejected by the House.
The maximum permitted speed limit of up to 150 km / h on selected stretches of motorways will not be able to increase under favourable conditions.
On Tuesday, she had decided the House as she approached an amendment to the Senate, which rejected the rate increase.
The paper on land roads now heads to the president.
President Milos Zeman has said in late April that the law allowing a stoppage-time speed vetoed.
The transport minister Dan Jiok (for YES), under which the Czech motorway network has so far been built for such a speed, has been against the increase.
The Chiefs on Tuesday supported a Senate version of the law.
The approved amendment will now allow in line with the original government's proposal to increase the rate from 90 to 110 kilometres per hour on selected first-class roads, especially four-wicket.
The House first extended that option to motorways, on which it would be able to drive at selected sections at speeds of up to 150 km / h, but the Senate refused.
The MPs have now taken to his proposal.
The senators, with the approval of the transport minister from the amendment, also removed the authority of the transport police to have the final say in regulating local communications, which are cared for by the community.
The Senate version, which the House approved, also counts for plumbing, plumbing, or public-lighting cables to be stored lengthwise beneath the pavement's surface.
Commuters would thus be spared for buying the land.
Municipalities should also not be obliged to take care of road vegetation along local roads, regardless of owner of the relevant property.
The news is also meant to help improve road safety and facilitate the handling of towing vehicles to which owners don't report.
The new municipalities may be able to sell towed vehicles, which will not be reported within a six-month period following the notification of a departure from their owners.
Commuters will be able to rule out transit freight traffic across their territory along the roads of others and third classes under the threat of a fine even for the oil companies.
The paper is also cancelling the possibility of introducing electronic highway signs instead of existing paper, which will also be used after 1 January next year.
According to the government, this will save money for the implementation of the electronic system.
An equestrian ex-mayor goes to trial.
He faces 10 years for the purported welcome of the bandstands.
The case concerns an allegedly purported project to welcome the bandwagon.
Police wanted to prosecute in this case to the MEP Susan Kailova (SD), the House of Commons, but she did not issue it.
According to legal qualifications, the case faces up to ten years in prison.
The main account is scheduled for two October days so far.
According to the state's attorney, Mansell, with the macking, caused a loss of at least one million kronor, stemming from the indictment.
The applicant relies on an expert opinion.
Former members of the city's leadership, according to the plaintiffs, in the title of their duties were improperly allowed to acquire the property benefits of a society that was organizing the welcome of the bandstands.
According to the indictment of the then chief executive of city services, education and culture, he ordered him to address five linked companies in the selection process.
When another company volunteered for the competition, which offered the lowest price, the board cancelled the competition.
The order then had the city confided to the administrator, and only Darothore filed for the competition, which was then allocated by the City Council.
The city paid at least a million extra.
Both charges have been framed by the aim of providing for Darothore the award of a public contract for the organisation of the multi-centerpiece event in Ústí nad Labem in the long term and in a coordinated manner, at least in a coordinated manner, at least in breach of the requirement to act with the care of a proper serviceman, the national prosecutor has written.
At the same time, they claim to be aware that Darothore is subsequently charged by Darothore, after the acquisition of the contract, of the Ústí nad Labem for the implementation of the multi-storey event, which will be disproportionately increased relative to the fair value of the services actually provided.
In three years, the company has collected more than five million kronor for the project.
The city eventually paid only one part, roughly $1.7 million, then stepped away from the contract.
The amount paid, according to the expert report, was at least a million crowns per year.
Mansell had previously rejected any violations.
I'm innocent.
I don't understand this case, a former mayor has said that the city under his leadership has only followed up on a similar project from past years.
In 2008-2010, the event was provided by the Roxy II Agency.
"It was under the same terms, for the same money," Mansell added.
The criminals were initially wanted to accuse MPs of Kailova, who was also a member of the city council.
But the House did not issue it to the prosecutions.
As a result, the criminalists have postponed in her case, but they are counting on Kaila's charge after he ends up with her congressional mandate.
It was a social event that took place several times a year.
The mothers gave them a gift cheque for £5,000 to buy children's needs and small gifts.
The Hungarian policemen reportedly released the dog.
Then they added journalists to delete the record.
The Hungarian police said on the border with Serbia briefly detained the Cameraman of the AP and forced him to delete the footage, on which the police dog allegedly knocked over the country's refugee.
But the Hungarian government is challenging the accusation.
The alleged incident happened on Saturday night when cameraman AP Luca Muzi filmed the migrants crossing the border with Serbia over the cornfields near the Hungarian city of Röszke.
Policemen took action against the fugitives, and one of them allowed one of them to attack the dog with a basket on his nose.
The dog of a man who shouted "Please, I'm a refugee," he lounged, says Muzi.
The fact that Muzi was filming was noticed by one of the policemen, and he wouldn't let him go.
The reporter was no longer allowed to call his superiors or colleagues in place.
They took Muzi's officers to a dark place at the registration center for the refugees, and they asked him to show them what he had recorded.
Then he ordered him to delete the record.
The mutation thus came as a result of two-day work in Serbia and Hungary.
He says he felt threatened because there were dogs nearby.
The AP sent a protest letter to the speaker of the Hungarian Government, Zoltan Kovács.
The behavior of the police has called it unacceptable, and stated that journalists should be able to cover events without risking physical violence, and they did not have to worry about the government destroying the material legally obtained.
Kovacs, referring to the police report of Muzi's account of the events, has been questioned.
He said the cops only wanted the journalist to show them whether they were on some shots, to which they said they had the right.
When they found out they weren't there, they didn't make it easy.
"Dogs can bark - they are trained to be deterred and a little bitching about, but they haven't attacked with certainty," Kovacs says.
An unpredictable Champions League.
Win at City kick-off, believes Juventus
"It's disappointing, I don't think we deserved to lose," said Manuel Pellegrini, a corner of Home City.
We had more chances and we played better than Juventus.
It was a classic A-League game.
Neither team made much of an occasion, but the ball on the kick was we had longer.
"The cause of the defeat wasn't in the tactics, Juventus just shot two beautiful goals," ranked Pellegrini, whose team collected in a competitive game for long 636 minutes.
The finale of Juventus last season was exactly the opposite of each other - after the Italian League's first three rounds, the Italian league had only a point in the title, and the 2-4 score was at the 16th of the table.
That's why the turnaround at Etihad Stadium was a big surprise.
"This win will psychologically help us, he'll kick us," says Massimiliano Allegri, who had to deal with the loss of three contenders - Pirla, Tévez and Vidala, before the new year.
There were Pogba, Manchukip and Morata in Manchester.
"It's so, this victory is so important, perhaps thanks to him we're going to win the wave," Morata hopes.
Because when we're on it, we rank among the best teams in Europe.
In the second half, we were better, especially in an attack phase.
This is what my players deserve.
"Before our match goal, we could have picked up at 0-2, but Gianluigi held up," he praised Allegri goalkeeper Buffon.
"We've burned some good chances," Yayu Touré, Treasurer of City, deadpanned.
We have to take from the Champions League experience and next time try for a better result.
Bye-bye, Angela, bye-bye to old Germany Il.
Before we continue the question of immigrants, we should be aware that the entire media fracas around it are managed by professionals.
From the needs of the media and from above.
And so let's stop for a minute.
Today, the newspaper and the media are full of kids carrying their parents along the dirt roads of the exodus.
And it brings in a man - a European man - automatically a sense of guilt and compassion.
Well, they don't just come in desperate kids, notice the footage of the boats landing on the Greek islands that the tiggers don't see much of them!
Well, they have recently vanished from television images of ships heading for Lampedusa, fleeing the French border at Menton, whose beautiful promenade is being depleted by thousands of young men.
Of a large part of young black men.
And the images from Callais, where these snowmen and black men wait, had disappeared, and the black men were waiting to see if they could go through the tunnel beneath La Manche.
He probably won't take it any more.
Even those images of the primitive Christian church of Eritreans somehow made a peculiar impression on the people of Europe.
Too much of a fallacy.
So when it comes to the quotas for the runaways, it somehow gets caught up, that it's not just about unhappy kids from Syria, but also about the botched-for-older: The fashionable-looking-young man.
They look like they just came out of a gym.
Just one personal experience.
This summer, on Turkish-Muslim-part of Cyprus, we lay at the private beach of the hotel.
No matter how private she was, a great group of cars came to the beach.
But no ham.
And there were young black men.
About thirty men and five women.
Age between 15 and 30.
They entered the beach, all dressed in designer clothing and shoes In hands, how else, smartphones.
That it is a private beach was not interested and workers - Turks, Muslims! - evidently feared them.
They put all the rest of the chairs out.
Who wasn't lying on it, and he was in the sea, bad luck.
They were both made of an American rapperous film.
On the heads of the hat with fingernail, white and coloured adidas on their feet.
Then they circled the local beach bar and began to feast.
They put the tables around, crammed in beside the sitting snow and white guests of the bar - read to Muslims and Europeans without asking.
Mothers with children fled from the dining terrace to somewhere quiet.
Incoming maggots drank beer straight out of thirds - as in the shows from the US? - they threw empty bottles around on the beach.
They were yelling at each other constantly.
It wasn't English, though.
Then they got into a drink of wine, also straight from bottles.
They hopped into the hotel pool - in designer swimsuits, especially the young ladies - in the water screaming and yelling, mothers with children and pensioners fled in dismay, and in half an hour they were no longer on the beach or in the pool, or even one non-black guest was in the pool.
They all disappeared.
No matter if he was a Christian or Muslim.
The hotel staff was only worried about them.
The waiter told me in the evening: "Did you see the gold they wore?"
"Yeah," I said.
"Well, they certainly didn't," the waiter said.
I thought: "I know, they all had massive gold chains around the necks.
And one was on his neck about a 20-centimeter massive cross from gold.
And women were like gold.
"Drug smugglers?" I asked.
"You've seen them drink," the waiter replied.
Drugs don't go, they don't even use.
They're smuggling something else entirely.
So I knew what they were smuggling.
However, in June 2105, this was still not so important to me.
I had no idea what would follow.
But the Secret Service and top politicians should have known this first.
I don't think they knew.
About 1.5 million immigrants went to Europe at the time.
And they go and go.
Today, it emerged that the European Union's main problem is that totalitarian-politicised politicians, as intellectuals and associated lobbying and economically important groups, have the greatest strength in Europe.
Germany and its politicians - now a publicly recognized taskforce in Europe - lie, lie and lie - but not just them, also the leaders of the EU and the television, including ours.
For example, recent television images of the enthusiastic welcome of refugees in Germany are at the levels of Moscow television, August 1968.
Sure, there were a couple of sunnies at the station, but mainly - starred - Muslims welcomed their complicity.
For long weeks he was talking in the news on Czech television, as he says, according to some research, the Germans are almost all for the arrival of emigrants.
However, who has only been in Germany for a few days, knows it is a lie like a tower.
Which confirms more information.
For example, famous public opinion research organized by the ARD - the Czech Association of Public-Defense Television Companies of the Federal Republic of Germany.
According to the statement, ARD wanted more than 50% of Germans to accept even more refugees a week ago.
This also melded our television.
However, they concealed what was cracking in Germany the other day: That in an anticlimactic vote to the article, it turned out that 94.5 per cent of Germans no longer wanted immigrants - the poll was attended by 67 000 people.
It is true that Chancellor Merkel publicly in November 2010, five years ago, said: "Our quest for a multi-cultured society has totally failed."
She then said: "Germany is giving up the fight for a multicultural society."
"All attempts to live together have failed."
In a country where four million Muslims live, it has failed to act in a strategy that has allowed the people of various cultural backgrounds to live alongside them without being integrated.
But that is not the reality.
The multicultural approach, when we say we just live happily alongside each other, so this approach has failed.
He's completely failed.
But even Merkel probably has no power to go against powerful Germany and Europe, and especially against political correctness.
It shows an escalation of events.
The conflict is rapidly increasing.
Euromute Schulz, the president of the European Parliament, the MP for the SPD, the only one who reportedly does not even have a graduation in the European Parliament - yes, that is the one that Berlusconi has said in the EU parliament that he could play a guard in concentrate - as he has done before the minutes.
It seems especially under the impression of the recent statements made by German politicians that Germany had crossed the Rubicon.
Note that, except for some, most European politicians don't support these statements, the stats of countries that have been victims of Nazism are appalled.
What happened to the Germans?
With the rich, successful, and solid Germans?
Who have tried for years, at least outwardly, to cope with their terrible past of the aggressor and the killer of millions?
Are they true to say that in Germany's soul is the devil's aggression, superiority, and violence?
Did the Chancellor, Otto von Bismarck, have been right to stop the Highlanders' attempts to control the entire centre of Europe?
When did he say the Welsh idea would destroy Germany?
I guess he did.
When they shut him down, it started preparing for World War I.
The idea of the Grand Final, which led the Germans and Europe into two wars worth millions of lives, was likely to come back in another form.
After the Marxists' attempt to dominate the state, for example, with the Rote Armee Fraktion, and after the failure of the NDR, in Germany on the basis of, for example, ecology, which was, incidentally, one of the main ideas of Nazism, it began to develop a new German ideology.
We'd say sunny.
Germany's elites have long resisted the emergence of German nationalism, leaving all those fighters against the atom, enthusiastically seeking paradise for all, quietly supporting the old Empire and Nazi slogan Our forest must live.
To meet implacable young people, who want to do something differently and better, they have fully embraced the anti-heating movement of the planet, stopped nuclear power plants, etc.
And they have forgotten that there is also a strong anti-Semitic - the so-called pro-Palestinian - and anti-Slavic current, which has regarded all the Slovene as a difficult path - since Karl Marx, who, after his parents were born, was a German nationalist.
As well as showing the recent outings of Schulz and German minorities openly threatening the disobedient eastern states, the idea of leadership Germany.
Which must be listened to without speaking.
Otherwise, woe to you!
And when we factor in that immigrants are a highly influenced group of voters, we have what we have.
And behind it is, as ever, the capital, especially of Germany, which is particularly well, which is of the fact that Germany is in fact dominated by most of Europe's banks and in the Union.
At first, the Hungarians led the Germans into a swamp of environmentalism and multicolturalism, and brought them home today, and it will bring in perhaps millions of Muslims.
Who, lured by the siren's voices, will encounter the wall of reality that Merkel does not want to see, and starts to crash.
Germany can once again threaten its neighbors by force, again, once again, part of its population - but, it seems, a lesser part - ideologically deluded, but ultimately reality as it will catch up to it.
Is Germany going to burn again?
Muslim hostels are already on fire.
What will the German government do when public protests erupted from Germans against incoming Islamists?
To whose aid will Muslims have long lived in Germany, but certainly not assimilated to taking over local customs and laws?
What will the German government do when the naturalized Muslims, incoming Islamists and Germans who follow the fear of the Islamisation of their country?
What will it do to the Germans, even with Germany, when it is lifted by the people who will be raised loudly and publicly against the new euro-superman Muslim?
Germany has just changed.
The conflict created in Europe by the promotion of sunshine's ideology, the ideology of an elitist, and essentially totalitarian, and its greedy banks, is growing.
And for the blunt action against disobedient democratic Germans and all inferior and disobedient eastern neighbors, this cannot be done well.
Finish tomorrow.
The best way to get rid of nosy retailers: To scare them to death.
You knock yourself out, and the robustly pliable is on you both in a way that is less of a temper.
A swollen head will wipe you pretty dark and drive the ragged, too, to walk away (or, rather, drive away) an insistent retailer as well as a reviled statue.
Perhaps it is a shame that a talking cage can't be taken in fact.
Even for us, there would be plenty of gutters and suckers.
Pink (Oxalis corniculata).
A tiny weed that tolerates the dry environment.
And so it is among the country's tiles near my residence.
On September 16, 2015, I photographed the beautiful plant, which is one of the expansive weeds, but the visually creates a pretty impression in terms of flowering.
He finds himself among the country's tiles.
She's unpredictable. She's in the garden with us.
She likes a driverless environment, she is easily adaptable, modest and non-violent.
It creates leaves with a chaotic composition, but it is worth watching and footy continue.
The beauty of detail - yellow flowers and green leaves with purple accompaniment - is yet to be found under the tinsel.
Brazilian paediatric company Rio Grande promotes healthy diet while breastfeeding
Brazilian paediatric group SPRS has come up with a shocking way to try to convey women's knowledge of the importance of a good diet by breastfeeding using images of children lining up from their breasts painted by displaying unhealthy food.
Human breast milk is made up of different proteins, fats, vitamins and carbohydrates that supply infants all the nutrients they need to create a strong immune system.
Thanks to the excess energy requirements, pregnant women and newfangled mothers are advised to increase the daily caloric intake by 500 calories a day.
However, the new polls suggest that increased calorie intake is not the only dietary measure to guide mothers.
A recent study conducted by Robert Waterland, a professor at Baylor College of Medicine in Texas, found that a healthy diet of pregnant women actually affected the genetic making of their children and protected them from developing tumours.
Unfortunately, it was also confirmed that unhealthy diets were negatively impacted by the child's immune system.
Seven's Sunrise dominates the stakes, although Nine's attempt to take the lead at the Today Show
The propensity of Karl Stefanovic and Lisa Wilkinson to Canberra to cover the costs for the aftermath of the release of the Liberal leadership has failed to create a sufficient increase in ratings for Today.
Morning show Nine mingled from the nation's capital after toppling Malcolm Turnbull by Tony Abbott.
Rival Sunrise with host David Koche and Samantha Armytage stuck in London as part of a week-long series of international television broadcasts that also include Dubai, New York, Niagara Falls and Cancun.
It didn't seem to be on this tyranny of Aussie TV so much, because it registered in averaging 397 000 viewers in five major cities compared to 330 000 viewers of Today.
Today it experienced a minor increase in its assessment compared to Monday (317 000) and last Tuesday (283 000), but their number was up for the previous quarter (343 000).
Today in recent months, it fills the gap on Sunrise.
In August, there were 318 million in today, compared to 330 000 in Sunrise.
At the start of the year, the gap was between 40,000 and 50,000.
In September, Sunrise has averaged 44,000 viewers and the Today 314 000.
This is the most interesting thing that happened in the morning.
Winds affect change this morning more than just parliament, my friends!
Karl and Lisa are fine, thank you for asking!
It added TODAY on Monday 14 September 2015
The big message for Seven was the stunning debut of 800 words with former star packed to the Rafters Eric Thomson.
The new drama about a recently widowed father, who decides to move with his two children to the surf section of New Zealand, has averaged a very impressive 1.219 million viewers.
Critics wondered if Thomson himself could pull a television hit without star Rafters Rebecca Gibney.
The result last night indicates a clear "yes."
The X Factor from Seven retained a strong 1.136 million viewers, smoothly beating The Block (838 000) and TBL Families (726 000)
Seven has recorded mixed ratings for the second night of The Chase Australia.
The first half-hour of the new TV quiz (from 17: 00 to 17: 30), which featured Andrew O'Keefe had averaged 446 000 viewers.
The second half-hour (from 17: 30 to 18: 00) jumped to 623,000 viewers - which was enough for a small victory over Hot Seat Eddie McGuire (613 000).
On Monday night, the first half-hour of The Chase Australia averaged 520 000 viewers and the second half an incredible 720 000.
Hot Seat averaged 620 000.
Thanks to the decline in ratings of The Chase Australia from the second night, Nine will believe that Hot Seat at 17: 30 will eventually prevail.
The Chase Australia is replaced by the Order of Million Dollar Minute, which failed to defeat McGuire's show.
Originally published as Sunrise dominates while Today stays local
Three in the finals agree that Bachelor Sam Wood is a perfect boy - but who will he choose?
Secrets revealed?...
Lana Jeavons-Fellows, Sarah Mackay and Snean Markoski may have inadvertently found out who wins Bachelor.
The woman Sam Wood will come to on Bachelorship is shrouded in an insurmountable secret.
And the three girls who stay will definitely not reveal who the real one is who will eventually receive the rose.
But when we asked Sarah Mackay, Snezans Markoski and Leach Jeavons-Fellows the day before they stayed just two, they inadvertently told us who would win.
Sam Wood keeps his tongue out for teeth into Thursday's finale
All three women's lyricists reciprocated why Wood was the perfect man, quoting his sense of humour, ambition, family values and positivity as reasons why they would want to be his partner.
Anyway, the question is, "If not, who gets Wood's final flower," their responses might have worked as a combination of who would gain the heart of Bacheloror.
Both Jeavons-Fellows and Markoski quickly appointed Mackay as the one that would be best suited to Wood.
Sarah Mackay and Sam Wood have shared a light relationship from a certain day.
"From the moment I entered the house and watched the energy of Sarah and Sam, I felt they were pretty compatible and I still think about it throughout the course," says Jeavons-Fellows.
"Sarah is a really grounded woman, she's a lot of fun with her," Markoski added.
I've seen them together and they're among them the right chemistry.
They are well together and pleasant.
Sarah Mackay thinks Sam Wood could create a prima donna.
Behind her alone, she claims, during his recent visits to the home, she realised that Wood could be "the one."
"As soon as I saw him with my friends and family, I realised this wasn't just a game - I opened my heart to him now," he adds.
I asked who Wood would choose if not her, her face was mysterious.
"I don't know if I can say that," she said.
I love both girls anyway - it's between Snezena and Lana.
The guard is on Wednesday at 7.30 on Ten.
Originally published as Sarah's best choice for Sam Wood?
Jarryd Hayne had several options to begin his NFL career.
Detroit and Seattle showed much interest after his move to the United States and a lot of teams were asked about his brilliant start training at the end of last year.
But Hayne chose the San Francisco 49ers and coach Jim Tomsula and it seems like a sensible decision.
Some coaches were allowed to sit Hayne for the rest of the season because he made a mistake, which made the convert Australia's rugby league in the first kick off of the pitch at Tuesday's 20-3 on Minnesota.
But Tomsula showed he had confidence in the player and gave him another chance to come back and put him in the game following Reggie Bush's injury.
Tomsula was also continued to be honest in the dressing room after the game.
Instead of being joked in front of the rest of the team, he was able to cheer them up.
Tomsula also endorsed Hayne in public at a press conference after the match.
The 49ers reporter, Cam Inman, said Hayne had also received encouragement from the special team coordinator, Thomas McGaughey, who advised him to forget the error and only care about the next game.
He made his mistake during the first quarter against Minnesota Vikings Jarryd Hayne.
It certainly wasn't the start in which Hayne and his massive Australian fanclub hoped for his NFL debut.
Hayne was caught on swearing when he left the field after an error and later told Australia's radio duo Hamish & Andy on 2DayFM 104.1 a poorer start to his career in the NFL could not even imagine.
"That's what happens, you just focus on the next game and that's the whole thing," Hayne said
Hayne compared the trappings to his original debuts in 2007, when a recording in his own goal-line led to a 3-0 Queensland run.
Overall, it was a great experience for the 27-year-old.
Hayne posted a photo of the fans holding the Australian flag on his own Instagram.
Elton John and Russia Vladimir Putin gather in a debate about gay rights
In 2003, Russia's richest man, Mikhail Khodorkovsky, was arrested while pointing guns at a Siberian runway.
After openly questioning President Vladimir Putin, Khodorkovsky was convicted, his oil company Yukos confiscated and his democratic efforts limited.
The abductor became an expatriate who sought redress from the property.
The pair emigrated in 1984 and their property gained a new owner.
After 1989, it was no longer possible to return the property, so the pair turned to the state to claim damages under the Affordable Care Act.
The court first awarded them the required amount, over $2.8 million, but the appellate court changed their claim so that they only admitted to them less than £90m, referring to the fact that the amount of the refund is determined according to the price rules of 1991.
The emigrants became the Supreme Court, knocking back their initially jailed amount.
The Treasury, which had the money to pay, turned out to be complaints about the TSOs.
In the meantime, there has been such a change in social and economic circumstances, that the refund granted under the then applicable legislation - even when it represented a substitute in respect of a severed real estate - is now only at a fraction of the value of the immovable property.
"This cannot go to the detriment of the interveners, as in the restitution of the claimants, who have sought their rights at least since 1995, and they have not had the option of obtaining the refund previously," Judge Jaroslav Fenyk explained why the TCPs stood on the side of the emigrants.
"He has repeatedly called for the general courts to proceed in restitution matters so that any inconsistency is not interpreted in the interests of the claimants and that the purpose of restitution lawlessness is always achieved, namely to offset the property grievance caused by the acts of the former totalitarian state," the judge added.
Evita in the musical Stuart DVA now make Radka Fishaa.
Radka Fichess, incidentally, became the world's youngest Evita when she turned her role as wife of Argentine dictator Eva Perón in the first Czech Republic in 1998 in the first Czech introduction of this famous musical, Andrew Lloyd Weber, and Timea Rice in the Prague Theatre of Spiral.
To return to the same role, he says: "To this day, the intensity of Evita's performance has not matched."
Evita is not just an amazing role, it is also a responsibility.
Monica Absolon recommended her role as First Lady of Argentina.
I saw Monica in Evita three times and it definitely was inspirational for me.
Here I was suddenly seeing an entirely new concept.
I'm quite a supporter of more modern adaptations, but this one is particularly good.
"Director Andrew Sokola is original, secluded and present," Fishaus notes.
A poignant passing of the musical jumbled between the two singers will occur at the birthday concert by Monica Absolon on September 27, from 19 hours in theater Studio DVA.
The evening culminates in warehouses from the musical Evita.
The experience will surely be a common duet Don't Cry For Me Argentina (Utility your cry, Argentina!).
In a limited number of performances, Andrew Sokol will also depart from the overhead pulpit as he steps in for the film of Karl Roden in the role of President Perón.
For the sake of the public, more dates were added to the sale until May 2016.
The fifth Czech learning of the world musical Evita lists the Studio DVA in partnership with The Useful Group Ltd.
London with success since February 2015.
In both directions, Andrew Sokola's main female role was initially studied by Monika Absolon.
Charles Roden, the president of Perón, and the role of Che Peter Strennik, appear alongside her side.
The legendary songs from Tim Rice and Andrew Lloyd Webber, with English texts by Michael Prowiesky, read in the submission of a live orchestra led by Krystov Mark, who was already involved in the first introduction at the Spiral Theatre.
4 people killed after policemen fired rubber projectiles at protesters in Nepal
Four people, including a four-year-old boy, were killed in southern Nepal after police shooting rubber projectiles into a crowd of demonstrators against a proposal for a new state constitution, an official said Wednesday.
The violence took place Tuesday night in the Rupandemic district, about 175 miles west of Kathmandu's capital.
Bishop Prasad Dhakal, a leading county officer, states that more than 1000 protesters gathered in front of the police station and some threw stones and incendiary bombs.
Mr Dhakal states that police used tear gas and then fired into the air before resorting to rubber projectiles.
Twenty police officers and five civilians were injured, he says.
It was not immediately clear why rubber projectiles, which are known for their ability to kill, but are traditionally used as a less lethal alternative, apparently caused a high number of deaths.
This clash was last in a week of violent demonstrations across the southern Plains of Nepal, where members of an ethnic group Madhesi say they set up a new province under the proposed new constitution, mitigating their political influence.
Other demonstrations in western Nepal have also been recorded by the ethnic group Tharus, which is demanding the emergence of its own state.
Since 10 August, at least 40 people have been killed in violent clashes, including 11 policemen.
When the four main political parties signed an agreement to divide the country into a province - a big step toward a new constitution, but a highly contested issue in Nepal, which has been centrally managed for centuries.
Work on the new constitution has continued since 2008, but lawmakers have accelerated the process after the devastating earthquake that killed thousands of people in April.
Lawmakers in Kathmandu voted this week on the provisions of the draft constitution, and officials said the new charter should be taken into effect by Sunday.
We must not panic now.
You couldn't even manage a domestic duel with hockey player Shapps (3: 5).
Aren't you worried about similarly disastrous entering an extralegal like a year ago?
I hope it doesn't happen.
Peace Folk.
NHC predicts 60per cent probability of cyclone south of Cape Verde Islands
A wide low-pressure system of about 350 miles (560 km) south of the southernmost Cape Verde islands has a probability of 60 percent in the emergence of a tropical cyclone in the next 48 hours, the U.S. National Hurricane Centre said Tuesday.
Another well-defined low-cost system about the middle between the Cape Verde Islands and the Small Anties also has a 60 per cent probability in the emergence of a tropical cyclone formation in the next two days, forecasters added in Miami.
Google has launched a campaign to collect $11 million for refugees.
Google Inc (GOOGL.O) said it was launching a campaign to collect $11 million for humanitarian organisations aided by thousands of refugees who flooded European states in the run-up from the war-torn and poor countries. Each selected amount Google doubles.
Google announced this on its blog in a highly unusual way.
A message on her blog was published by Google employee Rita Masoud on personal experience as the seven-year-old fled with her family from Kabul.
"We travelled in many dark trains and buses and we experienced hunger, thirst, winter and fear," Masoud said.
I was lucky.
But the deteriorating immigrant crisis in Europe is still more families, like she has, willing to help.
All contributions will be distributed among the 4 non-profit organisations assisting refugees and immigrants: Doctors Without Borders, the International Rescue Committee, Save the Children and the Office of the United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees.
Google said all contributions made over the pages of google.com / giveerelief to $5.5 million would double.
Europe is facing the biggest wave of refugees since the Second World War. The most coming from Syria-torn four-year war that only drove to 4 million people this year.
Many people also escape from the war-torn Afghanistan, Yemen, Iraq, and Libya.
Reporting: Yasmeen Abutaleb; Editing: Christian Plumb
For slightly obese diabetics, weight-loss surgery could be useful
The benefits of losing surgery for slightly obese people with type 2 diabetes may last for at least five years, according to a new study.
However, it is still too early to say if slightly obese people with type 2 diabetes live longer after surgery to lose weight than those who receive non-surgical treatment.
"The mortality data goes long to the view," says Dr. Robin Blackstone, an expert in surgery to lose, who wrote an editorial on the new study of JAMA surgery.
Surgery to lose weight, bariatric surgery is used to reduce the stomach of different methods.
Reducing hunger and reducing the human body to absorb food.
Over the years, bariatric surgery proved effective for treating type 2 diabetes, but most of the survey was performed on humans with morbid obesity with a body mass index (BMI) worth 25 or higher.
The BMI, which measures the weight relation to height, is considered normal in values between 18.5 and 24.9.
A BMI of 25 or higher suggests the overweight person and people with a value above 30 are considered obese.
You can calculate your BMI here: 1.usa.gov / 1D0ZqDv.
For their new study, researchers from the General Hospital Min-Sheng in Taiwan used data collected from a 2007 study, which deals with two types of bariatric surgery - gastric bypass and gastrectomy - in the treatment procedures of type 3 diabetes in humans who were slightly obese.
Average BMI among those who underwent surgery declined according to a study from 31 to 24.5 towards the end of their fifth year.
Meanwhile, BMI of those had not been given surgical treatment of diabetes, roughly the same at 29.
Among those with surgery, diabetes was solved completely in 36 percent and in part in 28 cases.
In drugs treated by the group, it was only at 1 percent and only in the case of about 2 percent of diabetes, compared to diabetes.
Furthermore, blood pressure checks, trigylcerides and "bad" LDL cholesterol proved "generally better in a surgical group," the authors found.
The researchers also monitored patient levels of haemoglobin A1c in the blood, which reflect an ongoing blood sugar level in the body.
Hemoglobin A1c is best maintained below 7 percent, the researchers report.
After surgery, the average haemoglobin value of A1c fell from about 9 percent to about 6 percent.
However, in the treatment of the care group, that value remained at about 8 percent.
But this better "glycaemic control" - which is reflected in better levels of haemoglobin A1c - did not reduce mortality rates in five years, according to chief researcher Dr Chih-Cheng Hsu and his colleagues.
The research team also compared average results with two types of operations.
After the fifth year, the group lost more weight compared to a group of gastrectomy (18.7 against 14.2 kg), reaching larger drops of BMI (7,4 against 5.1) and haemoglobin of A1c (3.1 percent against 2.1 percent), and were more likely to remission of diabetes (46.9 percent against 16.7 percent respectively).
While the new study does not show improvement in survival or surgery after five years, there is evidence from studying stronger people in Sweden, where they found that surgery leads to an extension of life, says Blackstone of the University of Arizona College or Medicine-Phoenix.
According to the Swedish study, obese people who underwent bariatric surgery were about 29 percent greater odds of survival over the next 15 years, compared with a group that tried more conventional methods.
Although the new study did not show improvements in survival among patients after surgery, according to Blackstone, it is a reassuring result for people with a BMI under 35 who are interested in these procedures.
"This is where this work is critical because it states that surgery is safer in a group with a lower BMI," without increasing the risk of death or kidney disease, it states.
Blackstone also further alleges that people and their doctors should start taking the weight really seriously after dropping the patient's BMI between 27 and 30.
"I think we're waiting too long to show people the gravity of the situation," he says.
I think when you accumulate these genetic changes that bind their bodies with obesity and diabetes, the way back is already really heavy.
"It's impossible for everyone to come to Europe" - the Dalai Lama - RT News
Europe is unable to accommodate all the refugees, the Dalai Lama said, adding that the real solution to the current refugee crisis lies in the near east.
The Tibetan leader of Buddhists has called for an end to violence in the home countries of refugees.
The Dalai Lama addressed the issue of the ongoing refugee crisis in his speech at the opening of the Dalai Lama Centre for Compassion in Oxford, which is dedicated to a study of ethics, at the start of his 10-day visit to the UK.
He argued that, under the present circumstances, humanity should be placed before the interests of individual countries or even continents.
He also emphasized that the response of Western European countries, no matter how admirable, was inadequate in the refugee crisis.
"It is impossible for everyone to come to Europe," he said in his speech.
Although the Dalai Lama praised the efforts of Germany and Austria in addressing the crisis, he stressed that it was only a temporary solution.
"Taking care of some thousand refugees is wonderful, but in the meantime, you'll have to think about a long-term solution to bring real peace and real development, especially through the education of these Muslim countries," he pointed out.
Finally, we have to think about how to reduce the killing in their countries.
We need to limit the use of force.
The use of force has never solved these problems, "he said.
In addressing the issue of violence, the Dalai Lama also commented on the plaintiffs on George Bush following the 9 / 11 terrorist attack, claiming that "the US violent response has triggered a chain of uncontrollable events.
After 9 / 11, I expressed my condolences in a letter to President Bush and advised him that a way to solve this problem was not a violent path.
I know his motives were good, but he used strength and created unexpected consequences, "the Dalai Lama said.
A four-fold increase in the number of children who have ingested the sanitation agent in the last 4 years
The toxicology centers around the United States reported nearly 400 percent growth since 2010 in the number of children under 12 years that polled a highly alcoholic sanitation agent, according to a toxicology center in Georgia.
According to Dr. Gaylord Lopez, the director of Georgia's toxicology center, the number of living sanitised funds in children up to the 12 years that were reported at the control centers increased from 3 266 in 2010 to 16 117 in 2014.
"Kids get to treat these products more frequently and unfortunately there's a percentage of kids who have to be taken to the emergency room," Lopez told CNN.
Some children drink a sanitation device deliberately, while some want to make an impression on their friends or as a challenge on social media.
Videos on Youtube show teens as they drink a sanitizer for cheap fuss.
The teens reportedly mixed up a sanitiser with oral water containing alcohol for a stronger drink.
Younger children can be drawn to the attractive scent of a resource.
"The kids aren't thinking about hurting them," said Lopez.
A lot of the more attractive (sanitation devices) are the ones that are perfumed.
The dipositions are sanitised funds with the scent of strawberries, grapefruit or oranges, which are very tempting for children.
The sanitizer device contains between 45 and 95 per cent alcohol.
In particular, small children can mean alcohol poisoning.
"This is a highly concentrated alcohol," said Fox 4 in Kansas City medical director of the control toxicology center at University of Kansas Hospital, Dr. Stephen Thornton.
You wouldn't leave a glass of whiskey just lying around, but people will leave these sanitised devices out there and when kids get to them, it's a quick way to consume alcohol.
Nhaijah Russel, a six-year-old girl who recently ate up to four loaves of sanitised reagent with the scent of strawberries and was taken away for treatment on an emergency.
Her blood alcohol level was .179, which is twice the threshold considered for drunkenness at an adult, according to Dr Chris Ritchey, an emergency doctor who took care of her at Gwinnett Medical Center outside Atlanta.
Nhaijah voiced indistinct words and was unable to walk after she arrived on alert.
Doctors monitored her overnight in a separate children's hospital for any signs of brain trauma, as the girl due to the alcohol fell and hit her head, says Ritchey.
"It was very scary," she told CNN Ortoria Scott, the mother of Nhaijah.
It could have been fatal to my baby.
Lopez has advised parents and teachers to use non-alcoholic products or arrange to be sanitised funds from the reach of children.
Out of alcohol poisoning, some sanitation funds were associated with death.
In 2013, two women died from Ontario after swallowing a sanitation device that contained toxic, undeclared ingredients.
Health officials thought the product contained methanol, a fatal reagent, rather than ethanol, which was listed as an active ingredient.
In January three students in a fourth year in northern New York planned to poison their "bad" teachers by placing antibacterial products around the room, "according to the police report.
The teacher is highly allergic to sanitation, and has banned their presence in the room.
Police assessed the foiled plan as' innocent chatter, 'and referring to the discipline of the school district
Rumours: No mismatch in team Celtic
Griffiths bagged talk of a mismatch at Celtic, while Deila admits the Hoops are in the wrong place, but he will turn it round again.
Hearts will be fighting the SFA against the attack on Neilson and Warburton is worried that the new reinforcements will narrate the unity team from January.
Dons increase their lead over Celtic by 5 points
A penalty from the first half in ADAMA Rooney secured Aberdeen's close victory over Hamilton at Pittodrie, which gave the Dons a five-point lead between himself and Celtic.
Griffiths denies talk of mismatch
That situation drew gossip about the discrepancy in Celtic, which was denied by Griffiths, who insists he and his teammates do not work under any pressure from the increased oversight in the preparations for the game with the leaders of the Dutch league.
I don't think we feel under pressure, I think the players are looking forward to it.
Lack in Scottish headline rivalry bore Netherlands-de Boer
Former Rangers manager and former representative of the Netherlands-based Ronald de Boer claims that Dutch fans of football have lost interest in Celtic - because there is no rivalry between them for the title.
De Boer, who is currently ambassador to Ajax, states: "In the Netherlands, they no longer show the best of the match Celtics, and why?"
Because there aren't any Rangers there.
The people here are not just talking about the return of Rangers.
He's talking about an Old Firm.
He talks about both teams together and that's what they're interested in.
There is great tension at the Old Companies games, and not only are the people of Scotland watching these games.
I'll turn things around for good.
Roony Dealia admitted Celtic were stumbling a bit, but the Norwegian boss has pledged to turn things around for good.
Defeat by Malta and the next fall out of the Champions League was quickly followed by a defeat against Aberdeen, who only had 10 players and now pole position at the top of the table with a five-point lead.
But Deila says: "Celtic have had a bad season and will rise again."
Now we want to get out of it as soon as possible.
I know it's very frustrating and a lot of people are really, really upset or sad to date.
We're exactly the same - but we need to keep going.
Really, we really need the support of Celtic because of it, the players are much better.
Now it is very important to stay together.
Warburton is worried about the January reinforcements
Despite the comments made a few weeks ago and suggested he had already identified some of his January targets, the head of Rangers Mark Warburton is worried about the big buying programme and insists he does not want to disrupt the team's unity from Ibrox.
The former head of Brentford states: "The January transfer window is very different from that summer."
The players who come in the summer have the entire pre-season period on housing, which you could see on our own team this season.
The team is doing really well.
Sometimes there will be more damage by adding unnecessary players to those you really need.
The re-entry target of Celtic Michu suggests retirement
Swansea Michu, who had been linked with Celtic in the retrial, indicated he could retire after the expiry of his contract with Swansea.
The 20-year-old gunman has had problems with a prone ankle for two years and has not been able to find his way out of Wales this summer.
Hearts will struggle with SFA for comment against Neilson
Hearts were leading 2-1 when Paterson was sent to the locker room and eventually lost 3-2, but the red card on this defender was later cancelled - it is a third red card issued by referee Collum, who was called off.
Neilson stands behind his assertion and states: "I have not questioned the integrity, I have not commented on the performance."
Griffiths has pledged to avoid Tynecaster
Stubborn Hibbe was severely reprimanded after admitting he had sung the song with text aimed for former Hearts columnist Rudolph Shapps.
The incident took place in a pub in the Roserburn area in Edinburgh before the Edinburgh derby at Tynecaster in March 2014
"It was a derby and it was a rampant moment," the attacker said, continuing: "I can safely say I'm not going back to Tynecaster if it's not in the uniform of Celtic."
Council in Tannadice believes in management of Dundee United - Donelly
Simon Donelly insists the advice of Dundee United still believes in repairing the situation by the team's current management - but admits the decline in the field must end.
I think Stephen Thompson believes in us.
We will prepare the boy again for action, "Donnelly promises.
MCInnes is happy for 'ugly victory' against Hamilton
Derek McInnes admits his Aberdeen team had to be desperately held against Hamilton Accies to be able to get the seventh league victory after themselves and a five-point lead before Celtic at the top of the table thanks to a penalty from the first half in Adam Rooney's submission.
McInnes states: "There is no team who have won, whether they are driving or the league without winning this type of match."
Scottish unemployment remains unchanged while overall UK unemployment rate rises
Unemployment in Scotland remains unchanged at number 164 in the period between May and July, while the total number of unemployed in the UK rose by 10,000 to 1.82 million over the same period.
The Scottish unemployment rate was 5.9 percent above rates in the UK (5.5 percent), as data from the Office for National Statistics (ONS) said.
Meanwhile, employment in Scotland fell by 12,000 over the period of three months, the number of workers now stopped at 2 612 000.
Employment rates in Scotland fell to 74.0 per cent during the quarter - a figure above the UK average of 73.5 per cent.
The secretary of state Scotland David Mundell said in a commentary on the latest data: "A long-term government plan has laid the foundations for a stronger economy."
It is almost exactly a year since Scotland made a historic decision to remain part of the UK.
In those 12 months we witnessed further improvements in the labour market and Scottish employment grew while unemployment fell.
Why I witnessed the executions in Oklahoma
Later today, despite late legal intervention, I will be watching the killing of a man.
If that happens, and I hope it doesn't happen, I will be sitting in a viewing gallery in the chamber of Oklahoma State Prison, and I will see Richard Glossian, who will be executed by lethal injection.
He asked me to be one of four officials to witness his death.
I received the invitation first in January via my best friend and although I was shocked, I agreed.
As the day approaches, I'm beginning to worry about it.
Then why am I doing this?
I have accepted this invitation, because I think it is a good way to be able to tell you the full story of the death penalty.
It would offer me a unique perspective.
It is true that journalists are allowed to pursue executions in America and since there are often more applications than vacancies, it is carried out with a morbid lottery to decide who will be elected.
Oklahoma has reduced the number of seats for journalists from 12 to five.
Whoever will be selected will monitor the entire execution in an unbiased way.
I can't do that.
I'll be sitting alongside Richard Glossian's closest friends, and I've created a special bond with him through months of phone calls and one-two-and-a-half hour visits.
I like that guy.
We laugh a lot when we talk.
The prison system says I can't be a witness and a journalist, so I won't be allowed to get the memo, and I won't be able to record what I'm seeing.
I'll just have to memorize all the details.
One journalist from Oklahoma accused me on Twitter of compromising my impartiality.
This is a lesson.
Tell us the story of the breeder, the way he likes it, get access.
I complained to her.
She conceded that "she could have put it better," but still thinks what I'm doing is wrong.
Richard Glossip had a problem with some of the things I said and wrote.
He doesn't tell me what to write, and even if he does, I wouldn't listen to him.
I told him he could remove me from the witness list any time.
But he wants an international journalist who will be ready to tell the story on the spot.
He thinks if he dies, his case will help practice against the death penalty.
Kim Bellware, a journalist at Huffington Post, will be at my side.
To know more about the case, please listen to a series of podcasts I created.
I'm not going to repeat all the details.
I can't say for sure that Richard Glossip is innocent.
His actions following the murder of Barry Van Trees would make him guilty of complicity in a crime.
But I believe there is a great probability that he is innocent of murder.
I certainly believe there wasn't enough evidence to justify the death penalty.
In my opinion, the execution is bad.
And from this perspective, I'll be watching his death.
I can't say I'm really objective.
To this end, you can turn to other journalists.
What you get from me is an experience of seeing the man I love die an unnecessary death.
Man escaped from Canning River after police chase
Officer Canning Vale remained dry after he fired the man from the Canning River.
The bet of a man in Peta that he was going to escape the police didn't come out after he got into a shallow silken water just metres from a policeman who tried to not encourage him to come back to shore.
Police from Canning Vale were called in at the incident exceeding into Beckenham on Tuesday.
When they saw the suspect, he tried to get rid of them across the River Canning.
But he didn't get very far.
'he stood in the water and repeated 'I'm not going to go out, just come get me,' "said Sergeant Shandell Castledine.
Officer Lachlan Perhavec didn't want to dip his uniform, so he tried to use a safer tactic and a police negotiation. "
'people sometimes try to do funny things in the escape, 'said Castledine.
Football champion Ben Cousins gives a memorable example.
In 2006, Cousins drove the car into a ditch to avoid the bus and attempted to swim across the Swan River.
His efforts were futile, but he inspired the locals to begin planning biathlon Ben Cousins.
Peter Moody claims the organisers have tried to spy on him and threatens to end the race
Peeter Moody accused organiser Racing Victoria of trying to get a spy on him last year and threatened to immediately put an end to the race.
He focused on the organizer and the integrity unit Racing Victoria and based on the belief that they had a personal campaign against him with the late-scratching Lady Tatai in maintenance on day of the race, which for him on Wednesday was the last straw.
Moody told Fairfax Media he had always tried to do what's best for racing and found himself in a difficult position when it comes to Lidarin's positive yield on cobalt, which he fails to explain.
He bit into the language about allegations of espionage for 18 months, and did not want it to look like "dry grapes."
"I didn't want to say anything about being on it for a long time, but you just feel so frustrated that it comes out of you all at the same time," Moody said.
They know it went on.
Sometimes you react and you have to live with the consequences, and I have to live with what I said.
I'm going home today and I'll sleep well.
I want to walk with my head up and make owners think I'm doing my best for them.
If they start to think otherwise, then I shouldn't be a coach.
I'd have to consider what I was going to do with my license.
Previously, Moody released a bomb in his interview...... that the department's integrity had tried to spy on him.
"Before the eighteen months of Terry Bailey, Dayle Brown and Dr. Brian Stewart were sitting in the room with the man - whom I will be appointing after the question - and offered him a job in my stables for finding out information about the things that are being carried out in my stables," Moody said at Racing.com.
Of course they thought I was a crook.
If that is the case, they should all show their information, because they have completely failed to catch me.
Robert Roulston, former chairman of the RVL, David Moodie, the current chairman of the RVL, and Bernard Saundra, the current CEO of RVL, were aware of this at the time and they are aware of it today.
Should I think it's becoming a personal matter?
Does RVL grow a pair of balls and arrange for people outside the coach's position to take responsibility for what is going on in this industry?
Am I bad for this industry?
Am I really that bad for this industry?
Maybe people here think they do.
Maybe they need to take my license and put me away, and I have no doubt that what I'm saying now will give them material for reflection.
But I got to the point where I don't care anymore, and I'm sad about it.
It really made me sad.
I will push them and carry the burden on them to make a decision.
I have the support of my family and I can leave.
The level of frustration the coach increased with the long-term investigation for cobalt, including Lidari, and the recent scratching in it made him feel like "he could have his licence on the table."
The mood, best known for preparing the undefeated champion Black Caviar, marked the rule of treatment on the day of the race as "ridiculous" after the horses were applied to their feet by clay bandages or mud, which is against the rules.
It's against the rules of racing.
I have to take full responsibility for this, "he said.
Someone from my team mistakenly put mud on his leg.
He could have had it last night.
It could have happened yesterday and it happened.
It happened on the day of the race.
Moody faced a three-month disqualification for treatment of obscenities on the day of the race to which the organisers had already opened an investigation.
It's a joke.
The people who create these rules know nothing about horses.
"We all understand we need the rules, but this has gone too far," said Moody.
Cobram driver who drove away was arrested
Police arrested the man who collided with a cyclist over the weekend and drove off after the collision.
The cyclist has been transported to the Royal Melbourne Hospital with serious injuries after he was hit by an auction on the main road of Murray Valley on Saturday morning.
Police said the motorist drove off without stopping and helped the injured rider.
On Monday, a 50-year-old man from Nathalia himself confessed to police in Shepparton.
He is expected to be charged with non-stop in the accident, not providing assistance and other traffic offences.
The cyclist, 40-year-old man from Cobram, remains in a stable condition in hospital.
Coach of Melbourne Storm Craig Bellamy returns strike of rivals for wrestling claim
Craig Bellamy, the Melbourne Storm coach, has criticised the interventions of his players as a "establishment plan" by two NRL favourites premiering.
Trent Robinson, the Sydney Roosters, said the referee allowed the players Storm to "wrestle" his players during a controversial victory for Team Storm in finals qualifying in Sydney on Friday night.
Wayne Bennet, the Brisbane Broncos coach, made a lightly-veiled mention at Strorm after his team won finals qualification over North Queensland Cowboys on Saturday night when he called the game as a "parade" of rugby league and, according to him, two of the Queensland players were not "too big" for wrestling.
Bellamy defended the interventions of his players and said they were focused during them on "contact."
Bellamy added that this situation increased his confidence as his team was criticized by two heads of coaches, which may mean they have a fear of defeat from the Storm team.
"It's still coming - I don't remember Trent Robinson talking about wrestling when they beat us 24-2," Bellamy said on Wednesday.
I can guarantee we haven't changed anything from our defensive systems and techniques in the last year, we've only put an emphasis on contact during the footy, and that has meant a turnaround for us.
Trent's been here three years and he's obviously training a great team so he's probably not used to losing, which might have been a bit of a shock for him.
It's funny how such things always come in this year's part.
Bellamy was abusing Bennett's ideas of "thrilling football," and reminded his Mentor that Bennett's team St George-Illawarra Dragons won the premiership in 2010 by playing "boring" football.
Wayne's talking about exciting football.
He was right in being his Saturday game as exciting as ours. Also was just as exciting, "said Bellamy.
I remember in 2010 St George was criticised for being a boring team and Wayne then said he didn't really care.
But now he has a team that can play the style of play that strikes him ruthlessly, especially his young bookmakers with their speed.
You would want to play that kind of football if you had this type of players available.
He said that view in 2010 and now he wants all teams to play his style of football - but not every team has two backers like Anthony Milford and Ben Hunt, so they can't play that kind of style.
It makes me feel more confident because they say things like that because they're worried about the game against us.
Six weeks ago, they probably didn't even think about us when they were getting big fights.
Bellamy also pointed out the fact that there were more gates in the match for the Storm and Roosters than in the game of the Broncos and Cowboys.
Game of the Broncos team was probably good, I didn't look, but what's the score? 16-12?
Our game ended 20-18, there were two more tries in our game, but is it exciting football?
Or are the breaks and not scoring attempts interesting?
I think it's the agenda.
If they mention us, it means we will meet again.
The Storm have a break this weekend and won the right to host either North Queensland Cowboys or Cronulla Sharks in the preliminary final next Saturday night at AAMI Park. Tickets will be on sale from next Tuesday.
Serbian man has taken bail of £200,000 for drug allegations
A man who faced a possible life sentence for possession of 40 kilograms of cocaine smuggled out of Queensland has been granted bail of £200,000.
Marko Maksimovic (29 years) was one of five men arrested last month by federal police searching for 100 kilograms of drugs from the yacht Solay, who arrived from South America via Vanuatu and anchored in Coomera in August.
Maksimovic was seen at a meeting together with the accused in a port during the morning and later met them at the Coomera Roadhouse, where police found 40 kilograms of drugs in the Toyota Echo.
Even though he faced a potential judgment of a life for owning cocaine of commercial quality, the lawyer Maksim stood up for the fact that there was no evidence of possessing the entire quantity and that he could be in the cafe entirely by chance and innocently.
Supreme Court judge Peter Flanagan thought Maksimovic would escape.
He has a clear connection to Serbia.
He often travels to Serbia, "he said at the centre of the trial.
At the Crown case he lied to police about where he lived.
The mother and stepfather of Maksims have jointly offered bail at £200,000 for his release.
"After reading the affidavit from both people, it is clear that the endowment of $200,000 is a real financial burden to them," Judge Flanagan declared.
Their efforts themselves were clearly inadequate because the accused did not appear further in court, he warned.
Maksimovicos was granted bail on condition that he give up both the Australian and Serbian passport, daily he will report to police and will abide by the curfew from 18 in the evening to 6 a.m.
Stevan Hogg used phone girl to lure paedophiles to send pictures
The paedophile used the phone of an 11-year-old girl to get pictures of child abuse.
Stevan Hogg took the phone to the girl when she slept, then volunteered for her online chat, where he had a number of indecent photographs of children sent to him by another user.
The girl then went through and found her phone missing and then found him in the hands of a sleeping hogg.
She had passed him, and before she alerted her mother, she found disturbing news.
Police got involved and saw five photos, then analysis computers found the address and discovered 'disturbing' searches on the site using expressions for searching for naughty pictures of children.
Hogg then told police that his reason was "to lead paedophiles" on the internet before "pretending to be a police officer and scared them off."
Fiscal representative Eilidh Robertson said for Dundee Sheriff Court: "He said it was an addiction - that he was addicted to scaring people.
He admitted he carried out the search on the computer, but claims he only wanted to pretend he was a cop to scare paedophiles.
He was asked about his conversation with an unknown person who sent him pictures and why he wanted to send another.
According to him, he did it to lure them in
He claims he was crazy drunk and said he wanted to see pictures of rape and murder.
Mrs Robertson added: 'When the girl found the news on her phone, he called his mother, shaking and crying.
She saw naughty pictures on her phone and the defendant was then confronted.
The girl was heard talking about how the defendant used her computer and Playstation to speak with the girls, who looked much younger than him.
Hog, 23, of residence in Ward Road, Dundee, admitted the blame for bringing an action regarding the receipt or awarding of inappropriate images of children on June 14 last year, breaking the terms of bail on January 25 and failing to appear in court on March 24 this year.
Defence lawyer Gregor Sim has asked that Hogg not be placed on a list of sex offenders because he can argue there was "no fundamental sexual subtext in his act."
Sheriff Alistair Carmichael postponed the ruling for October because of reports of social workers.
Hogg was granted bail in this case, but he was kept in custody before hearing about the other unsolved cases.
He was placed on a list of sex offenders before the date of his judgment.
Zimbabwe's Robert Mugabe delivered a bad speech in parliament
Mr Mugabe, the Africa's oldest leader, previously fell on the steps leading to the podium earlier this year.
He was not injured, but the video of his fall has become viral in social media.
The opening of parliament has also been tarnished by allegations of opposition lawmakers that they had received anonymous threats to kill them, which warned them of the shutdown of Mr Mugabe during his speech.
Last month he squealed and provoked him during his speech on the nation's state in parliament - a speech he repeated on Tuesday.
The chairman of the House of Commons Movement for Democratic Change (MDC), Innocent Goes, said seven opposition politicians received text messages on their mobile phones with a warning not to hinder Mr Mugabe's speech.
"The report comes from a number not shown, but is being named 'death', 'he told the journalists following Mr Mugabe's speech.
He warns the members concerned to know that immunity ends in parliament and, as soon as they step out of parliament, their parliamentary immunity is not working.
The chief said the party, led by Morgan Tsvangirai, has "concerns" about threats against MPs.
Hewlett-Packard is poised to cut the number of jobs by up to 30,000.
Hewlett-Packard will cancel 25,000 to 30,000 jobs as part of its efforts to restructure and cost the business of business services.
HP later this year will share two companies listed on the stock exchange and separate the store's computer and printers from its faster-growing operations of the company's hardware and services.
The expected reduction in jobs will result in a change of about $2.7 billion and will come in the fourth quarter, HP says in a statement.
"These restructuring activities will enable us to create a more competitive structure with sustainable spending for the new Hewlett Packard Enterprise," says Meg Whitman, CEO of HP and the chairman of the board of directors, who post a division lead in the lead of the unit.
"Hewlett Packard Enterprise will be smaller and more sophisticated than it is today HP and will have a broad and extensive portfolio of stores that will help businesses transition to a new style of business," Whitman said.
As a seeded company, we will be in a much better position to meet the evolving demands of our customers around the world.
Hewlett Parckard Enterprise will have a posthumous statement to the company of an annual income of more than $50 billion and "will be aiming to provide uncompetitive integrated technological solutions" to companies.
This will lead to the distribution of a company founded in 1930 by Stanford University graduates Bill Hewlett and Dave Packard, producing electrical equipment and whose garage at Palo Alto was dubbed the "birthplace of Silicon Valley."
HP was undergoing a massive reorganization to manage the move from traditional personal computers to mobile devices.
This move by HP, the second-largest manufacturer PC and one of the biggest tech companies in America, is the latest of this sector based on the belief that a closely specialized firm has better outcomes.
Captain of the arsenal Mikel Arteta says teammates must reach for injured Jack Wilshere before Dinamo Zagreb
Wenger also pointed out for Wilshere that it's still only September and if his rehab goes according to plan, there's no reason not to play on Christmas again.
This best scenario already means Wilshere will surely miss at least another four England games and, from the point of view of history, his involvement in the next summer European Championship is clearly uncertain.
The big damage to this latest problem is that Wilshere ended last season strong after an ankle injury and then he was back in the former form during the pre-season.
"This kind of injury doesn't threaten a career," says Wenger.
It's a wound that requires treatment.
This is nothing special.
It was just an accident.
It wasn't related to his ankles or injuries he suffered before.
This could be from a purely medical point of view, as Wenger admitted there was a relative danger of further injuries whenever any player returns during the season.
There is also an unpleasant pattern.
The survey by Premier Injuries Ltd has recorded 23 different injuries to Wilshere since he had his game debut six years ago.
Over the past five years he has only played in 65 league games of an arsenal of total 157:
From a broader perspective for Arsenal, it meant that in six of the eight seasons from 2007-08 he was one of two Premier League clubs who had lost the most days due to injury.
Wenger accepts the potential of a vicious circle, but Arsenal believe improvements in the area of recorded injuries during the last season will continue.
"Sometimes when you come back after an injury, you have a vulnerable period, the time you need to strengthen your body and get a competition," says Wenger.
Jack's young enough to get out of it.
I hope his body stabilizes, I'm sure he will, and he will have the career he deserves.
Arsenal begin the campaign in the A-League on Wednesday night against Dinamo Zagreb matches with Chelsea on Saturday and Tottenham Hotspur next Wednesday, and Wenger is preparing to rotate his team.
Héctor Bellerín and Aaron Ramsey have not travelled to Croatia, meaning Mathieu Debuchy and Arteta are likely to step in.
Wenger would also be able to start with Kieran Gibbs and Olivier Giroud instead of Nacho Monreala Theo Walcott.
"I'm trying to keep my balance and let the players who need it can breathe," says Wenger.
Though Arsenal are the clear favourite to proceed from Group F, Maksimir in Zagreb has a reputation as the most intimidating stadium in Europe.
Dinamo were also not beaten in a total of 41 games after they kept the campaign "unbeatable" last season.
The stadium was rocked by an earthquake 3.2 magnitude of the earthquake on Wednesday night.
That was earlier this year in Zagreb.
Wenger thinks that Arsenal have learned from last season's Champions League, when they capitulated against Monaco and remain a distant hope of leading the club to their first victory in the European Cup.
"This deployment is tremendous," says Wenger.
The arsenal never happened.
We were very close in 2006, but on the other side I have to be a realist.
We're ambitious, but we're not dreamers.
FriendsFest: Comedy show that gives us serious lessons about male friendship
The absence of similar views in different shows is striking, especially given how the need for men to open up is more desperate than ever, in terms of suicides among young men within 15 years.
In 2013, it was the single biggest cause of death in men aged 20-45 in the UK and remains three times more common in men than women.
In an effort to address this problem, she called Campaign Against Living miserably (CALM) of 2015 as the Year of Much, which aims to challenge a culture that prevents men from seeking help when needed.
At the heart of this struggle lies a friendship to meet this challenge.
A recent study of more than 2,000 secondary school students showing symptoms of depression found that in the event that the injured had a sufficiently high percentage of friends with "healthy mood," their chances of recovery doubled.
Equally for those who are not depressed, the circle of mentally healthy friends represents a half chance of mental health problems.
But for friendship to work, it must, of course, be achievable first.
In this communication via social media with an emphasis on style and not on the content of the message, the immediate answer is often preferred before meaningful contact.
Thanks to our digital lives, our need to look stronger, more fun loving and more successful, even though we're more isolated in reality.
This superficial achievement is dominated by what psychologists call external values; money, image, welfare state, all at the expense of our real values - our personal desire for growth and friendship - which have a profound effect on our mental health.
And as one billionaire and playmaker explained before, money really doesn't buy more luck.
The beauty of Friends was a source of this idea for him.
None of the characters has been defined by their work, but their personalities, which have shone through a friendly interaction.
Joey's humor and Chandler's frequent victims, the moment of watching football on comfortable chairs, Ross's desire for Rachel, all stems from the knowledge that yes, men can also identify with that, though they mostly keep their feelings for themselves.
As one Samarite worker explained to me:.... "my role is a listener of people who feel depressed or have a suicidal tendency to really confirm that even the least friendly interactions can make a difference."
The men who contact us often feel the inability to communicate with friends.
The old saying "to deal with it" is strong in the sense that it will be perceived as weak to open up about the issues.
Friends are one of the agendas that will arise in my mind when I try to offer a longer-term settlement mechanism.
She emphasizes small moments in male friendship.
As for my job, the status of an outsider on the phone helps people in moments of desperation, but long-term support must come from a greater close, from a network of friends and family.
So if this weekend is going to the FrendsFest hosted by Comedy Central, why not take your friends for a drink to Central Perk, where the interior will be reeling to the occasion of the celebration.
Or if you see anyone alone in Starbucks, smile for him and say hello.
You never know what difference your friendship might make.
Series Friends will be broadcast on Comedy Central from start to finish - full 236 episodes - for # FriendsFest
Di Maria scored and helped PSG sweep Malmo aside
Angel Di Maria celebrates with Blake Matuidim and Edinburgh Cavani after injuring the gate against Malma.
Angel Di Maria scored at his debuts at the Masters and helped so PSG on Tuesday beat Sweden's Malmo team.
Here's the match report and reaction to the game.
Angel Di Maria and Edinburgh Cavani both scored in Tuesday's match, and Paris Saint-Germain started their way in the A-League final for a 2-0 win against Malma at Parc des Princes.
Di Maria shot the gate less than four minutes after his debuts at the A-League in the A-League, and this PSG sent the French champions a victory, then threw up a couple of chances, until they finally increased their lead when the Cavani shot a shot through his head in the 61st minute.
Real Madrid and Shakhtar Donetsk are also in Group A, and therefore the team Paris needed a strong start against the Swedish champions, as they do not focus only on qualifying in the elimination rounds, but to improve their way to the quarter-finals that they recorded in each of the previous 3-year-olds.
But even though they got three points, it wasn't a classic performance by the team of Laurent Blanca and Zlatan Ibrahimovic before the goalkeeper was marred ahead of the goal, and was later replaced against his home team and the club in which he began his famed career in 1999.
"In the Masters, it's not easy to win out or at home, so winning 2-0 makes our adversaries a problem and looking comfortable in defence is a good start, even if there are things we'll need to improve with the process," Blanc said.
That's a good sign.
We wanted to win and we won, yet I regret we didn't shoot one or two overs more.
Ibrahimovic returned after an injury as one of three changes to the PSG team, which was at home this weekend reigning 2-2 with Bordeaux in League One, but was overshadowed by Di Maria in the fourth minute.
The Argentine wing has been marked by both a man who posits PSG in Europe to a new level after the transfer from Manchester United, which passed last month, and showed why, when he ran to pass Marc Verratti in defence of Malma and a beautiful finish, he sent the ball behind Johan Wilanda into the far corner of the gate.
However, if anyone expected it to trigger a spectacular PSG victory, he had to be disappointed.
Malmo, who beat Celtic in the playoff and got to this stage, entered with 9 internationals in the base report, and five defenders and two cast-backs were a heavy match.
But in addition to the Nikola Djurdjic, who only narrowly missed the far corner of Kevin Trappa's corner in the 33rd minute, he did not offer much in attack.
Instead, PSG themselves were orbiting for the benefit of the attack by wickets and a miserable finish that was not good enough from Ibrahimovic, who failed to shoot five times in the first half, and was then disappointed as his shot reached the net shortly after the start of the second half Cavani.
However, he proved much more appropriate when he came to preparing the chances for his teammates and it was just out of his pass when Di Maria sent a torque shot that ended in the Wilanda gate after 52 minutes.
The second goal finally came after an hour of the game, thanks to Cavani, this Uruguayan's header sent for the line by the sixth goal this season after Ibrahimovic was added after a pass from Maxwell's left wing.
That ended Malma's thoughts about the possibility that he might have benefited from the game, and only an excellent intervention by Wilanda from a great distance had blown David Luiz's hopes, and the score remained unchanged even as the goalkeeper Ezequiel Lavezzi was unrecognised at the end of the match.
Coach Malmo Age Hareide conceded that PSG were a class higher above his team, the Norwegian said: "Our last game in the Liz Masters took place in December last year."
We have only played Swedish leagues since then, which is not on the same level.
Qualifying matches are not enough.
Hats off for Paris.
For them it was a fascinating game.
Glencore earned $2.5 billion in stock sales
The mining giant Glencore, based in Switzerland, which was hit by the collapse in commodity prices, earned $2.5 billion from the sale of shares in its vast plan to reduce debt.
Glencore says in its statement it has sold new shares worth about £1.6 billion to pay the debt.
This company, which lost 57 percent of its market value this year, is grappling with plaster prices, as China's slowdown in the economy lowers demand and sparked sparks of destruction across markets.
The rights issue was sent Wednesday by Glencore's share price to the top in London's stock market in early morning stores.
Shares jumped 2.77 percent to 131.60 pence on the FTSE 100 index, which opened up 0.69 percent higher.
Glencore revealed last week that the sale of stock worth $2.5 billion is part of broader plans to reduce their debt of $30 billion, which has accumulated about a third
The company sold new shares in price of 123 pence per share, which marked a 2.4per cent discount at the closing price on Tuesday.
They got rid of 1.3 billion shares in an overall price of 9.99 percent for the group.
Concerns about the extension of Chinese growth reduced the price of iron ore by nearly half, and coal, copper and other commodities plunged by 20 to 40%.
White House confirms Washington visited Xi Jinping
Chinese President Xi Jinping will visit the U.S. at the end of the month, confirming the White House in its Tuesday report.
President Xi's first visit to Washington will take place on September 25 in response to Barack Obama's visit to Beijing, where the president welcomed in November, the report said.
U.S. President and First Lady Michelle Obama invited President Xi and his wife Peng Liyuan to a state dinner to be held following the end of the talks.
"The visit of President Xi presents an opportunity to strengthen mutual relations between the US and China, and urges cooperation in addressing issues in the fields of international, regional and common interests, and is an opportunity for constructive debate about the disagreement between the two states," the report adds.
Xi, whose visit was first announced in February, should visit Seattle, where he will meet several technical leaders of the US on his way to Washington and then proceed to New York for the September UN session.
Obama and Xi are expected to address disputed issues, including concerns of Washington from the alleged cyberespionage of China and its growing aggression in the waters of the South China Sea.
How the refugee crisis shattered the Schengen area.
An emergency flare launched by Germany was far from a European crew, but is already forcing the ship to change course, the French newspaper Le Figaro wrote.
The European Union decided on Monday to address the problem of refugees: Rather, it will be systematically trimming migrants and asylum seekers once they step into the old continent - especially in Greece, rather than arguing for the future distribution of refugees under quotas based on quantities that are increasingly moving away from reality.
Six days after European Commission President Jean-Claude Juncker asked 25 of the 28 EU countries to redistribute 16,000 refugees, EU interior ministers have made priority.
Before taking care of the final destination of runners, it is ahead of the need to filter those arriving earlier today and to resolve the fate of those who are already moving inside the Schengen area.
"Effective management of the EU's external borders is essential to managing migration," he stresses in the text of pro-government ministers on Monday in Brussels.
Following the crisis, the EU finds itself at risk in its next major integration project.
Germany may be surprised, but it does not lose its resolve and increases the pressure.
It restores border controls, particularly with Austria, but without blocking the influx of those seeking asylum in this country.
The central power makes it clear that there is no freedom of movement in Europe without it.
As evidence has served, Austria and Slovakia have annexed this action on Monday.
Poland, the Netherlands, Belgium and even France think about it, albeit with varying intensities.
Hungary had done so long ago.
These exceptional and temporary measures are permissible under Schengen rules.
That it is a domino effect, but he sees it as well.
The key question for Berlin and Paris now is the effective introduction of mandatory entry checks in Greece, southern Italy, and also in Hungary for those who have already passed inland.
The French interior minister Bernard Cazeneuve and his German colleague Thomas de Maizière had been intensely concerned about it during a private conversation with their three colleagues from Greece, Italy and Hungary.
This idea is not new, but it is implemented.
In Italy, according to unofficial statistics, they were already registered and identified with fingerprints two-thirds of the new arrivals.
Budapest rejects the introduction of any entry point in its territory as it fears more than others to keep camps in which the refugees would accumulate on her behalf.
The real black hole remains Greece.
More than 200,000 people landed on its islands near the Turkish coast this year, twice as much as it had arrived in Italy at the last minute.
Most of them are real asylum seekers who came directly from Syria after they went through crowded camps in Lebanon, Turkey and Jordan.
It's a huge gaping hole.
Athens, which is still in financial turmoil, and which is waiting for the new government, folded their hands into the lap.
That is the starting point for the Balkan road, and the source of the now common concern for German Chancellor Angela Merkel and Hungarian Prime Minister Viktor Orbán.
The Juncker Commission promises that to introduce checkpoints will take place as soon as possible, but she has given no number, no date.
"The challenges facing Greece are covered by the whole of Europe," the EU's interior ministers agreed on to mobilise on that front on Monday.
So it is to deploy Europe's Frontex border control teams in this country.
The EU wants to help Greece expand its capacity for asylum seekers and strengthen surveillance of the islands.
"Appropriate financial resources will be needed," the text presented to ministers for approval.
In terms of law, they will continue to have the final say in Athens.
The issue of the emergence of real European border guards has not been officially raised, but it is close to Europe.
As such, the new emergency situation of the twenty-eight pushed the issue of binding quotas and 16,000 refugees, which was already established by the Juncker Commission and the European Parliament, which was strongly supported by Angela Merkel and French President François Hollande in early years.
Hungary, Slovakia, the Czech Republic and Poland still don't want to hear about it.
They see it as an attack on their sovereignty.
The number, but not the obligation, was retained in a text approved by the majority of the twenty-eight on Monday.
But as a political commitment.
In other words, the process is interrupted.
The only firm pledge includes a redistribution of 40,000 refugees over the next two years, which was already reached in June during a hectic EU summit, Le Figaro concludes.
Seven dead under an avalanche in the Alps, reportedly three Czechs.
Three Czechs and four Germans are among seven tourists who killed an avalanche in the French Alps.
German nationality is also claimed by the woman, who as the only one of the affected eight group has survived.
Previous media reports said it was a Polk.
A 30-year-old woman has been hospitalised in the town of Briancon in a serious head injury.
The dead were made up by AFP largely by 40th.
"The rescue mission has ended, also the bodies of the victims were taken to identify them in Briancon," the prefect told Hautes-Alpes Pierre Besnard.
The accident happened around noon in a mountain range of Pelvoux below the peak of the mountains of Dôme de Neige des Ecrins measuring 4015 metres.
"The sudden avalanche was a wide 250 metres and a tall about a metre," said the head of the rescue, Nicolas Colombani.
On an eight-team basis, a vast amount of snow fell in height at about 3900 metres.
The weather service hasn't warned in the area before the weather.
Trfreovský ahead of the fight with Braga: Finally, the real Europe.
Coach Henry Trpesky at his premiership in the AFC has been able to pass the footballers over the leaders of the European league to the base group and is now looking forward to taking the team with the right Europe.
Slovan at the introduction of the main stage of the competition will welcome the finalists from 2011 Braga, and by coach she wants to impose her game style on her.
After all the nerds in the knock-out sides, when every goal and every situation could have knocked you out on your way to a mock-up group, we're there now and we're going to play six games.
Of course, we want to win, but we don't have to be afraid of every insurgent goal, we can play our tactics and we're not bound by just a double-match.
"I'm looking forward to it and it's authentic Europe, before that has only been qualifications," Trpišovský said at a news conference.
Braga considers himself a top team.
He will be very active, they have the same Brazilian, Portuguese and Spanish players who are good at balls.
The match might just be harder for him to have no such name, but he has a player in his cadre, which I suspect Manchester has given three goals.
"It's an excellent whole at a top team level," Trpišovský noted.
But he doesn't consider Braga for a clear favourite.
I take it so we're playing at home, so outsiders certainly aren't.
"I think we have shown in the domestic competition as well as in the leaders we have shown that we are strong in our stadium, and we want to confirm that," said the coach, whose team lost from 11 duels this season just the opening Super Bowl in Pilsen.
He believes Liberec can even impose his style.
We have a team that will be strong on the ball, at the same time being uncharacteristically disciplined for them.
They're playing from 4-4-4-2 with a rapid transition to the attack phase.
"He's a very tough opponent, we have discovered the weaknesses, but the most important thing will be how our players do it on the field," Trpišovský said.
We've studied a lot of competition in the pre-rounds, which has helped us very much, this time we want to focus on our game, which we have also adapted to training.
"And we certainly do, even if it's going to be very difficult to play by our notes," he said.
Student films dominate the Sand, beginning with an international festival.
Over 350 authors from 51 countries have signed their works this year to contest the 15th annual International Festival of Student Film Festival in Sand.
Four dozen of them, which the board made up of students and educators sent to the finals, will be projected from 15 to 18 October in the cinema Porrod.
The best of them will be selected by an international jury, said the spokesman, Jim Charbid.
Each year, the festival has its special topic that unfolded away from the festival's sounding board.
This year it's a detective.
The director of this year's famous evenings, Richard Blumenfeld, plans to combine elements of television, film and theatre productions.
"And of course we must also solve the crime that has been committed in this year's capture," said Charvat.
Visitors will see the selection of the most intriguing of student-making - films played, animated and documentary.
Rating them will be an international jury, into which, for example, the winner of the last year, director Miklas Manneke, Spanish director Claudio Niubo and British producer Hemant Sharda.
Organisers of the festival as each year prepare an accompanying programme.
Will Wattican Punk Ballet from Armenia, singer Andrew Ruml, a professional player at didgeridoo Andrew Smeykal, the Turbosmaansons group Mission?, playful band Zic or, for example, Peter Hapk with a recount of Life on the Bar.
The festival will host two exhibitions of the photo.
The first will bring a graduate of the Sand Film School and a holder of a prestigious award, among which it is absent from the World Press Photo 2014, John Adelibrenner.
The second exhibition approaches the atmosphere, which was panned in Nepal following the tragic earthquake.
On a beheading with the visitors arrives by the cameraman and the documentarian of Martin Bohemia, mute film The Cameraman will accompany Gerhard Gruber and the sandy-haired Brukner, Novotny and Hungry at the studio of sculptor John Novotny baptising her new book 3 friends of the city of P.
This year we will also remember Miroslava Onnap, the patron saint of FAMO in the Sand, who recently left us.
Our school and the festival are his legacy that will live on.
"Young people from all over the world will continue to meet, exchanging experiences and developing common ties as well as film crafts," the spokesman said.
It will certainly also help a forum where students can meet film professionals, taking several job auditions at a time, and getting a job position.
The festival is associated with the emergence of a Private Higher Training School film in Sand.
Its founders, the husband of Vladan and Milos Terche, organised the first year in 1997.
He went to sixth grade once in two years.
In the bankruptcy of the TA, insurance companies have to pay their clients "entitlements in full.
Insurance companies should cover their clients "demands for a full-scale travel agent.
She decided on that in the middle of the House when she approved the modified amendment of the Affordable Care Act.
Travel agents will be able to replace the bank with a bank guarantee, according to the draft, which is headed for an assessment in the Senate.
Insurance companies have disapproved of clients even above the agreed limit.
The Department for Local Development is insisting on the adjustment, arguing the consumer protection.
Insurance companies have already threatened to put an end to the insurance of travel agents against the crash when the amendment is paid.
But the proposal is also criticised by travel agencies.
Without insurance, they will either have to quit or go abroad.
Minister for Local Development Karl Noble (for YES) pointed out that the cases where insurance companies did not pay full refunds were not the eurocompact.
She pointed to this year's Constitutional Court decision, which confirmed the client was entitled to a full refund of money, regardless of the insurance limit.
Insurance companies will be given enough information about the management of travel agencies and will be able to determine the right limit, stressed by the Sept.
"We appreciate the efforts to increase consumer protection, but it must have such a limit to be feasible," Vice-President TOP 09 Miroslav Kalousek said.
The bank guarantee will not work, because no one will give it unlimited access.
"Travel agencies will have to end their operations or move abroad," Kalousek warned.
A member of the Presidents' Association of Czech Travel Agents and Agencies Tomio Okamura (SPD), with Kalouskou's concerns based on a survey among the members, disagreed.
"Stop showing us lobbying insurance companies," he said.
The statement of the insurance companies does not consider Okamura relevant, there is no official written observations in that regard.
They are finding, however, whether the tour operators will consist of involvement, which, according to Okamura, is not a problem.
Prior to the provisions she also warned John Fischer (ODIs), which referred to the opinion of the rival Association of Travel Office of the Czech Republic, and her party colleague Peter Bendl, who spoke of deleting the steps of the Czech travel agency.
The travel agencies, according to the Fischer, will not be able to negotiate insurance.
"Consumer protection is working," Fischer reckons.
Her proposal was not approved by the House to release the disputed passport.
He did not date the Vojtěch Philip (KSČM), with the proposal to return a draft to the committee because of the alleged conflict with the civil code.
Philip pointed to the travel agencies, which they think can threaten consumers.
In view of the verdicts in the Constitutional Court, the rapporteur was withdrawing his proposal, which would limit the liability of insurance undertakings in cases where they could not have known that the benefits would not cover the entire risk.
In the news, it will not initially be the proposed minimum $4 million limit for travel agents offered by air travel, and a million limit for offices selling bus tours, for example.
The border will remain at 30 percent of planned sales from sales of rebounds.
However, the premium performance limit will have to be such that, in the event of bankruptcy, the travel agent covers all customers "demands.
The standard, even after adjustments, stipulate that the travel agencies will need to reintroduce at the selling tours, which the tour operator organises.
Travel agents will have to present insurance companies before concluding a contract, among other information about management and number of tours.
The approved amendment of the Public Accounts Committee is foreseen with other regular information by the insurance companies.
The travel agencies will have to supply them each month with data on the number of passengers and sold-out tours, the total cost of the trip and the amount of advance and sales for overseas trips and for vouchers for them.
If the Department for Local Development finds that the travel agent has failed to meet any of the legal obligations to the insurance company, he will challenge it, according to the draft, or he will be able to prohibit it from concluding a new contract if a breach of the obligation could jeopardise the interests of customers.
The paper is also to re-adjust the financing of the mountain service.
The Department for Local Development will determine the amount of a subsidy for the mountain service based on her application, which will be filed by the end of April for another year.
The application will include a report on the use of government money last year, a financial blueprint for expenses, and a view for the next two years.
According to the association, the bill did not, however, make an assumption of what happens if the insurance company declares the TA contract.
This will not be allowed to organise and clients who purchased the trip before the expulsion of insurance will come about, according to the association.
The CK will suffer a significant loss in such a case, and it can also fail, even if its management has been in good shape.
One way to deal with such situations can be the case for a refund.
Another option will be to go abroad and use much softer conditions abroad and we will act on our market then only as agencies, said vice-chairman of the association John Pope.
The proposal for the amendment also includes the Institute of Banking Guarantee, but it is not sufficiently thought that it cannot be implemented in practice, as the banking guarantee cannot be heard on an unencumbered amount.
Moreover, according to the association, the change in practice is de facto unnecessary.
In the two years' term, the new EU directive will need to be redeveloped in the light of the new EU directive.
A total of 942 active insured travel agents are operating in the Czech market.
This year, only three of the CBs have ceased their operations.
The country's travel agencies will sell a year of tours worth about £20 billion.
Merkel: We need to improve conditions in the Middle East.
The European Union must address the improvement of humanitarian conditions in refugee camps in Jordan and Lebanon to limit the arrival of refugees to Europe.
It was announced by German Chancellor Angela Merkel following negotiations with the German country's prime ministers.
At the same time, it appealed again to the distribution of refugees, who had already arrived in the EU, among the member countries of the twenty-eight.
We must do more to help countries where refugees are leaving, where they may be delayed when they leave the country.
I expect a signal from the European Union that we will address decent conditions in refugee camps, such as in Jordan and Lebanon, the German Chancellor has said, according to which increased EU financial assistance or closer cooperation with international humanitarian organisations could also be such a signal.
"The foreign countries are also supporting the German government in order to promote a fair distribution of the weight of the refugee crisis on European countries," Merkel said further.
The country's prime minister, Braniborn, Dietmar Woidke, in this context at a press conference, said he expected real solidarity from all EU states.
In the long term, the distribution of refugees in the EU on the basis of quotas is rejected by the Czech Republic.
Merkel and Woidke have also spoken out for speeding up asylum procedures in Germany.
People need to know as soon as possible if they have a chance to stay here.
It is also needed for the authorities to be able to begin more quickly with the integration of foreigners, the goalkeeper's prime minister has said.
There is also a need for most of the money Germany issues to care for a runner-up, serving just to integrate those with a chance to get asylum.
We need more teachers so that the refugees can handle the Germans.
It is a great challenge for our country, but I believe that if running to integrate can become an asset to us, he said.
Matt Damon bagged diversity in film
Matt Damon confronted the African-American filmmaker Effie Brown during a discussion about diversity with claiming it was not necessary behind the scenes.
During Sunday's episode of the HBO project, Greenlight interrupted the actor cast into the series by Brown as she emphasized the need for alternative perspectives on black players in the script.
"When we talk about diversity, you do it in the cast of the film and not on the cast of the show," Damon says.
Shocked, she responded with indignant Brown with disbelief and sighed "Hoo! Wow. Okay," when the comments about the Martian came into the air.
Damon and Brown have contacted joint-known producer Ben Affleck and brothers Farrell to discuss the finale of the show.
"I'd like to appeal to people to think, whoever the director is, how they will behave to the character of Harmony," Brown said at the beginning.
The only black character who's a hooker to be packed by a white pimp.
Producer of expensive White People has championed finalists Angelos and Kristen Brancaccio for the rights to direct the film; Damon retorted that their director "could eventually give us something we don't want."
After the discussion was broadcast, social media exploded in disapproval with the comments made by Damon.
Twitter user MrPooni expressed anger at the writing clip, "Matt Damon was jumping into the talk of a single black man in the room, so he can explain to her that diversity is a Taste that it hurts."
The tweet earned more than 5,000 retweets and 4,000 licks since it was published.
Damon's comment comes as the exact racial representation in the media is at the forefront of social debate.
After being killed by a teenage Michael Brown by a white police officer in 2014, the Black Lives Matter movement was taking a national effect and pushing for lawmakers and authorities to refrain from pursuing discriminatory practices against colored people.
In February, the singer-songwriter made hints at the movement while placing the nominees in the Album category during the Grammys.
"Albums are still important," he said.
Like books and black lives, albums are still important.
The latest head of the Black Lives Matter introduced a statement in response to the issue of the personality of Fox News, Elisabeth Hasselbeck, whether the group should be considered a hate group.
"Black Lives Matter Network is a group of love," the leaders said.
Damon was recently reported on a list of entertainers, producers and media of the moguls who were invited to visit the pope to discuss the display of the Catholic Church in the west.
Whether he accepted the invitation, or had met with the Pope, is not clear.
"American Ninja Warrior has first winner"
Professional climber and piper Isaac Caldiero became the first contestant to win the American Ninja Warrior competition on Monday and took home one million dollars.
In the competition, which has just finished its seventh season, none of the contestants have been able to overcome all the hurdles on the line.
During the finals this season, two men fought each other to the final round, Caldiero and cameraman Geoff Britten.
The last hurdle was a 30-second climb after more than 220 m long rope.
Britten had taken a climb first and that within the limit, and he became the first contestant in the American Ninja Warrior to overcome a whopping 4 stretch, however, Caldiero surpassed it by a full three seconds, and the contest won.
Caldiero provided the interview for news bulletin! News immediately after his hard-earned victory and it was to know he was still in shock off the prize of a major prize of $1 million.
"It's an amazing feeling, I've never done more than $10,000 a year in my life," Isaac told E! In response to his win.
"Then all of a sudden... I can't imagine what it's going to be like now."
Executive producer Kent Weed gave an interview to The Hollywood Reporter about the course of the finals and why Britten won't receive any reward despite the fact that he became the first contestant to have completed the track.
According to the rules, the money belongs to whoever finishes the track fastest.
"If the track is taking on more contestants, the prize gets the one with the best time," said Weed.
Although the profits of the main prize would change his life, Britten is happy with his performance.
"I don't think he has a grudge.
He is happy to have achieved what he has done.
He received a warm welcome from the fans.
He's a great guy and he likes his family.
He's a hero for his children and his wife. "
Geoff told me: "If he was to be someone who could have beaten me, I'm glad it was Isaac."
And I think if I won, Isaac would have felt the same.
America's Ninja Warrior will continue the eighth season, which will begin filming in the spring of 2016.
Tigers from Detroit went just close to Minnesota Twins
Minneapolis -- for tigers from Detroit, the second half of the season wasn't exactly a walk-in.
The Tigers, one of the best baseball teams, are currently on the final spot of the Central American League.
They just narrowly averted the Tigers their defeat when they beat the Minessons close by 5-4 at stadium Target Field on Tuesday.
The twins missed the chance to approach the Houston Astros team and seize the second wild card in the American League.
Though only for one night, for Detroit, it was the return of the word on Z, which for them was so elusive during the second half of the season.
"Winning is always fun, and it doesn't matter what way," the manager of the Tigers told the Ausmus.
Tiger Alfredo Simon kept his offensive line-up and Detroit scored three times in the first two innings and then took in another in the sixth and ninth innings.
Simon (13-9) allowed opponents 6 1 / 3 launches and 3 lunches.
It was his only third consecutive game of the last nine games.
"I want to end this year with convincing results," Simon said.
"It's hard to come into a game when you often sit on the bench and that's why I want to get really into the game."
Tiger Victor Martinez was shot three times and made two lunches and his first withdrawal point since mid-August.
For Martinez, it was the first three-point game since last June's game, in which he has scored four times in the match against the Seattle Mariners.
"He leaned on it pretty good," Ausmus said.
"He looked good at training, he fired noticeably better, and he managed to bring it into the match."
Thanks to three lunches at the end of the seventh inning, the Twin Towers won the biggest chance to return back to the game.
Center fielder Byron Buxton gained his shift thanks to two points on the left side of the field.
The real fielder Aaron Hicks got the point by setting the bat, and Simon was spooked by Brian Dozier before he was replaced by left-handed by Blaine Hardy.
Hardy singled out his only opponent Mauser and before him had batsman Miguel Sana who detonated the ball and hanged two metes and left behind the grandstand Drew Verhagena.
With two players on meats and chances for a redevelopment in the second inning, VerHagen managed to send a third sweeper over two metes.
Plouffe has gained 27 circulation over two bases in this season and fed the league table.
Detroit held its ninth inning, Mauer getting two downloads, and Bruce Rondon secured a 5-4 lead for the Tigers.
However, this right-hander ranked Sana on three terms.
Detroit took advantage and gained points in Phil Hughes "game.
The Tigers gained three runs in the first two shifts against a retired batsman who entered the game after more than a month's break due to inflammation of the wrist muscles.
"I certainly didn't fancy such a start," Hughes said, "but I felt I was going to pitch better during the third inning."
After he resisted the onslaught in the first inning, he released Hughes one point to the other sweeper by Ian Kinsler.
Two exits for the right fielder J.D. Martinez handed Victor Martinez, who first served all of the bases.
Victor Martinez interrupted his series 0-21.
Third sweeper Nick Castellanos followed up with a point on the right side of the field and scored another lunch, but Victor Martinez was draped as he attempted to reach third base.
The Tigers added in the second innings when pitcher James McCann and fielder Anthony Gos got two and covered one point and a 3-0 lead on the resulting whiteboard.
"That put us on the knees," said the manager of Twin's Paul Molitor.
"He missed the ball very well, but he got him in the right place."
Hughes, who won on the number of overthrows, finished third innings with no points and replaced him with a righty of A.J. Achter.
Hughes ran three bases, got six launches and 4 strays.
Note: Anibal Sanchez, the right-hander of the Tigers, ended the game with pain in his right shoulder.
Dr. James Andrews, who operated Sanchez's shoulder in 2007.
Sanchez, who is on the list of injuries thanks to outstretched muscle in the shoulder since mid-August, should take charge in Wednesday's match.
Sanchez will be replaced by left-handed Daniel Norris, who will come back after an injury and take on the Twin Towers.
Since June 30, when Norris has been replaced as the left pitcher of David Price, he has a score of 1-1 after 4 games.
However, he hasn't yet played since August 20.
The Tigers and Twins will play a third mutual game at the stadium Target Field on Wednesday.
Against Norris (2-2, 4.43 ERA), Minnesota left pitcher Ervin Santana (5-4, 4.73 ERA).
Xi calls for opening economy into wider world
It is imperative to open an economy to the wider world for boosting growth, said President Xi Jinping's group, whose job is Tuesday's governance reform.
"China should engage in attracting foreign investment and expertise and improve open policies," he said on the 16 session of the central leadership group for deepening overall reform.
Promoting the opening in rotating reforms will deliver new impetus and vitality, it will also provide a new scope for economic growth, Xi says.
The leadership group has adopted a number of directives, including a negative regulatory approach to the market, the relaxation of border controls, support for state-owned enterprises (SOEs) to absorb private capital and reorganization of the registration residence system.
The statement says a negative list will be drawn, in which sectors and businesses are identified, which are off limits for investment.
This system will be tested gradually and improved through test programmes.
This move is significant as it will give the market a greater role in resource allocation, securing the legal business environment and making the market more open, the statement says.
The government will also release controls on powers that delegate to firms, and make sure companies themselves make decisions about how to manage their business.
The statement also indicates that China will allow border areas to discover new models of cross-border economic cooperation and new support mechanisms for regional growth.
In an attempt to open state-controlled sectors, more areas will be open to private investment.
"The government will not change its policy towards foreign investment and it will protect the legal interests of companies funded by companies, and will provide better services to them," the statement read.
In addition, it will be easier for foreigners to apply for a permanent residence permit or a "green card," by optimising the requirements and simplifying the application process.
Securing rights advocates practice and develop a professional judge and a prosecutor has also been at a meeting.
The meeting was also attended by Premier Li Keqiang and leaders Liu Yunshan and Zhang Gaoli, according to a statement issued after the meeting.
There may be a new berth in the Karlovar region.
According to the Deputy Director of the Karlovarsky Region, Jakuba Pnik (ČSSD), the current capacity of the beds of two regional hospitals and two private hospitals in the country is sufficient, and the partial adjustments should be made on the basis of agreement between individual hospitals.
But there are options for extending care in the country.
For example, a surgical ward ward office could create centres of one-day surgery where surgical courses would be performed, according to a set design, which required no hospitalisation for more than 24 hours.
In which specific hospitals, a workplace focused on one-day surgery should be, so far, it is not clear.
For the skin ward of the Karlovy Vary hospital, a laser centre could be created with the possibility of using laser technique on a skin condition.
The concept also recommended the emergence of an apathetic centre that would take on patients with a disability of the brain who are in a vegetative state.
Such a centre should be established centrally and should be an integral part of the anaesthetist-resuscitation unit.
There is also the possibility of focusing such a facility into an island where similar care exists.
The extra beds that appear to be insufficient in the Karlovar region are the beds of follow-up care, especially the beds of long-term sufferers (LDN), whose capacity in the Post is inadequate and, above all, should be closely associated with acute treatment beds.
Part of this device should function as a bed of rehabilitation and part as a classical LDN berth, recommends the concept.
As he points out, beds of follow-up care are missing mainly at Karlovy Vary hospital.
There, they could be used to leave buildings after centralization.
Last but not least in the Karlovar region absences social-health beds with a focus on Alzheimer's disease treatment.
These beds are scarce throughout the country, so it could serve for the rest of the country as a so-called Alzheimer's.
The hospitals, according to the recommendations, should prepare for the implementation of the so-called "follow-up" beds to be released by the European subsidy funds.
"These are beds that will be based on supespecialized care and will form a space for a translation of patients following surgery, for example following cardiac surgery, neurosurgery, transplantation, or other procedure," the regional concept of bed care is described.
New services could also be offered in the area of psychiatric care.
